      "identifier" : [
         "8_04911_821"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Canaba %aw 3SournaL. VOL. L. TORONTO, MAY 1, 1914 No. 9. THE CANADIAN BAR ASSOCIATION. At a meeting held in Ottawa on March 31st, a Dominion Bar Association was formed under the aboye title, and a draft consti- tution was adopted. This meeting was attended by many prominent members of the profession from all parts of the Dominion, together with Mr. Charles T. Terry and Mr. Walter G. Smith, representing Mr. Taft, ex-President of the United States, who was invited to attend as President of the American Bar Association. Addresses were de- livered by them and by the Rt. Hon. R. L. Borden, Premier of Canada, and others, after which the officers of the new association were elected. They are as follows:- Honorary President, Hon. C. J. Doherty, K.C., Minister of Justice; Honorary Vice-Presidents, the Attorneys-General of the several Provinces; President, J. A. M. Aikins, K.C.M.P., of Win- nipeg; Vice-Presidents, Humphrey Mellish, K.C., Halifax, N.S.; K. J. Martin, K.C., Charlottetown, P.E.I.; M. G. Teed, K.C., St. John, N.B.; R. C. Smith, K.C., Montreal, Quebec; James Bicknell, K.C., Toronto, Ontario; Hon. H. A. Robson, K.C., Winnipeg, Man.; James McKay, K.C., M.P., Prince Albert, Sas- katchewan; James Muir, K.C., Calgary, Alberta; Gordon C. Cor- bould, K.C., New Westminster, British Columbia; Secretary, E. Fabre Surveyer, K.C., of Montreal; Associate Secretary, R. W. Craig, Barrister, of Winnipeg; Treasurer, John F. Orde, K.C., Ottawa. The council of the association is to be composed of eight members of the profession from Ontario, eight from Quebec and four each from the other Provinces. It will thus be seen that the association is of a very representa- tive character. The president is appropriately chosen from what",
         "2M2 CANADA LAW JOURNAL. may be called the geographical centre of Canada. Personally the selection of these officers will be most acceptable to the profession. The constitution adopted is as follows: ARTICLE I.-This Association shall be known as \"THE CANA- DIAN BAR ASSoCIATION.\" Its objects shall be to advance the science of jurisprudence, promote the administration of justice and uniformity of legislation throughout Canada so far as consis- tent with the preservation of the basic systems of law in the respec- tive provinces, uphold the honour of the profession of law and en- courage cordial intercourse- among the members of the Canadian Bar. ARTICLE II.-Any member in good standing of the Bar of any Province shall be eligible to membership in this Association. ARTICLE III.-There shall be elected at the meeting for or- ganization and thereafter at each annual meeting for the year en- suing the following officers:-An Honorary President; a Presi- dent (the same person shall not be elected President two years in succession); one Vice-President from each Province; a Secretary; an Associate Secretary; a Treasurer; and eight members from each of the Provinces of Ontario and Quebec and four members from each of the other Provinces. The Attorney-General for the time being of each Province shall be ex-officio an Honorary Vice- President of the Association. The said officers, Attorneys-General and members so elected shall compose the Council of the Associ- ation. Nine members of the Council shall constitute a quorum. Should any vacancy occur in the elected representation from any Province by reason of death, resignation or removal from the Province, the remaining elected representation from such Pro- vince may fill such vacancy by the selection of another member of the Association. The Council may appoint such committees of the Association and on such subjects as it may deem proper and fit by the quorum thereof. ARTICLE IV.-Persons of distinction not members of the Bar of any Province may, without formal nomination or certification, be elected by the Council to be honorary members of the Associa- tion. Honorary Members shall be entitled to the privileges of the",
         "THE CANADIAN BAR ASSOCIATION. 283 floor during meetings, but shall not be entitled to vote, and they shall pay no dues. ARTICLE V.-All members of the conference adopting the constitution, and all persons eligible and who are nominated by a member shall become members of this Association upon payment of the annual dues for the current year herein required. ARTICLE VI.-By-Laws may be adopted at any annual meet- ing of the Association by a majority of the members present. It shall be the duty of the council without delay, to adopt suitable By-Laws, which shall be in force until rescinded by the Associa- tion. ARTICLE VIL--Each member shall pay five dollars to the Treasurer as annual dues, and no person shall be qualified to exercise any privilege of membership who is in default. Such dues shall be payable, and the payment thereof enforced, as may be provided by the. By-Laws. Members shall be entitled to re- ceive all publications of the Association free of charge. ARTICLE VIII.-The President shall open each annual meeting of the Association with an address upon such topic as he may select. ARTICLE IX.-This Association shall meet annually, at such time and place as the Council may select, and those present at any session of such annual meeting shall constitute a quorum. ARTICLE X.-This Constitution may be altered or amended by a vote of three-fourths of the members present at any annual meeting, but no such change shall be made at any meeting at which less than thirty members are present. There will necessarily be many obstacles to overcome before the Association can be pronounced a success, but the beginning is a good one and augurs well for the future. Its usefulness of course can alone justify its existence, but it is in good hands, and we may hope for good results, not only to the profession but to the country at large. It is to be hoped that the influence of the Association may be felt in bringing about desirable legislation for the betterment of our laws in connection with many matters wherein the profession COuld give good advice and assistance, for the better adminis-",
         "CANADA LAW JOURNAL. tration of justice, for the keeping up to the highest standard our judiciary, and, to that end, as far as possible eliminating from the selection of judges all questions of party politics, and pre- venting the Bench from being used, as it has occasionally been, as a dumping ground for discarded, needy or clamorous politi- cians. It is high time that lawyers should assert themselves and realise the dignity and importance of their calling, and that they should put the profession in the first place and party politics in the second place. It is only in this way that the status of both Bench and Bar can be maintained and improved, and the pro- fession continue to be, as it has been in the past in this country, a beneficial factor for the general welfare. There was a brilliant gathering at a banquet given in the even- ing of the last day of the proceedings, the Governor-General being present, together with guests from the United States, Mr. Terry and Mr. W. G. Smith. -Other eminent guests were the Minister of Justice, the Minister of Finance, the Minister of Marine and Fisheries, the Minister of Inland Revenue, the Solicitor-General, Justices Idington, Duff, Anglin and Brodeur of the Supreme Court, Mr. Justice Cassels and Mr. Justice Audette of the Ex- chequer Court, Mr. Field, President of the Ontario Bar Associa- tion; Mr. J. E. Martin, K.C., Batonnier of the Montreal Bar, Mr. Drayton, Chairman of the Railway Commission, together with the principal officers of the Association. A number of dis- tinguished members of the Bar from Prince Edward Island in the East to British Columbia in the West, also sat round the board. The toasts and speakers at this banquet which was held at the Chateau Laurier were as follows:-following the toast of the King was that of the Governor-General of Canada, responded to by His Royal Highness the Duke of Connaught. The High Court of Parliament.-Proposed by P. B. Mignault, K.C., Montreal, and responded to by Hon. J. D. Hazen, K.C., in the absence of the Prime Minister. The American Bar Association.-Proposed by Hon. C. J. Doherty, Minister of Justice, and responded to by Mr. Walter George Smith, of Philadelphia. 284",
         "THE CANADIAN BAR ASSOCIATION. 285 The Canadian Bar Association.-Proposed by Mr. Charles Thaddeus Terry, of New York, and responded to by Mr. R. C. Smith, -K.C., of Montreal, and Mr. A. Monro Grier, K.C., of Toronto. These addresses were most interesting and rose to the impor- tant occasion which produced them. We make room for those given by Mr. Walter G. Smith and Mr. Charles T. Terry. After referring to the inception of the American Bar Associa- tion, beginning with a very few, but now numbering thousands of members of the profession from all the States and depend- encies of the United States, Mr. Smith said:- \" It is from the lawyers that the truc spirit of the jurisprudence of the country on all subjects emanates. He pleads that the spirit of parties shall not question the foundation of our policy, the Constitution. In these days when a mysterious unrest per- vades the whole civilized world, and premises that have been ac- cepted for centuries are questioned, it is all the more important that a conservative spirit shall pervade the Bar. In an eloquent address by one of your own leaders to the lawyers of Pennsylvania, Mr. R. C. Smith, he showed in his own apt way that the princi- \u003eples of eternal justice are embodied in the common law, and while its forms of administration may well be*the subject of change with the changed conditions of the time, we cannot without throw- ing away the lessons of experience and morality touch these principles themselves. How far the long years of usefulness of the American Bar Association have affected the public weal, it would be difficult to measure. Steadily pursuing its declared purpose, it has donc much to advance the science of jurisprudence, as the great body of legal study treasured in its reports will reveal to any student. Its efforts to promote the administration of jus- tice may be traced in the statutes of the United States and of the several States. When it was found that the docket of the Supreme Court was congested with undisposed appeals, by the aid of the various committees appointed to draft legislation, Congress was enabled to remedy this evil by the creation of the Circuit Court of Appeals. The record of the Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, a child of the Association, shews how uni-",
         "2S6i CANAIDA 1_1W JOURNLxý j formitv bas been brouglit about in many eommerrial and social i branches- of the Iaiw. and b'v no means the least of its achievements f bas been the bringing about of cordial interrourse among the wide- kv scparated meinhers of our own comînon profession, which bas en iched the lives of itzi members with friendships they would flot millingly forego. To the voung lawver the Association has given t he inest imable privilege of iAose int imacy mit h the veteran leaders that would otherwiie have hee-n impotssihlc, and thus bas carried on the tiaditionl, as, no other agency could have dune. The :tan- dard of legal education bà\u0026- been raised: the law school.,s have been brought intré harrnonious co-ordimudion and a mide of ethics ail but universally aeeepted(..shows- the pitialhs to he avoided. and the ideals to be cherishcd hy3 ail who aspire to the honor, and respect -)f their brethren of the robe. It lias been well sai(l that the law i., the most (lcmocratic ofI profession.. Howe-ver adventitious a(lvantages, of lîirth er wealth mav affect other eaIlitig'. thre ., luit unîe :îri.siorac% reognzi hec li Is that or riîg character andl intellect. The glori- ous prizes are ini the grasp of those onlv uhwlo seorfi \u003celights and live labous (Fi whose asýpirations are- contenit i it b selfless (1Cvotion to ibbc cause of justice. 1 otten tbink of lte fine tritilte paid by Mr. Justice Hoics t a Mlassachusetts judge whorn 1w de\u003c- picî-, as caring nothing that his îvork Ilotild hIv labelled ivit b Iii! name. Il was reivard enough to know that hr had a~dJnow and then a stone to Ci~e rnilof the laîv. The desire for po-'t- h urnous fume is imfflanted in niost of our hvartsý. To ubtain it. mnen face death with elieerfulieý..s. .lthouglî we know huuv evail- j S escent it nîustbe, still wc strive for il. Yet lo the lawyer. nis i lie lîal Lad the rare oi,,ortuini:vý of a 'Mansfieldl or a Mlarshall, [ il must be known tb'at lus 'name is writ in wat(r' s4u far aus pus\u003e- teritY ill remnernler imi. 1-le is forci er vliminbng iii thew clirning wave.' The edfifice of learning erected i1bout eac'b case vrumubles when ii is end\u003ced. Whbat t hvi is t he aitraction of the lait' Duoes it flot Ccîîsis, in thle great saifcinof ai\u003cling the cause of order. anul the aplication of th priltihciffle, of justice bY bi., minist rY? Besidles the sutisfactio o01f a selIf-applroviing C0o1sciînce., what human reputat ion can 1w conipared?",
         "I.M@3wM THE C'.%ADIAN BAR .CAI».287 There is ar '.her reward which is far iweeter than anv outside of the profefflon can know-the privilege of meeting on the equal plane of a common gentlemanlyhood with men of intellect and hesrt. To feel, however insignificunt he may be in cornparison with the \"ret leaders, that one is of the sanie calling and in a ineasure bound b)v the sanie responsibilities as those who 'walk witb a f ree foot on the higher range of the law.' Courage ani perseverance, 'the Gods yield ail to lahor.' Such is the lesson taught by the.lives of al] those whom we caîl great lawyvera-. They began in humble spheres !«ike the pawn oa the chess-board. but by skilful exercise of talent and by industry they rt.\"oh the voal. 'So mergeth the true hearted With aim fixt high, Frorn plare obscure anai lovulv Vee'etk. he r.aughte. His works he wroughte. Iloiv many rayai pat.s lie troi So manv royal trowns hath God.' (;entlcmren of the (?anadian lkar As-sociation, 1 give yvu greet- Mng and congrutulate vou tih. i au have corne ;nto b)einig. 1 have iiad sortie opportunity ta travel in your giorn)u- counatry. fot lik#- vouir Association in its nalc ht:rviinearlv andl lusv vouth. Your lofty inioutit.iins- are an inspir; 'ion: your ix,ur.tdle:ss prairies a prophccy, vour lakes and farest-, abRI rivers are destined hw Provide'nce ta miniý-ter ta the weaich and Ipr-os-ptrity of a1 niighty l)ealplr. You are our kindred; ý ou are born af tle sane great traditions; Ireserv(' thern andibiic tlitt f ,)n-j our ýi dt- of the irnaginarv boundarv that separates us but ;n jiare. we shaîl rejoie in youir growth and glorv ini vour strerngth.- Mr. Terry i n :peaking of thle fiit ion of law. :-aid: i \"The siiînpl-st truths are ofteti those which are rnost e.a.;lN averlooked. It is the sininlest of truth,; that laîv is inadte ta livc N it iaier and flot upon. The 0u.lv legit irnate funet ion for laW is ta î\u003erovi\u003c1t a rule af rondurt. I t i., nt thle fuinct ian-af lawv ta pn*o'ideI aî rest ing place or a support for t ho-cw ho, of în' iul ait jat i\\te, wouild :eek ta suasi it ute gaývrineiat for arte",
         "- M ~ 238 CANADA LAW JOURNA L. -SoeiaJism is a short naine for this attemp' to ret;t e%-erthing on (iovernment. It is a real danger which i..; pre.-ented in our time. and the danger i1% the danger of paternalismn. Whiie ive have been oi-erlook.ng the simple trui, which ;-s obvious on every hand, speciai classe--, eaeh witb its own particular iiiteres--t, havc heen sectuing the enactniént of their own sefs!:desired laws. each intent only in secu.iing for its-elf the largest ineasure of participation in go%-ernrer.t fends, gavernuient protection and governnwnt aid. It is clear that a set of individtuals. enthusias- ticailv (leternuined to secure it,ý ýjw ends, should accomplimh itsI purposes. in view of the indifference or negleet oi the rest of the eitizenship. It is. therefore. no more than might have !\u003eeen reasýonalbis expected that our statute bo)ks have 'aeconie the repos-itorNv of an overwhelnîing ni.ts of famnentarv. tinconnectedl legfisiation. i.aiv has beconie an (\u003eb$sesi\u003c)fl of our ritizens. It ha. beconie the hab\u003eit of anyone. ivho conceives a hiaf it-leioptl itica about anything. froii the presteri,îttuin of the ( #innînoî- wealth to the Tre'ervatio oe f songbi-.1s. or the treatinent (if (:irw1il h ra.iiiii. to rs t. t he Iegislatutre ami hvstericaill dlenand a st:tuie. .Xnd the pity of it i.4 that the%. frequeîitlv' g\u003c't thefli enacted. M'i, bveoine roncerne(l iith Jittie things andl forget the big ones. IVe take account of .4attùtes for the pre- sprv ation of everyihing except the ;)res('rvation of indi% iduai libierty-. Government, nheaning 1)' t bat iiîn la ct it is. namely. the iaw:ý whkali t he p\u003eeople tlî-I 'enart. ha:s in'maded thle frefedoni of the inIi vi\u003cIual te siuch ani extent t bat ive vouder whc-ther anv of it is Ieft. le is re-gi.tedl at ev er 'v step lie taks. fromî t he tinie lie rioý- ini thle nuorniîlg umail lie retires at iight j and also. in no srnal degree, during his d.,eepgng lueur-, It niay flot lie tooc Uh to .say that Iaw is fas4t lxeoing a collection of undigestu\u003cl chunks of legisiat ion, unronneetuil ami uinreIated. except froin t lue fart t bat t hey are couîtained iii thle saie set (fl book,. Such al condlitioni is far frein stfyîgthe truc clefinititin fa1 suliit to y ou the p)ropos)itÎin t bat cuir jiurisprudenci(e ivili. in no small legree, licome greut in somiething like the propor- tion in which we aniputate fromî the body of the lawv the eýxere.,- M mftý",
         "TII E CAN.ADIAN BAR AOC.IU.28q rences. the al\u003enormal growths, and the dispw3ed and swollen members. and give !vîeuitiei treatment and readjustment to that which remains. It is flot extravagant to say that, so long as we allow t1.e.se abnor'mal foreigr growths to remain, the vt-rv life of the body politic itself is threatened. The essence of law is liberty. TLe purpose of law i-, liberty. It viii flot very much avail us to have a large body of law if. ini accumulating it. we muisi the very purpose of ail law. Among the anrient ý'rùeks there was a eontest, whîch consisted in a race in whicb everv conte-stant started from the line holding a light,'d torcbi. Victorv w-as to him wvho crasscd the flnishing line fil *î. wilh hi~.: frch s!4iIi brirning. It w\u0026,; of no adv'intage to hiua to be fleet of foot and reacb the goal first. if bis Iight went out while bie wa., runiiing in the cour.se. As nation\u003e. wi, miust run the race and finish thý- course. b)ut it will 1w of litile avail to us if at the end w-e find that the ligbit of liberty lias beeii extii- gLw.Tbcre is (langer that we beconie slvsof iaw. liv- catu\u003ee of our failure to pr;ryobserve the funvtion of Iaw. We liave taken it out of ils proper sphere of furnishixg an --relia for ulltrallufl(1ie( indîi idual effort. to bw a govemnîniental Io\u003ciging hoii-. vb ere alîvoîxe tina v ecure sustenance. shelter and repose if be înav heg. bOrroiv or steal a ticket of admiss,ýioni. 11we fuînction of mxv. as bias 1) vli said. is tu act as LIjic Il i-. îot thp fi. Ictioli of I:iw t0 play thbe grnie for u:. Ils usýe is to sec that there i., no cbeating. aîîd no o\\-er-r,-,chirg. and tb.'t vacb inan sb.1havec opportunity to exercise bis talents to tlle fîîhl in the contest. The law Atouts the pistol for the leginxiing of the race, and regulates tie ,ourse*(, but it cannot and should flot carry the cantestants over it. We have wan(lcre(l far fromn that Idca. Great as, is the science of law, it muiist i, kept within ils province. It miust bit (liscrimluiate(l fro.ni tbhose( tbings whicil il i., îot. and it Inus't be close! v co!,fined to thlo..e t hings wbich it s. Ie xi.,i a t bing bo pract îse, fot to prart ise tipon. * iîs a Scienlce, aîî ! flot a l\u003eîis.Il ts aliîî ideal. anîd fot a deal M.I a gaine' of -ards. Il is a noble profesion, and liot a juggler's trick box. It încuicagtes, if it i: truc tu its kemfcf. respect for thle otiier fellow'., point of view: and Ilbat is the beginning.",
         "2W0 CANADA LýAW JOURNAL. the end ami the essenc-e of the hrotherhood of man. It has corne to pass, or is rapidlv coining to pass. that the 'aw suffocateýs individuality, instead of supr)li.ng it with the refreshing air of j freedoin. 'Our goN-ermeit., under the guise of the exercise of the police power, have obtruded too far into the realm of per- sonal privilege. It is for us, as lawyers, to apply the reînedy. anI to unae h e apeo e procdure effor to checkfvthe a y t I entioe n t r . tape r of eglroeur efand to checkf the la n aeituiesl the accomplisliments of our (Con- ferece f Cmmisioers n Uifom SateLaw2. Ti oy to whch 1havethe istinuisled hnourof blnig sa offspring of the American B3ar Association. For twcntv-five Years it has pursued its work to uni! v the laws c'f the various E' states of the United State, on sulbjeets of interstate concern- f. calmlv. dçliberatelý, patientlv, hut, withal, enthu.siasticall% ami without recs.'imn. ('onsidering the temperamnent of siate legisiatures. thle pres~'ure that i'i b)rouglt to bear uipon theni for the enactinent of legis- lation purely local. the engro:ssîng szpecial concerns wivhîh drive legisiators during their session and the natural disinclination on their part to put aside miat ters of tht jr own indiv blual and their own sta*e interest for the coiiÎitrration of more getiral, evc*n * ~t hough qui it flot more important, mat ters w lnch cocrn J. ail the states taken vollectivelv, it is little les than anlazing that tt he acts 1)roposed by the ('enfer ence az; unifornm acts for ai the stes should have met t) cordial anid readv a recep)tion 1w t lie v.armous state legislatures. The Negotiable lInstrumei(nts Act bas been adopted bv 46 states. territories and federal diistricts and poss~essions: the Ware- j bouse Receipts Act l'a lwen approved and bas hecoilne file iawv Iof 30 staties, territories and federal district.- aud, possessions; the Buis of Lading Act is now the law in I1 sfates, territories, andi federal districts andi possessions; the Sai' si of It\u003eods Act in 111 ;tates, territories, federai districts and P)ossess1\u003cins: the 'ert ifi- cates of Ktork Act iu !) ;tates, tt'rritories and fehmldistricts 'i and possessions; the D)ivorce Act iu 3 states; the Fanily Deser-",
         "THE CANADIAN BAR AsCAIN 9 tion Act in 4 states; and the Probate of Foreign~ WiHls Act in 9 statès, tWrritories and federal districts and possessions. These resuits have been set forth in the chronological order in which the various acte have been appr.,ved by the Conference, and ý1t wilI be seen that, in view of \u0026le time during which each of the acts bas been under consideeation by the various legislatures, the approval and adoption of them bas been steady and reguflar mn proportion to-the oppo: tunity afforded. It 's inevîtable that, in the progress of thus making uniform, the Iaws of the various states on subjeets of intcrstate applica- tion, the studv involved must, and does, resuit in the clarifica- tion of the law as expressed in the uniform draft of it. and like- nise ini the elimination therefrom of ail unnecessar., eonfiimsing and diverge-nt features. If it is said that complete uniforînity of law is a long wav fromn accomplishment., and that the task is so coloîsal a., to be well-nigh impossible of performanre, it is answered that no task, hoivever colosýsal, w-as ever accomplislied for could he acconlplished until a lîeginning had I\u003eecn miade, and that any degrev of uni- formitv is better than no unifornîitv at ail. The progresýs made by' the ('onferctuce in its twentv-five vears of -service has amply dem'non,'m!ted, to the satisfactioni of everv one m-ho bas giv Ca the inatter serions inv-etigationi. that the Nvoek i. beneficent in its resuits,' that distinct prOgres; lias l'een nmade, that fulîl accomplishnîent is only a q1uestionl of finie. ilînt every -,-tep of progress along ~nslin( inakes the ncxt stel) easier, and that the force of the moveinmnt is cumulative. It is super- ficial and pointless to ask the quiestion whetlîer absolute uni- fornmitv is attainable. It ks superficial because the 'no cernent for uniforinitv of law (Ioes flot (lepen(l upon the ains%,.er to the question. I repeat that the value of the movemient restts Ipon the proposition that even partial uniforrnity is mnuch better than none. The question ks jointiess, Iecause there is no wav oif ,insweritng it except by actual trial. The trial inade hy t his hodl has, during its twenty odd years of existence, aisîveredl the qjuestion ernpliaticilly in the affirmative and in the (mnly W~aN In which it van be answere\u003cl. It cannot 4x answere\u003cl hy (liscussion, by arguaient oi oy \u003cebate. It an be answvered only iii pr:wI ice. 291",
         "292 CANADA Lwi JOURNAL. Ail reforma, to be of permanent value, depend upon the breadth of vision with which they are approached. Provincialistn and narrow-mindedness sbould be given no place in the mincis of those who are cbarged wkith the duty of simplifying, unifying and clarifying law. Special enactmnents procured by special interests, intricacies of proredure which have grown up by inadvertence. and which have outgrown their usefulness, if thev ever had any, divergences in iaws of various jurisdictions when the conditions are eenalythe same, and where what is good and salutary for one jurisdiction is equally good and saluL'rv for the other, may be readi)y eliminated if the %iew of those who undertake the work is sufficiently coniprehensive. We, in the United States, have heen at work against no inconsiderable odds to establisb this lreadth of vicw. 1 would sav that we have sueceeded in biinging into existence a new kipd of mind, which I wculd desig- nate as the \" interstate mind \"-thet is to -;ay, the mind capable of grasping the mutual needs ami rights of ail the states at once. Similarly. you have dernonstrated vour possession of that k-ind of mind which 's capable of grasping the mutiîal needs and rights of nations, and this is well cailed the \"international mind.\" Ail praisc. to you for its cultivation. Wce are jealoiîsiNy coxnpeting with Nvon iu the cultivation of that kWnd of minc, and voil MaN be sure that M-e shali omit no effort te at least keep abreast witi you in this friendly rivalry. Whcther there be reciprocit:. betweep yeiir cou nitry and ours with regard to mnaterial thing: and commercial transactions i, of littie or no importance. Tile thing which is of the utznost iriportance, howe\\er, is that there shall be r?,ciprocitv of intel- lectual fellowship, of hrotherly love, and of legai and spiritual ideals. These things are not inatters of geography. They are miatters of humnanity. Canada and the United States are flot realms hounded by imaginary lines, but they are peoples, un- bounded in capacity for affection, for attainnients, for influées. fc. visions for the good of mankind. ('onsidered ini ternis of ipfluence. of ger.ius., of aspirations for better things, there art, n hojunds to any country. Canada is r At so much a place, a namne, a thing, a country, as -it is a spirit. So looked at, ('anaddi and the Vnited States are one ani thù sainc.",
         "PUBLIC WRONG .XND PRIVATE ACTIONS. 293 1 give you, then, my themne, and it is: The international minc; reciprocity of kindred ideals; uniformnity of aims; brotherhood of sentiment; coimon ambitions to ixnprove aur race.\" PUBLIC WRONG AND PRIVA TE ACý\"ONýS. 1 have been much interested in an article under the above heading in the February nan.b)er of The Harrard Latr Magazine, by Mr. Ezra Riplcy Thayer. The sperial matter discussed in this article is the conduct of an action claiming compensation for injury caused by breach of a criminal statute; or, consideration of the law of negligen,ýe in relation to criminal legisiation. The former being a branch of the law whichi is constantly before the courts, I trust the learned wrîter wvill not take amisýs -orne friendlv criticism of a portion of bis article. '.\\r. Thaver treats bis suibjeet under two heads, liarely. legisiation prohibiting som-ething and legisiation einsOf- thing to be donc. W'hal I have to say wiIl 1w confine\u003cl to the first branch. The article opens with thisz (pery: Wnîen (loes thc violation of a criminal statute or or(Iinance make the wrongdloer (ivilly resptns~i1)le? ,%I answer to that qîuestion would be--Violation of I legisiat ion direct îng sonietliing to be donc may, but Violation of legisiation prohibiting an act cannot produce civ il liability. MNy reason for tliis xvili appear Inter. I have no fault to find with the writer's rernarks on the law~ of negligence except ini one rvspoct. On thie trial of an action based on neglig-nco thie jury are frequently told, to enable tiieli to \u003clotermine whether or not the' defendant wvas guilty of negligence tu take as a test whiat an \"ordinary prudent inan- xoul dIo under the -arne conwlitioiîý. '.\\r. Thaver seemns to think that s;uch dlirection is apt to induce p(er1lexity and lead the jury to indulge in tlieor , andl make, or endeavour tu make. su1tle dlis- tinctions. 1 eannot sec it. Tlit' jury inust fin(], in order to cx- onerat e thie defendant, tlbat biis -onducet wis prudent unndur the",
         "294 CANADA LAW JOURNAL. circumstances and there is littie diftcrenoe betweén oubmitting to them the question \" Did the defendant act prudently? \" or the other question \"Would an 'or-Iinary prudentt man' have aeted as the defendant (Iid?- The article then proceeds to, deal with the question which mainlv interesýs me in bis discussion on the effect of prohihitory legislation on civil liability. The proposition whicb he argues out to his own satisfaction may be stat-ed thus: On the trial of an action for damages in consequence of injuries resulting from vio!ation of a prohibitive statute, the issue of negligence or no n.,ligence is settle-d h-y the statute and cannot be submitted to The example of such legisiat ion given by the writer is an away and injures the plaintiff. He asks-How does the hreaeh of the ordinance affect the owner's civil liability? Mr. Thayer says that to answer this question the first step is to construe the û-rdirianee \\vhich means ascertaining the evil it was airned at, as well as its scope and rneaning. I couldl agree with this if the proceedings were i'gainst the offender for violating the ordinance but in an action arising frorn commission of a prohîbited act why construe the legislation further than to ascertaiin that' it was prohibited? And what hearing can the object of the legisiation have upon the question whether or flot the plaintiff was injured through the defendiant's fault? I eonfess that 1 can se none. Tien w~e corne to the discussion of the proposition 1 have alreadv formulated, which is reasoned out in the article in the tollowing m!liiuer. If there were no statutory prohibition of Ieaving unhitchcd horses oti the highway the jury, on the trial of ar action hy a person injiired by a horse so left. coul(I not, acquit the defendant of negligence without saying that an \"ordinary prudent man would hr.vc left his horse unhitched under these circumstanceq;\" that the issup of negligence or no negligence is for the jury and the reasonableness of the defendant's conduct ivas thus iii the",
         "PUBLIC WRONG AND PRIVATE ACTONS. 295 eye oi the law an open question. Changing, then, the situation by the single circumstance of the ordinance, the argument is that leaving the issue of negligence or otherwise to the jury would enable them te find for the defendant which would miean that it was a prudent thing for hini to violate the ordinance; that it is \"'consistent with ordinary prudence for an individual to set his own opinion against the judgment authoritatively pronounced by constituted public autho-.ity.\" It follows, of course, that on this point of view such issue should not be suhmïtted. The first objection that 1 have to make f0 this reasoning is that, in one aspect at least. it is illogical. The write- at the out- set speaks of the confusion arising from the judicial diversitv of opinion as f0 a breach of a criîninal statute, some judges holding that it is negligence per se, others thaf it is onlv evidence of negligence. H1e apparently leaves it an open question, yet the above reasoning. My next objection is that thie r' asoning is based on di wrong view of the legislation whieh is treated as if if dealt in some way wçith the civil rights of persons using the highway. Thus when the writer savs that exonerating the defendant whose unhitched horse has caused injury from the consequences. is equivalent to sav- ing that if i: \"consistent with ordinarv prudence for an individuai to set his own opinion against the judgment '' of the legisiatuire lit, implies thiat the legîsiature has (leclared t-hat lcaving an u- hitchied horse on the h-*ghwav is not ''consistent with ordinar-, prudence. Now where dors hi, find suchi (claration mn the or(linavce lie (el('i1 with«? H-e says if ks found in tlic cvii dit which the ordinance is aimed. nmemly, the peril to persons using flic highway fromi lorses at large. But the ordinance does not create the peril. Leaving a liorse frce froin cont roi is a (langer to persons uising flic bigliway wlîether forhihlen hv iawv or not and is none the more, dangeroits l)e(atise for'tùlcnei. Mr. T'liavcr'- reasoning must tiien lea\u003cl to this conclusionm, thaf in a case wlierc th(. art catising injury is ncsri wgligence, %hct lier ii wvas or wvas not forbidden b)y law, flis sue of negligemîce or noi' egligencre shotild liot lie left f0 the jur.. I As fo the position thaf hreacli of t he stafute constitutes",
         "296 CANADA LAW J0URNMAL. negligence per se 1 might quote the following sentence in the judgment of Lord Atkinson speaking for the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council in McA ipine v. The Grand TrunkRy. Co. (1913) A.C. 838. At page 846 hie says: \"Where a statutory duty is imposed upon a railway company in the nature of a duty to take precautions for the safety of persons lawfully travelling in its carriages, crossing its line or frequenting its premises, it will be responsible in damages to a member of any one of these classes who is injured by its negligent omission to discharge or secure the discharge of that duty properly, but the injury rnust be caused by the negligence of the company or its servants.\" Lord Atkinson evidently did not think that the breach of the statutory duty was negligence per se. At the beginning of this paper 1 said that I would give my- reasons for the opinion that legisiation directing an act to be donc might, but that prohibiting an act could not, produce civil liability. 1 now proceed to do so. One of the essential elements of the Law of Negligence is, that the person causing injury must owe a duty to the person injured. That duty is, I think, entirely expressed in the legal maxim sic utere tuo ut alienum non loedas. Then legislation directing something to be donc may create a duty the non-observ- ance of which may produce civil liability. To take the example suggcsted by Mr. Thayer in the second part of his article, a municipal ordinance compels every householder to remove the snow from the sidewalk in front of his premises. At common law the householder was not charged with the duty of keeping the sidewalk free from danger to pedestnians; by the ordinance hie is and a person injured by neglect of that duty bas a remedy by action. But by a statute or ordinance prohibiting something rio duty is created. In the case of the ordinance as tg unhitced horses the duty existed when it was enacted. According to the above maxim the owner of a horse must use it so as not to injure others. C. H. MASTERS.",
         "-q ~ SA\\ýER TRFAVMENT OF MENTA'L DEFECTS4. 297 SANER TIIEATMENT 0F MIENTAL DEFECTS. An effort in the above direction bas, in England, resulted in legisiation on the subject -'which has preduced the 'Mental De- - ficiency Act, just coming into operation. The necessity for the rare of the feeble-minded has recei'ved A some attention in this country but there had been no legisiation on the subject until tle last session of the Ontario Legisiature, when the Industrial Refuge Art, 1913, was passe(l. That Act and the Auxiliarv ('lasses Art, just introdued, mnav be faken as indirating that Ontario is in the lead of the inotker counitrv. T'he Auxiliarv Classes Art of Ontario is certainl «v advanwed legislation along modern lnes for social iniproveient. The Board of E(ulîîatof in anv ritv. mav hereafter establish and vonduct ( lasses for backward clîiPdren Up) to the age of '-I %.cars. ia'- acquire a site andl erert suitable b)uildlings for scIWoI andl resi(lence, mav estallsh rourses of instruct ion for mental anid physical developinent of those sent to such an institutio'n, and MaY appoint stueh teachers, attendants and1 :perial inistruct(tors as î1îaY be requiredl. liver sinve ('onfederat ion thle dmitv of each Province io rare for t hose %vho are cert ifie(l to be insane lias bven recogni z-d. and the Provinres have.mnade- provision iii this regard. Ini O ntario thlic is an exrrlleni SYsteiii of Provincial Hlospîtais for i lie Insane under thle direcl ion of the Provincial Sevretarv. Th e Lugisiature 'ý'thlut Province svral rvars ago pLire(l on t 1w, St atte Boîok an Ar-t kniowN-i a'ý Thle flouses, of Refugo AXct bY whlich Ii cto and maintenance )f a House of Refuge iii every * vuntry bevanie imiperat ive. If sncb an Act Liad nîot 1 een J)as\"i(l thle roinities womîld bave ben sloiw t\u003c) inove in th li iattcr and I lle splendid -vst eni of ( omity flouses of Refuge froni one end of thle I\u003eroviiwe to tîme ot ber wvoull miot to-day be iii existence. Plroîrdiý ' y if thle Logislatutres w'ould take nip thle ç ii ioni of the rare, of mental defect ives in sncb a way as to rmler it miulryfar every Vounty oir separatod vit *N or town to provile for its fel-mnr limier a similar syst en to t bat ofl thle Co(itiit HouseC'5 of Refuge, Canîmada inigh t lea I w t h t his quest ion :î \u003c ng th lin es whihare",
         "'I 298 CANADA LAW JOURNAL. fir.ding support in oth'-: countries. There seems to be littie use merc-ly urging that something should be done. The Legislature will have to say it must be done or there is little hope of our being as progressive in this as it is in other social reforms. The recent legislation in England is referred to by The Times as follows: j; \"The 'Mental Deficiency Act came into operat ioni on Wednes- dav in England and Wales, and ncxt rnonth a similar measure takes effeet in Scotland. The Act is second ;.- importance to none placed in recent times upi)n the Statute book. It gives effect, with some variations, to the recommendations of a remarkably strong C~rJ(ommission originally appointcd in 1904. Its, report revcaled a condition of extreine gravitl-, alike in tou-n and eountrv districts. 1~..'We find large numbers of persons who are c-omnîitfed to prisons for reppated offences whi h, being the mian)ifest at ions ofa permanent defect of mind, there is no hiope of rcpressing, muci] I Y less of stoppî'ig, bv short punitive sentences. We find luiiatic asvlums crowded with patients wno dIo not require the carefuil hospital treatment that we11-tqiplpedl asylums iioi- afford, and who might be treated ini inany other w avs more eco-oiiallv andJ as efficiently. We find], also. at large in the p)opuilationi mainv mental]v idefective persons-adits, vou'ig persons, andl (hildren- 1; ~ ~~~who ire, some in one waN. sonie in 'ohr mp eo ef J control. and ivho are therefore exp)ose(« to constant moral danger themsclv-es, and becoine the souirce of lasting injury to the con,- niunit v., t ~.It îs this large iiseiiancous class, otsiý,l' the narrow andl *aniticlu.tedl diviions of the insane known to the Common Laiv, andl uîprovided for by lhe lunacY jurisdiction of ('banccryv, which the iiew statute sccks 10 proteet. and to control for the henefit of those unifortuniates themselvPs, as well a-, for that of others. Power is given to place an idliot or inibccile in an institution . a 1. the instance of parents or guardians; and tbis inay l\u003ee dene at the instance of a parent in the case of a ' c tv\u003cnot an id'.ot or imbecile, if under 21 yeurs. To lirevelît possible abuses, the certificates of twvo diilY qutalified( medical practitioners are rcqiuîred,",
         "SANER TREATM ENT 0F MENTAL DEFEÇTS. 299 and in the case of those who are flot idiots or imbeciles a certificate must be signed, aftcr inquiry, by a 'judicial authority' as defined by section 19 of the Act. It may be set in motion by a petition at the instance of any relative or friend of the 'defective' or by an officer of the local authority (that is, the county or borough council); and pre ýautions are \u002baken to guard agairrt an ortier being obtaincd uipon insufficient evidence or for some sinister objeet. Very oflen mental infirmity cornes to lighit in the course of criminal proceedings, ïi. which case the Judge himself may take action; lie mnay direct an inquiry, o\u003er he may make such order ns thle j u(icial aut hori ty under t le Avt would have made. The work- ing of one section in this connection will need to be carefulir, watched 'wliere it appears to the police authority that ans- person chargcd with an offence ils a defective, thev shiah communicate with the local aliti-ority, andl it shal, he the duty of the police n thoritv to bring before the 'ourt such evidence as to bis mnenta' condition as max' be -availqble.' Thîe gov erning body or central authoritv is a Board of Cont roI co-',sisting of not more than 15 members, invested with large powers as to the supervision protection, anti control of 'de- fectives' : as te, the administration by local authorities of their functions: and also as to certifving and inspectilig institutions and bones for (lefect ives.' Upon ths\u003e county an(l bor-ough councils (assisted 1w the loc dt education autboritv) devolve the dutv of aspertamnîng %vbat 1personis within tlheir areas are deI(fec(tivt,' anid providing suitable accommodation for them. Pi-actically the local administration will bc in the bauds of 'the cominittee for the care of the dlefective,' composcd partly of members of the council, but strengthened by outsiders having special knowledge and experience of 'd .ectives.' We have said iiothing as to the important changes effectedý hyv the new Act in the criminal law rclating to 'clcfecti'ce-.' It is enough here to say that, for the first timne fromn Wednesday last effect, is given to the principle that persons who cannot take a part in the struggle of liTe, whether they have or have not propcrty, whether they have or have not, committcd crime, are to be pro- terted !) h tte against themselves and others. For the first",
         ".300 CANADA LAW JOURtNA'L Il time, too, il may be said, enlightened medical opinion bas obtained a recognition on the Statute-' Dok of the modern scientific view as 8 to insanitv and mental infirmitv.\" THîE JUDICIAL .SYSTEM 0F SOUTH AFRICA. Information on this sulbjCct is obvious1y of interest to us in the Dominion of Canada. We gladly, therefore, give our renders the benefit of a paper by Mr. S~. B. Kitchin. advocate. of Kimberly. South Africa. He ii-rites as follows:- 4! \"Fo- judicial purposus South Africa may be said tc include the Union of South Africa (consisting of the C'ape of Good Hope. Ni.tal, Orange Free State and Transvaal Prvne)and the separate ccilony of Southern Rhodesia. WVith the ex~ception of the native protectorates. wvhieh are under Imperial administra- ion. and where. a.; a rule. native lawvs aind customns are in force, the conmmon liv of Soutb Afriva froin Caine Point to tile Zambesi ~f' is the Iloran-Dutch Law as it was al the tine (if the annexation of the Clape in 1800. iodifled h-, locail judivial (ICcisiofls and statutes. (A this body of k9yv, wliieb waVdS first introdured int Sou'h Africa ]w thie Diîîteh tie at the, Cape iii the sýixteent il centurv, Lord De Villiers, ('J., has r'aiul: 'Tbev are not to bca found in ian%-d or aut lient ic dlocument i to whirh easyý reference vait lie made. and il is often onlv through t ajudicial derision upon a dîsputed quest ionI of la z bat the I ~ Legisiature becorne. aivare of thle existence of a partietilar !aw. The conclusion at which 1 have arrived as to the ohligatory the British occupation iii 1806. nav lwriefl stated. The presumption is ii bat vry one of thIe'se laws, if riot rcpcaled bw tbe local Legislature, is stili in force. Tispresuimption ivili Il flnot. bowever, l)I'tvail iii regard to qnv rule of laws which is iii- consistent witb Southi African usages. The best proof of sucb j usage is furni.shed 1w unoverrifeci judhii \u003clecisions. In the abseýnce of such decisions the Court rnav takie judicial notice of any general custom wbhich is not only' ivell establisbied but rea-",
         "TEIE JUDICILL _SYSTEM OP SiOI'Tif IC :301 sonable in itself. An'v Duteh Iaw which is inconsistent with such well-established apd reasonable custom, and lias not, ai- thougli relating to matters of frequent occurrence. been distinctlv recognized andl acted upon iw the Suprerne Court, may fairlv he held to h ive been abrogated by disuse.' This dic-iim has been charactcrized as 'a \u003eoId decision,' but it may be regarded as authoritative, and may serve to indi- cate the difficulties of admiinistering the' law and the important discretion which the judges have in declaring it. The hulk of the law ii; containcdi in the writings. in Latin or Dutch. of author- aties such a.; Voet and Grotius. and in the placaats or statutes passcd in HoIlan1 mainlv about the tirne of the Reformation. Occasionallv t le gal ani lay worli is startled by the uneat-t ing. byatoIariîed judge. of some long-forgotten placant or manuscrilit. and the band o\u003ef the dlock of justice is put back acrordinglv. The legisIature becomes awire. but does nothing. Such antiquarian escapades., however, though disconcerting, are fortainateIv rare, ani the judges, have held the telescope to their bhinà eve. generally 1)referring to administer justice in accord- ance witlî moderri ideas. t4) i pedantic adherence to the ietter of the written law of mediaeval Holland. The doctrine (if stare deci.ris, on the whloie. prevails. ami thus hy a steady streamn of decisions. the aw wlieh i., as flexible as the Engiish law, has beca moulded into a mure n.odlerin form. The basis of the law is the civil law ani Germanic tristoms. In the reîxxrtcd cases, Story occupies -an hionorab)le place with Pothier and the Roman- Dutch writers such as, Grrotius, Voet, Van Der Linden and Vani Leeuwerf. The general Iaw is mrnuh akin to that of Seatland. In the early rep)orts. referenes tu Svuttisli alithorities are fre- quent. Trhe influence of the Engiih law is due to the frequent citation of English text-writers and reports, especially the re- ports of the Privv (ouncil which are binding. The statute Iaw lias been largely taken from that of England. Trhe law of crimes, contract, tort, evidence and insurance differs lit tic from that of England ami America. T îe marriage law favours the liberty ami equalityl of spouses more than that of England, The Deeds Registry, iniported from Holiand, faciii-",
         "3012 CA~NA UAW JOURALiM. tates b.usiness. There is no Statute of Frauds, except ini Natal, tbough ini the Transvaal Orange Free State agreements for the sale of fxed property must be in writimg signed by tLe par-ties or their a-ýnta. There is n law of primogeniture or anvy remnant of the feudal system in the law of property. The highest court is the Appellate Division of the Suprenie Court of South Mirica, which is the final court of appeal for the Union and Southern Rhodesia. There is, however, a right of appeal froni the decisions of this court to the Judicial Comnmittee of the Privv Council on leave being given by that Committee, a right wbich lias not been exercised since the Union in 1910. The Appellate Division is a strong court consisting of a chief justice and two ordinary judges of appeal, who, when flot cccupied in this Division, pursue their ýjrdinary duties iii a Local or Provin- t cial Division. Southern Rhndesia is not reprezwnted on the bench of this court, though there is nothing to prevent one of its judges being appointed, if so desired. On\u003e the hearing o~f appeals froni a court consisting of two or more judges, five judges of appeul forin a quorum; but in appeals froni a single Judge, the quorum is three. Appeals znay be mad? froni any divisional court, except from orders made on miotion or as to costs. %where. however, an appeal lie-, by consent of parties. In criminal mat- ters there is no appenl froni the flnding of a jury, but oniv on legal points or irregularitie-- appearing in the procedure or enf the record. The Appellate Division also hc-ars appeals froni the Nat ive High Court of Natal. The process of this court extends and is executable throughout the Union. I\"pon this court (le- %\"cN-PQ the important work of wifinig the divergen.t decisiurîs of the various provinces, so far as such unification i., possible hy, a non-legisative body. This is gcnerally regarded as (,ne of its most important functicns an(l in one case a long series of Natal decisions was upset and an ol\u003cl Cape decision followed which was readdas bigmore iii cofriy th the ol\u003cl text-writers. t lith teexception ofafwconsolidating statutes dealing mainlI' with adminiistration, thic leg'ilature, smnce the Union, lias shirked the essential duty of codification. The administration of justice iii South Mfrica is more uniforîn than its law, and is Iargply",
         "THE. JCDICIÂL SYMME OP SOUTH \u003eFRIÇ..0 based upoiù thdt of England with a few important modifications. ThisI u-iiformity is due, to the fact that thc Cape system, basr sprcad to the remaining parts of South Africa. CIVIL JURI5DICTION. The inferior courts are those of magistrates, known inS outhemn lihodesia as resident magistrates. The rnagistrate is generallyI at the same time \u0026 fiscal officiai known as the civil commissioner. He is a civil servant, bis only legal qualification as a rule being that hie must have passed an examinat ion on the eh ments of law equi,-a1ent to the attorney's examinatien (for the more important appointments an examination t, iivalent to the 'legrec of Ba.chelor of Laws is a recorrmendtion, but is flot essen- t.al. Onlv occasionally is a legal practitioner appointed to this post. M-\\agistrates gcnerally receive their appointments ccceord- ing tý) senioritv: and a man who lias spent veers in a financial dcpartmnent mav find himisi-f called upon to administer, as a inagistrate, an abstru.se and cornplicated system of law. aîded by aui iradequate ........y. Th e only stlution is codification and the appointment of magistrates who have had an adequate legal or juiial.9 training. The magistrate resides iu his diýtrict. and1 lLoids his court, which is a court of record, iit the principal town and a periodical court in olitling parts of his (listriet. li some of the larger towns there art- sev,.ral magistrat(,-. T'he n'.gistratc's jurisdietion is lirnited hy the ainotunt siwd for, výrving in the differcat province, and colonies, and flot ex- eeeding two hundred and fiftv pounds in illiqui1 ani fiv' iindred p-oundsz in liqiiid cases. WVithin this limit the m.egi.strat(\u003e ha's jtirî.hIcticii in ail causes cxccpt whcre the validitv of a wvill or the titie to land, teiiernents, fees, (tesor offices is in questicn, or wherehv right.9 in futur(- eau 1w bound (e. g., matrimonial rights). As a nIle lie cannot grant sperific rerformance. Dutics corresponding to diose of tlrt --heriff arc exercised by the messenger of the court. Froin the magistrato\u0026s court there is au appe.a! to the 1 ocal and Provincial Divisions in civil and criminal cases, on the law and facts, ani îAe saperior courts have the power to re- vîew the proceeding, of %il inferior courts, including liccnsing ani assessment courts.",
         "304 CANADA LAW JOURNAL. The High Court of Southern Rhodesia consists of two judgcs, one at Salisbury and the other at Bulwayo, each with concurrent jurisdiction. The suitor has the choice of forum. Ore of these judges travels on circuit twice a year. Thc Suprenie Court of South Africa consists of the Appellate Division and the Local anci Provincial Divisions. The Cape Provincial Division (formerly the Supreime Court of the Cape of Good Hope) sits at Cape Town, and has an originat and appellate jurisdiction over the Cape Province. At present there are fiv' judges of this Division, ivho ,,it either as singl.-jt'dige couis or as three-judge courts. In the Cape Province there are also the Eastern Districts Local Divisin (formerlv the Eastern Districts Court) at Grahamstown, whichi t consists of threr judges who niay sit as~single-judge or three-judge courts'. an(l the Griqualand West Local Division (formerly the I High Court of Griqualand) which at present has one judge aI Kimberlv. The Natal Provinciâl Division, at 'Maritzburg, cou- Il sists of tliree judges. There is also a single-\u003eudge couirt iwhich :;i1: at Durban, Natal, and is callcd a C'ircuit Court. Tbe Orange 1! Free State Provincial Division, at Biocmfontein, consists of thrce judges. In the Transvaal Frovineiai Diîson (formerly Transvaal S-uprerne Çoix-t\u003e. nt Pretoria, there are five judges. This, Court sits as a three-judge court. The Witwatersiaiid Local Division (forrnerlv Transvaal High Cou- h' nt Johannesburg, Tran.svaal, is .9 one-judge court. One of the judges of each Provincial Division is known as the Judge President And, except in appeals froin a Local Divi- sion or a single-judge court when thrcr' juulgcs must sit, anv tiio judges of a division form a qi.orum. In appeals f rom magis- trates' -oui-ts to the Provincial Divisions, as a rule at least two judges sit together. The various Provincial and Local D)ivisions and the High Court of Southern Rhodesia have jurisdiction over ail persons residing anld being in their respective areas, and aIl causes whatsocver, including cases in which the gov'erment is a party and those in which the validitY of a statute is called iii question. Whcre a cause arises or a person resides in the area of a Local Divisiog, the action miay be ini cither the Provinc'ial or Local Division at the option of the plaintiff, and a case which",
         "THE .11*D!CI.L SYSTEM 0F SOUTH AFRIC:A. 305 has been commenced in one court may be remnoved to another court which has jurisdiction. Twice a year s*-aglc-judges from, rnost of the centres travel on circuits and have 9!1 the powers of a Provincial or Local Division of the Supreme Court, civil and criminal, vjithin the ares, of the circuit districts which are fixe-d 1w the Governor-Ge-icral. This same officiai appoints and removes the judges of the Supreme Court of the Union. Judicial appointments in the Union cease when the judge reaches the age of seventy-five vears (except in the case of judges appointed berore the Union, who are appointed for life). The salaries of judges are fixed hv Parliament. An elaborate pension scheme allows of the retire- ment of jud\u003cges at the age of sixtv-five years after ten v-ears .ervice. The (lovernor-General ham power to remove judges, of the Union on an addreis- froin both Il1ouses of Parliament in the sane session praving for such removal on the ground of bis Go-ve-nior-G'eneýral-in-Couincil. i., the C'ahinet. Ir \"outhern hihodesia appointments are made by th'ý Administrator. Opinion ini S.outhi Africa is divided ns to whether the superior courts of original jurisdietion should sit as single judges c'r as three-ju\u003clge courts. The prartice -:aries in the different provinces of the Union as it did before the Union. As Liai 1w jury in sorne provinces is rare and means additional expense and prohablv less satisfaction tio ail concerne\u003c. the old practice of t 9 or three judg(s sitting together cortmend.3 itself to the lay and legal mind. There a:e flot a few who would extend this practice to criminal 'natters, especially in cases in whichi aboriginal natives and coloured persons (wvho do not sit on juries) are, concernd. In Southirn lihodesia there is a special jury panel for the trial of cases of assaults; by natives on white women. In ail the courtýs, exeept iii certain criminal cases concerning chî!dren in the Union, ail trials must take place in open court and evidence must 1w given Lil'a tiice. CRIMINAL JURISDIflTION. The foundation of the procedure in crimiruaI cases was laid bu a Scottsh judge, specially appointcd for ti -it purpose as a I Y!",
         "1 306 cANADA LAw joURnxAL. judge of the Cape Colony eariy in the nineteenth oentury. The summary jurisdiction of magistrates la limited au to the amou'it of punîshrnent. This does not, ais à rule, exceed a fine of ten pounds or inpriaonment for three months, and on secind con- viction, thirty-six lashes. In some remote parts wherc there is no xnagistiacy, the work of the magistrate la done by a special justice of the peace who has sinilar powers, though 8omewhat limited. The magistrate, in some of the provinces and colonies, holds inque6ts in the case cf fires and murder, and forwards the papers to the Attorney-Generai, who may take action, if so ad- vised. In serious crimes or where the magitrate in the course of a sumrnary trial considers the offence to be of a serious nature, a preparatory (or prelixninary) examination is takien by the magistrate who either discharges the accused or commits hlm for trial. He sends the depositions to the Attorney-General or Solicitor-General of the Province, who :s a permanent Union officiai. The Attorney-General who bas also the power of originating or taking up prosecutions at any stage before a final acquittai. if he decides to prosecute, remits the case to the magistrate who after hearing ail the evidence bas the power of final acquittai or conviction. The magistrate in remitted cases has power by I statute to pass a sentence not exceeding two years, ur a fine of one h'indred pounds or thirty-six lashes. If the Attorney- Generai, on reading the depcsitions, decides that the case is one which ought to bc tried by a judge or jury, he indicts and prose- I cutes either in person or by deputy at the criminal sessions or circuit court, The right of trial by jury is in thc discretion of the Attorney-General in ail provinces except Natal, where a prisoner in a remittcd casc has thc right to insist _upo:i being tried by a judge and jury. Thc Attorney-General rannot remit a case in wbich the only punishment is death or. ln Natal, in cases of murder, rape or treason (whý'h are punishabie by deeth ln ail parts o'. South Africa). A jury consists of rifle men. Th2 il priso-ner bas the right of three peremptory ch.ýlenges, and aiy number for cause shown, but challenges arc raiely exercised. The ordinary mode of prosecution is at the instance of the",
         "THE Jt DICIAL SYSTEM 0P SrILTR AIUC\u0026. .307 'Irown, through the Attorney-General in the superior courýs, and tnrough the police in the inferior courts. A private person may prosecute if he is able to show that he has suffered some injury in consequence of the commission of the offence. If he proBecutes in a superior cour--, he must produce a noUe pTo\u0026'AJUi from the Attorney-General, and enter into a recognizance to pro- ceed to the final determination of the trial. The Attorney-General inay take Up the prosecution of siich a case at any stage of the proceedings. Private prosecutions, however, are practically unkjiown. In the conduct of civil and criminal trials the procedure and practice are very sixuilar to that of England, and rules of court are made fromn tinie to time by the whole body of judges, regu- lating the procedure and practice in the var-lous couits. The English and Dutch languagcs are on an equal footing, though in the large preponderance of cases the English language is the forensic medium. The general machinery of justice in the Union is under the supervision of the Minister cf Justice, who is a member of the Cabinet. The practitioners in the inferior courts are generally attorneys and law agents, although advocates (harristers) have the right of audience. In the superior courts advocates alone have the right of audience on behaîf of a client, instructed by an attorney, as in England. Wornep, are not allowed to practise as advocates, attorneys, notaries or conveyancers. The fees of ail practitioners, save where a specifirn agreement is made, are subject to detailcd taxation by an officiai. There is an extensive system of in forma pau peris prar'tice. In crirninal cases, wher- ever death is a penalty, the judge has the power of as.signing cou--sel who defend-3 pro deo for a nominal fee paid by the Crown. In civil cases in whieh either of the partiès tcoes flot possess more than ten pounds, if an Advocate certifies that there 's pro- babili8 causa, the court, on application\u003e assigns as advocatce and attorney, who givé their services gratuitously. The judgrs arc appointed from thc merubers of the Bar. Both the magistrates and the judgos navc always been dist.inguisbed for tixat impartiality and independence which is characteristip, of",
         "308 CANADA LAW JOURNAL. the British administration of justice. The extra remuneration of judges who are appointtd on non-judicial commissions wus for- bidden by the Cape Charter of Justice, but statutory provision has 8,nce been macde for such remuneration. Th'ere is too grpat a terdency to appoint judges on such commissions, but this may be due co the fact that it is flot easy to obtain impartial men for such work, and is in itself a tribute to their impartiality In a country like South Africa, where Jegisiation is slow, and not always in the direction of progress, the task of improving the substantive and adjective law devolves Iargely upon the judiciary. It is to their excellent work, and principally to the long and untiring efforth of the present Chief Justice, Lord De Villiers, that the taw and practice of the Roxnan,-Dutch sy'%tem in the various parts of South Africa bas been evolved into a com- paratively uniforrn and efficient organ for the even distribution of justice according to the needs of modern society. Codifica- tion, Ws'ich must corne, is al] that is required to (omplete the fabric.\" It has been stated by a journal publishied in New York that 3.50,000 persons were freed frorn the inanacles of matrimony lasi vear in the United States. Pivorce is an easy matter in inost of the States of the Union, but a judge in Brooklyn gives a further suggestion, which lias already been acted on. A man was con victed for murder in the second degree and sentenced to life irnprisonmcnt. Hie ivas subsequently pardoned, but his wife, desiring a change of masters, applieci for a marr.age license on th- ground that her husband was lcgaliy dead, and tfhat therefore she- had a riglit to marry agaîn. This contention was uphelhi by the judge and a license was issued accordingly. Whilst this gives further. racilities for getting rid of marriage tics, it will add but littie to these automatic divorces, for, though muir- cler are manir in the United States, convictions are fewv.",
         "ENOLISH CASES. :309 RE VIE W 0F CURRENT ENGLLSH CASES.î (Registered in accordance with the Copyright Art.) DEED-CONSTRUCTION- .riTLE-LEAsE-MiNEs AND MIN ERALS -CONVEYANCE 0F REVERSION-SEVERA.ACE 0F MINERALS- RE-nT1-AppoRTi0NUENT-S-ZTATJTE 0F LiMITATIoNs, 1\u002633 (3-4 W. 4, c. 27), s. 9-(R. S. 0. c. 75, s. 6 [L51). Mitchell v. Mcýîey (1914) 1 Ch. 438. This is an important de- cision under the St.tte of Limitations. in 1740 the defendant's predecessors in titk! granted to a coal company a leuse of the coal under certain laiîds for a tcrm -f 200 years at a specified rent dependent on the itiount of coal extracted. By two indenture; dated in 1791, ùihe d'fenidant's prede-cessors in title conveved to the plaintiff's predecessors in titie pcrtions of the land; neither of these conveyances excepted the minerais and no mention of the~ lease of 1740 was made except in the covenant against, inctim- brances from the operation of which it wvas excepted. In 1828 part of the land comprissed in the deeds of 1791 iverc reconveyed ta the defendant's then prederessor in title and in exehange he granted ta the plaintifl's then predecessors in title certain other parts of the lands to which the minerais in the lease were sub- jacent. This deed dit] not except the minerais. The 'lefendant and bis predtecessors in title had always reeived the' wliole of th(, rents as they accrued (lue un(ier the icase and had. nevcr accounted for ainy part thereof ta the plaintiff or anv of his l)rc(ecessors in titie. The present act.on was br-ougbt ta recover the plainitif,'-, share of the rent as part owncr of the reversion in the leise. The defendant contended (1) that the reversion of minerais expectant on the -termination of the lease was not compriscd in the conxey- ances up.dcr which the plaint iff elaimned; (2) that the rcîit was not ap)portionable; (3) that the plaii.tiff's dlaim wvas barred by the Statute of Limitations, 1833, s. 9, (R.8.0. c. 75, s. 6(5).) Eve, J., who tried the action, negat ived eaeh of these contention., an(I his decison 'vas affirmed by the Court of Appt'al (C'ozens-Harnlv, M.R., anid Eady and Phillimore, L..J.) The Master of the Halls points out that tirie only persons who cauld receive the rent wvcre the lessors and thrir suuceessors, ami consequently there never was anyN wrongful receipt.; the plaintiff and ber predecessors weee entitled to their proportion of the rent from time to tine received, and the Statute of Liin-tations, thougli not a bar to the action, wvas a bar ta the plaint iff recovvring more than six years arrears prior Io action.",
         "I 310 CAINADA LAW JOURNAL. SHIPPING-REGISTERED SHIP-SALE 0P SIIIP-CONTRACT TO CIVE DELIVERY oRDRR FOR sHIP-BILL 0F SALE-MERCHANT SHIP- ixG ACT, 1894 (57-58 VICT., C. 60), s8. 24, 530. j Manchester Ship Canal Co. v. Ilorlock (1914) 1 Ch. 453. The plaintiffs under the statutory powers of the Merchants Shipping Act, 1894, s. 530, had raised a vessel which had sunk in their canal and patched it Up and thereupon sold it to the defendant. The contract contained the printed words \"the seller will deliver to the purch8.ser a legal bill of sale of the vessel,\" but the words \" legal bill of sale \" had been struck out and the words \" de- livery order for\" substituted. The defendant on coming to com- plete his contract claimed that notwithstanding the striking out of the wvords above mentioned, hie was entitled to demand and i receive a tegal bill of sale in order to get himself registered as owner. The plaintiffs contended that in the circumstances the vessel tnust be regarded as a constructive total loss, that a new register should be opcned, and the old register was in fact closed at the instigation of the company, and thereafter the plaintiffs offered ýlie defendant a bill of sale which lie refused to accept because the plaintiff had caused the register to be elosed and lie would be put to extra expense t0 open another. Eve, J., who tried t he action, heki that th- defendant's dlaim. was well founded, that the change in the wordin- of the contract did not exonerate the plaintiffs fromn giving a bill of sale as required by s. 24 of the Act. The action therefore 1 -tiled. RESTRAINT 0F TRADE-CONTRAC r' 0F SERV-ICE-ACHEEMEDT NOT TO F.XGAGE IN SIMILAILnt WITHIN TEN MILES-RESTRIC- TION FOR LIFE-RASONABLENESS 0F RESTRICTION. Eastes v. Russ (1914) 1 Ch. 468. This is another action to cen- force a covenpnt, bY an employee not t0 engage in similar work to that of bis employer within ten miles of the plaintiff's place of business. In 1912 the defendant's employnxent by thec plaintiff easged, and shortly aftrwards the defendant set up a similar business, namely, that of bacteriological microscopiat, within hailf a mile of the plaintiff. Sargant, J., who tried the action, construed the restriction to apply merely during the continuance of the employment, but the Court of Appeal (Cozens-Hardy, M. R., and Eady and Phillimore, L.JJ.) dîsagreed with him on that point and held that the rkstrietion lasted during the whole of the de- .1 fendant's life; but they also held that it was widcr than was necessary for the plaintiff's reaspiiable protection, sD that in the resuit thec judgment of Sargatr, J., was affirmed for other rensons t han lie gave.",
         "ENGLISH CASES.31 COMPANY--PREFERENCE 8HARES-OItDINARY SHAREs-DISTRI- BUTION 0F PROFITS-RIOHTS 0F DIFFERENT CLASSES 0F SHAREHOLDERS INTER SE. 4 Will v. United Lankat Plantations Co. (1914) A.C. Il. This was an appeal from the decision of the Court of Appeal (1912), Joyce, J. The simple question was whether shares entitled to Cha7 ntdat o.4,p 0)rvrigajdmn f,1 cumulative preferential dividend of 10 per cent. per annum, in priority to ordinary shares, were entitled also to participate further in the profits cf the company available for dividends. The Court of Appeal held that they were not entitled to anything more than the 10 per cent. and the 1-jouse of Lords, Lord Haldane, L.C., and Lords Loreburn, Kinnear and Atkinson affirmed the decision. MORTGAGE-COLLATERAL AG-REEMENÇT-CLOG. ON REDEMPTION- WHETHER COLLATERAL AGREEMENT ENFORCEABLE AFTER RE- DEMPTION. Kregliinqer v. Nce Patagonia M1. it C. S. Co. (1914) A.C. 25. The law relating to niortgages has undergone considerable change 1,*v reason of the repeal of the usury laws, and thc doctrines of equity which, in conformity to those laws, had imposed restric- tions on 9, mortgagee stipulating for any other advantage than interest on bis money, have had to be modificd so that, although an tiptilation for more than interest wvas forînerly void in equity, a cllaera adantgemay now be stipulated for by a mortgagee, provided that he dops not act unfairly or aggrcssivcly, and pro- vided that the bargain dors flot make the security irrecdeemable, or restriet or elog the right to redcemn. So that it is now no longer truc, as was said in Jeniniings v. TV'ard, 2 Vern. 520, \" that a man shall not have intercst for his nionev and a collateral advantage l)eside the boan of it.\" The Lord Chancellor points out, that as stattutes are altere(l or niodified. thc- rules of equity which have heen framed wîth regard to themn, must also needs be modified; the jurisdiction of equity being of an elastie character. In the present case the mortgagees had stiptulated at the time of making the loan, which was secured by a fioating charge on the mort- gagee's undcrtaking (the- mortgagor being a limited company), that the mortgagor shouil not for a period of five vears from that date seli sheepskins to %n.-, person other Yhan the mortgagees, so long a,; the latter wvere wilhing to buy at the best price offered by an ' other per3on, an(. that the mortgagor should pay to the mortgagees a commission on ail sheepskins sold hy the rnortgagor, 4I",
         "CANADA LAW JOURNAL. to any other person during the five years. The loan was paid off before the five years had elapsed, and the question was whether this collateral agreement could nevertheless be still enforced, and the House of Lords (Lord Haldane, L.C., and Lords Halsbury, Atkinson, Mersey and Parker) were unanimous that it could, and the judgment of the Court of Appeal to the contrary was therefore reversed. In Biggs v. Hoddinott (1898) 2 Ch. 307, it had been decided that such a stipulation was good during the contin- uance of the security, and this case therefore not only affirms that decision, but decides that redemption does not put an end to such agreements. HIGHwAY-DEDICATION-DEPOSITED PLAN-USER BY PUBLIC- ADJOINING OWNER-RIGHT OF ACCESS TO HIGHWAY. Rowley v. Tottenham (1914) A.C. 95. This was an appeal from a decision of the Court of Appeal (1912), 2 Ch. 633 (noted ante vol. 49, p. 107). The action was brought by a municipal body to restrain the obstruction of a highway by the defendants. The facts were briefly, that the defendant had laid out a building estate and deposited a plan thereof with the plaintiffs, on which the road in question was indicated as being forty feet wide. One half of the road was thereafter made up and metalled by the de- fendant, the other half was left as a foot path. Thereafter the public used the road and as a rule preferred the metalled part. The plaintiffs owned property ablitting on the unmetalled side of the road and opened an entrance therefrom into the highway, which the defendant obstructed. The Court of Appeal affirmed the decision of Joyce, J., that there had been a sufficient and ef- fective dedication of the road as a highway, and that the plain- tiffs were entitled to access thereto as claimed, and the House öf Lords (Lords Dunedin, Atkinson, Parker and Sumner) have now affirmed their decision. MORTGAGE-PAYMENT OF MORTGAGE-RECONvEYANCE AND NEW MORTGAGE WITHOUT NOTICE OF INTERMEDIATE MORTGAGE- MERGER-PRIORITY. Whiteley v. Delaney (1914) A.C. 132. This was an appeal from a decision of the Court of Appeal in Manks v. Whiteley (1912) 1 Ch. 735 (noted ante vol. 48, p. 454), in which Moulton, L.J., dissented from the other members of the Court and our sugges- tion that his was the better opinion has turned out to be correct, for the House of Lords (Lord Haldane, L.C., and Lords Kinnear, Dunedin and Atkinson) have reversed the judgment of the Court",
         "ENL1 _AES of Appeal. The facts were, that two mortgages were in existence on certain propert3 and Wbiteley purchased the eqîîity without notice of the second mortgage. fie then borrowed money from, ore Farrar, to pay off the first mortgage, the intention being that Farrar sbould stand in the place of the first mortgagcc, but the solicitor, in or(ler to carry out thc transaction, took a reconvey- ance to Whiteley fromn the first mortgagce and Wbiteley then gave a irortgage to Farrffr to secure the advance. The Court of Appeal beld that this mode of earrying out the transaction liad the cifeet of clearing off the first mortgagc for the benefit of the sccondl mortgagee, who tbcrchy becamc entitle(l to prioriiv over Farrar, but their Lordsliips beld that the second mortgagee wvas flot cntitled f0 priority claimed, because, owing to a comnmon mîstake induced by the mortgagor in concealing flhc existence of the second mortgagc, ftbe deeds 1,etwecn Whiteloy and Farrar (lid not carry out the truc intention, whieh wvas that Farriar should bave a first, mortgage out the properf v an(l fbat tbe documnents could bave been rectified in thîs action to carry out tbc truc intent of the partics if that relief liad been elaîmied: but that in such circumstances ai court of eoiuitv could not, in favour of a mere volunteer, enforce a rigbt based upon (leeds framed ura com- mon rnistake and(, secon\u003clly, 1)ecause Farrar, having in equit y acquircd flic priorif y of tbe. first mortgagee hy paying off bis debt and ob)taîîiinig thle t1e(: h fi second mortgagee (0111( flot, take advantage of flie wrolig of tbe nîortgagor, througl wloio be claiîned to (leprive Farrar of that 1)riority. CAN.ADA-LEGJSI-L.\u0026TIVF AU'i-,itoitii()T F PROVINCIAL u.EGISIATuîîÏ,- FisHîNoc IGUTS IN TII)AL, OP NAVIGABLE NO\u003c)N-TID.XI milS- IIAILWAY I3ELT- TEîîîuIroRIAî. WAT'rES. AftOlCI-('flrCIl BX.v.t to?'ci-iie-(;,eral, Cim. (191-1) A.C. 153. The judicial commit tee of f lie PrivY Coiincil (Lords Halane, L\u0026XC, Atkinson anîd 'Moult on) determîine t bat fisbin.g riglîts in the tidal, or navig~able non-tialI rivers, wvît lin te icalwvay nbelt of the Province of British ( olaîniia are îîot wiît Ion the legislative con- trol of the Proivinceial Legislaturie, but, initier t1li 13.N.A. Acf, ss. 91, 92, lot), are xvithlii the velusiveý (ont roi of t lie Domninion Parliqiîncîit. Th'le tonti uiit ti, also ltr iitbat t he Provincial Legisla\u002bure bas nîo autl -X( over rigbt so (ifisîiig iii thl( scaor arms of the sea and estuairie, of rîi'ers Ilowing itito flic sea, and tbat, tbe rigît, to fislî ii flie sea iloes uiot \u003clepend on any îiglbt of the Crown in the subjacent lanid. Their lordsbinR also infîmate fliat tlîe quîestion its hi flic riglits (if flic Crom-i i. the terrifoîy lying",
         "Fr - _ t! I I ] I 314CAVNADA L.%W TOURNAL. between the Iow water mark and the three miles iimit from the coast, is a question which belongs flot to municipal law alone, and that it is not at present desirable that any municipal tribunal should pronounce upon it. REVENUE-SUCCEýSSIO.Ný Dt7TIW.-PROUN.ICE 0F QriEnEC-POWERS 0F PROVINCIAL LEGISLATURFE-LEIS\u00264TIVE JURISDICTIONV OVER PROPERTY OUTSIDE 0F PROVINCE-DiREc-\" TA4x.ATION ULTRA VIRE-S-CODE CIN IL ARITS. 1191f B AND\u003e 1191 c-B.N.A. Ac'r, s. 92. Cotton v. The King î 1914) A.C. 176. is a most important de- liverance of the Judicial 'oinniîtee of the Pr;vy Council as to the powers of Provincial ' eg;s1atures to impose taxes, and the property iniresgpect of wieh îihev mayvbe imposcd. The litigation consisted of bonds, debentures: andI slmrps of industrial cornpanies and otlmer movable propertv locailv \u003eituate in the U nited States, she being, at the tine tif lier death. lorniciled in Quehec. After certain specifi. bequecsts she gave tl ) residue of ber estate to her husband. At the time of lier decath the onfly Successýion Dutv' Act then in force iii the Province, C'ode Civil, s. 1191b, provided that, \"al transmissions owing to death, of the propertv iii usufruet and enjoyment of, nîovmbic' and iimmnovab!e property in the Pros'in ce, shail be liable to the followving taxes\" etc., ctc. The Govern- t ment of Quebec claimed and reùtiue froroi Henry Cotton succes- sion duty at the statutorY rate upofl the wlicie net nropertv paýs- ing under the wiii of lus 'vife. After lier (leath the Code was amended by s. 1191c, wluich provided that, \"'the word 'property' within the îneaning of this, svrtion shall include ail property. w4\u003ether movabie or inimovable, actually situate or owing within the Province,(, wlie.licr ilhe deceased mit the time of his death had hip domicie whin 'r wit!iout theProv'ince, or whcther thedeb ispaybl wiiii orwitou th Prvineand ivhefher the transmrissýion takes pi'itbin or mwitbout flic Provinre, and ail mnovables, wlihe\"er situlate, of prnshav'iig their domicile (or residing) in fiae Province of Quebee mit thete of fInir death.'' Atter this i.imendmnitn, le(nrv (ýotton (lied and the Provincial Government ciainied froni bis txecitors statutory hîties on the whole net property p\u0026ssing un(ler ihis ivili. The executors9 broughit 'ia petitior of -ight elimring ,Q .4192 anud interest, being the aggrc-",
         "L'NGLISH AIE- 3~15 gate amount of succession duties paid in respet of the estates of Charlotte and Henry C'otton for movable property locally situated outaide the Province. Malouin, J., wbo tried the petition, held that the petitioners wcrc entitled to the amount claimed -because the Province had no right to tax movable property outside the limits o! the Province. On appeal the Ki.ng's Bench thought that the debts should bc deducted from the total assets and flot merely from ihose in the Province and with that variation the judgment (,I Mi4louin, J., was afirmed. The Crown appealed, and the executors as to the modiffication cross appealed froin that decision to the Supreme Court of Canada. The appeal of the Crown was allowed by the Supreme Court of Canada, so, far as the geate of Henry Hi. Cotton was concerned, but disniissed as regards the estate of Charlotte Cotton-, and the cross appeal as to the modification was dismissed; 45 S.C.R. 469. The majority of the judges of the Supreme Court thought that the effect of the change made in the law as to the meaning of \" property \" was to render property outside the jurisdlietion taxable, and they thought the princîple meobilia sc'quidur personam rendered such property subject tu Provincial jurisdiction. Davies and Anglin, JJ., were in favour of dismissing the appeal as to both estates. The Crown appeiled so far as the estate of Charlotte was con- cerned and -tle executurs appealed as regards the estate of Henry. The judgment of the Judicial ('omnmittee ( Lordl Haldane, L.C., and Lords Atkinson and M,\\ouilt.on) is delivered hy Lord Moulton. Wiih regard to the appeal of the ('rown. lie says, no question as to the applicability of the prinviphc miobili sequnter arises, bie- cause at the tinie Cfi-irlotte dm1d the Jaiv in force ws expressly limited to property in the I\u003erovinre, and eveni if the Province haà the right to tax prol\u003eerty situate l)evon(l its territorial limits, it in factdidinot do so. Ergot tie appeal Io' itle Crown ivas dismissed. As regards the( :ipeal of thie excriut(rs. lie wvas of the opinion that the amen(lment of the law liad n haul the (iffeet which the mna- jority of the judges of the Suprtenu Court of ('aniada supposed. Lt had extended, the iiieiining of prpet '1 include property out of the juiri-uIietioni, but itl had iiot extended the operative clause b)y siriking out froin s. 1 191b. tlie words \"in the Province,'' whîchi still liinited thle ehîss of l:.r(mprty stuhjeetedl tu taxation. His Lordship) points ouit ilît reallY t lie mn:en de nothing to the mieaning of the word b'lr~I(t eratuse it ilreadv(i had thr, meaniflg wlii h the ami-ndinig statute purports to give it,, and the faet of it having this iiede ieainiii i carlior Act, tendcd to empîmasize the limitat ion of the operatîvp clause to property Within thje 1ProVince-; .111I to I li suggestion that tIlle defilnit ion 'I I i 'I *1 .M.Mý",
         "316 C-ND LtW JLWaNAL I could only ha' e heen inserted in the Act tû indicate the propert-y on which taxes were to lie levied, he answered that it miglit beý referable to other provisions of the Act which require declaration sucsinuyfdsussteino~n usin hteto be made as to the property of the deccased. But hi-, Lordship succ-ffon utyof he -indýmpsed)ýytheAetin question is withmn the conipetence of a Provincial Legisiature, and lie cornes to the conclusion that it is not, because such Legis- lettres can only impose \"dýrect taxation.\" Applving the prior decisions of the Board as to the rneaning of \"direct taxation\" in the B.Ný%.A. Act, the conclusion is rieaclied that the tax in ques- tLon is \"indirect taxation,*\" hecause under the Act the tax is psy- abie not by the per.son who is intended or desired shou]d psy it, but by pe rsns in the ý,xpectation and intention that they shall indemnifv theniselves therefor at the expense of anothe-r. Is is pointed out, thert, is nothing in Quebue law answering to our pro- bate of uils, bu. the t'l.x is payable by the person r-king a declar- I ation as t'ý, the prc(ucrty of the deceaswd, who may lx' a notarv before whoni the will was exeiited. who is obviouslv flot intended ta bt-ar the tax hirnself. but to obtain inde(mxitvN therefor from 'tome other ç'orrons interestvd in the e.state. Thé appeal o! the eXe- cutors v.as allowted and thr- appval of tlhc (?rowai was disrnisseid. The impoxrtanc, (if the case must be our apotogv for 5(1 lengthr a note. j TîtEsP.ss-Jt-, T-EltTlJ--Ti-tlER U1\u003cGHTS IN 'MININ; .ND-E I FENDANTS RYFIiVINî; 1RINFFIT OF T1I\u003eI'ASS--I 1 i ÇcATION iOF ACT OF INDEPEN!)ENT CONTIIA(ýTo)n-COINN TîM..îc:i Ac-v I ÇR.S. 1897, c. 32\u003e -ý. 1, 2 -NE;AcT \u003cB.S.\u003c). 1897, c. 36), ss. 39, 40. I Eastern Construclion Co'. v. National Truet Co. (1 914) A.C. 197. This was an action broughit liv the plaiint iffs, a.s the oiviers of a 'À rninng location, ziaii!st the appellaflts and a firni of Miller \u0026 Dickson, to recover damiages for cuttiing and carrying away a quantity of pine timiber fron1 the plaýiintiffs' mining location. The construction carflany had a license uinder 1.S.0. 1897, c. 32, to eut tiuber on certain lands, but not those of the plaintifis'. The company employedl Miller \u0026 1ickson ta eut the timber to which they were entitlcd un'ler thvir license, and that firm pro- cceded f0 carry out ils commission, but, in doing so, withotit. ally authority or direction frorn the construction conpanv, ett ile timber on the plaint iffs' landl iii re.spect of which the action ws brought. T1he t;mber eut was inimufartured into tics and de- t'Fý77e-'- - - - ' . ý ý -o-UM",
         "ENGLISH CASES. livered by Miller \u0026 Dickson, in performance of a contract therefor made by the construction company. On February 24th, Miller \u0026 Dickson were notified by the Crown timber agent to desist, but they had then removed all but a very few ties. On March 6, 1909, the Crown gave the construction company permission to remove the remaining ties and they were charged the usual dues in respect of all timber cut by Miller \u0026 Dickson, including that cut on the plaintiffs' land. The plaintiffs did not demand the return of the ties. By the Mines Act the property in all pine, trees on the lands subject of a patent or lease, is reserved to the Crown who may grant licenses to cut them, the patentee or lessee, however, having the right to cut them for mining purposes or for clearing the land for cultivation. The judge at the trial found that the timber on the mining location of the plaintiff would not have been sufficient for the requirements of any mines which might thereafter be made or worked on such location, and that the construction company when informed of the taking of the tim- ber had adopted the act and had the benefit of the timber so taken, and were therefore liable to the plaintiffs. The Court of Appeal reversed his decision and the Supreme Court of Canada restored it. The Judicial Committee (Lords Atkinson, Moulton and Park- er) now reverse the Supreme Court and restore the judgment of the Court of Appeal, their Lordships holding that the property in the timber in question was under the Mines Act vested in the Crown, both before and after it was felled, that if the plaintiffs had any right of action it would be merely as bailees of the Crown and would be accountable to the Crown for the damages, if any, recovered; but here, before action, the Crown had clothed the wrongdoer with the ownership and therefore the plaintiffs could not recover in respect of the pine trees; but as to tamarack trees cut on the plaintiffs' location their Lordships thought the plain- tiffs might have some claim, and ordered the defendants to pay the costs of the trial, provided the plaintiffs made no further claim in respect of such tamarack trees.",
         "C.%N ADA LAW JUUVRNL. REPORTS AND NOTES 0F CASES. Momiîiion of Canaba. EXCHEQUER COURT. Audette, J-1 Biiociu i% THE Krc.. [March 12. ivegligence-Goetwniment railwayý-itnjury 10 the person-Trespasser -Liability. B., in going towards a station of the Intercolonial Railway. inste.ad of using a sale public way or road thereto, entered, con- trary to the pro-,isions of s. 78 of the Governiment Railways Act, upon the track of the railway, tci awing hehind him a small sled containing two valises. It was dusk at the time, but there wL 3-light enough for him to sec, as he did, a train approaching him. This train c, asisted of a locomotive and tender, with a snow-plough attached. B.. instead of getting out of the way as soon as he saw the train. attempted to pick up one of th;e valises that had fallen from the sled, an art which rendped it too late for himn to escape being struck by the train. Upon the trial of bis petition of right for damages, it appeare(l that the suppliant liad at the tirne an uî±reduced fracture cf the right leg, which imupeded his inx t.On the other hand, tht' Inet that the place wherc the accident happcned being a \"thicklv peoplcd district\" witlom the of\"n~gn s. 3.1 of thc ,nid Art, was not established beyond que!ttion;, nor wa;, it shewn con- clusivcly that the tra'k there was not properly fenced. The engine-driver had cornplicd with ail stattitory requireinents as to whistle and bell, ami his train was running at a rate of about twelve to fifteen miles an hour. lie did not sec B. on the track until he was some fifteeî-t feet from. iso, atnd the emcrgency brakes were at once applied. Held, that, inasmuchi as B. ias a treslpas-ser xithe track, the only duty cast upon the vngînr-driver ivas to al)stain fromn wilfully injuring B. whilv so trispa-,siing, and, further, that, mnas- much as the engine-driver had applicd the emcrgency brakes as soon as he saw B. on the track, he had (lone ail he could to avoid the accident, and there ivas fn negligence attributable to hira. O'Iircady and Panpidon, solicitors for suppliant. J. B. L. Mo! reau, solicitor for defcndlant.",
         "Audette, J.] [March 2.5. IN THE MK,,rrER 0F THE PETITION oF RIGHT 0F ALExis BRtILLANT. Negligence--Gorernment railway-Crossing-Omission by railway employees Io comply writiJ eqirements of sec. 37 of the Govern- ment Railway Adi-Faute commune. B., the suppliant, in the afternoon of a clear minter day, was driving a horse attached to a double sleigh a!ong a road crossed by the Intercolonial Ilailway. He was followed by bis son, aged eleven, who was drîving a horse attached to a small single sleigh. The view of the track en the north-eastern side, until arriving- withîn 25 feet of it, was obstructed by wood-piles. After passing the wood-pilcs, B. looked to the south-west to sec if any train w-as ciming dowýn, but did flot look in the opposite direction, i.e., frorn whichi a train was coming. When he was in thýc act of crossing the track. lic heard the alarm signa! o! a train coming upon Lim from the north-east at about thirty ta forty feet away; then, but flot lx4ore, the enginie-driver sounded an alarm signal. B., by urging bis horse. was just able' to clear die train, but the boy ivas unable to stop his horse and sleighi, with the resuit that the train struck tlîem. killing the horse, smashing the sleigh and sevcrely injuring the suppliant s son. The train hands had omitted ta -oun(l the whistlc and ring the bell on the approachi to the crossing, as provided by se. 37 of the Governmnt Bailways Act. IJcld, that the proximate or deterrnining cause of the acci- denit was the negligent omission. of the railway employecs to comply witli the provisions o! the said section; but., inasmuch as the conduet o! B. in flot looking bath ways betore vntering upon the Irack, while flot contributing to thc proxirnate or deter- mining cause of the accident. yet amouinted to negligence justify- ing th- application of tlii iloctrie of faute conem under the law of Quehec. 2. Thnt, upon the facts, the suppliant wvas entitle(l to recover against the Crown, under sec. 20 of the Exchequer Court Act, sucb daniages as might, be fixed conformal Ia thie above-mien- tioned doctrine, having regard to t he nature aud extent of the niegligeiice of thfli eeie parties. 3. The doctrine of faute romm une (loes not obtain under the law o! Quel\u003eec where tlie claimant contril)utcs to the l)raxirnate or determîning cause of the :iccidlent. Pott.in and Laig1aiý', s~olicitors for suppliant. L. lérubé, salie j- tÀ)r for respomient. REPORTb R0~ AND -NOTLS 0OP ss..1",
         "A 'v h 320 CANADA Li1W JOURNAL. A-udctte, J.] BuRu v. Tup, KiNG. [March 28. Revemte-Cuetorns--Smu4ggling-Goods bdlonging ta another seized along irith smuggler's property-Rdecasc. Upon an application from the decision of the Minister of Custoins, under sec. 179 of the Customs Act, confirrning thc seizure of certain jeweIry simuggled by the claimant through the Customs at the port of Montircal, it was shcwn that four of the articles seized %vcre part of the persona] belongings of the claim\u0026nt's -wife, hb, xing been given to h-2r by ber father as a wedding present and entrustcd to the husband for safek-eeping merely. Hudd, that, in view of the provisions of sec. 180 of the C,.stomas Act, requiring the court to decide \"aecording to the right of the mat ter..\" such of the smuggled articles as belonged fo the claimant's Uife Shouid he reIease1 froin seimurp and restored to ber. Reg. v. Six Barrels of HIam, 3 AI]. N.B. 397, considered and not followed. The Dominion Bi~g Co. %-. Thc Qucen, 4 Ex.- C.B. 311, referred to. L. C.Mu\u003cnsolicitor for elaimant. H. J. T. Friheyi, solicitor for respondent. A1 ý!i.sory of Ih,'orce. B'V S B. KITCIIIN'. HA. 11. ('1pe Towvn: J. C. Juta C 'o. London: Chapman \u0026 liai!. Very irtcresting rvadînz. Thie c.hject of the ~;kis to explain hoiv tie extràoi-dinarv diversitv of laws i:id *)1inons ivhich exst in var;ous cointrwis as to divorce, (».i:\". nl)w.t, and to asci- tain theý prineip' -s whieh according to th( teaching of history oughit to he applied tro modern legislation on the subjert. The volume before uis wila a helpîn]i introdluetion to those wvho wish to studvy the suibjeet in grente' dJetai! or in relation to any par- tà-ulaî country. The volume shews grrat research and will be a ,~alti.9lle addiin tn all liliraries as w' know of no, otht'r b\u003eook wlir1b gives a concise atvl ,iinlle arcoun, of the lî~ovof divorce. The wrter moreo-ver gives bis information in an interesting and lucici manner. The typogra;hical execution is above the average. I"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "[Toronto : Canada Law Book Pub. Co., 1914]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly, 1915-1922.",
         "Monthly, 1868-1880",
         "Semimonthly (irregular), 1881-1914"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_04911",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_04911_821",
      "label" : "[Vol. 50, no. 9 (May 1, 1914)]",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_04911_821",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Law Library Microform Consortium."
      ]
   }
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "label" : "Vol. XIV. No. 2 (February, 1918.)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06922_94",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06922",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06922_94",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Vol. XIV. FEBRUARY, 1918 No. 2 or,.- W4 THE TRAPPER 1 I",
         "Foresters, Jittention! Have You Ever Seen a Robe Like this Before ? Noteihe Pure WoI Kersey Lining-the Cambric Partitions that contain the Eid er- \u003e.M~ down Filling and the Waterproofed \"llighWAtP0V#jI Count\" Shelter Tent Duck.- A great combination-absoltitely frost-proof-light as a feather and Iasting almost untîl the end of timne. You need one-you should have one. Send us your name for further inférmation. 0OTTA WA TORONTO Smuar- Woods, Liînited MNRA WINNIPEG THE UNIVERSITY 0F TORONTO AND UJNIVERSITY COLLEGE WITH WHICIL ARE FEDERATED VICTORiA, TRlNIT Y, ST. EICHAEL'S [NOX and lWYCLFFE FACULTIES 0F ARTS APPLIED SCIENCE MEDICINE EDUCATION HOUSEHOLD SCIENCE FORESTRY Fox further information, apply to the Registrar of the. University, or to tii, Secretarles of the. respective Faculties.",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal Vol. XIV. WOODSTOCK. ONT., FEBRUARY, 1918 No. 2 CONTENTS FOR FEBRUARY \"Guarding Forests by Airplanes\" by Major K. E. Kennedy, Royal Flying Corps. ..... . ............ ............ .1521 \"Get Out the Old Oak Stove\"-verses. ....... ..... .. 1520 \"How Uncle Sam Attacks the Wood Fuel Problem\" by A. F. Hawes, U. S. Department of Agriculture . . ......1525 New Brunswick Decides for New Forest Service... . . . . ........ 1530 In the Forests of France.................................1530 The Work of the Canadian Forestry AssocTation. . . ........ .... 1531 The Annual Meeting at Montreal.. . ..................... 1536 Forest Conference a Splendid Success....... ....... ......... 1539 A Swiss View of Overseas Axemen........ ................... 1541 M ore Letters from the Front... . ...... ................. .. 1544 The Woodlands Section of the C. P. P. A...... . ....... . ...... ..1541 The Canadian Forestry Journal will be sent to any address for one dollar a year, subscription including all other publications of the Cana- dian Forestry Association. Address all Communications Io THE CANADIAN FORESTRY JOURNAL 206-207 BOOTH BUILDING, OTTAWA Printed by the Rod and Gun Press. Woodstock. Ont. Entered at the Post Ofsce at Woodstook, OnL. as second-class rutter. '1.",
         "1520 Cet out the Old Oak stove. Dad, Crind up your axe for fun-, \u003cPut a bit of set in the old cross-cut And help to lick the Hun. Therc's a bug-killed hickory to use thîs year, If*s good as cool. or a blame sight near, And it's got a cracklc 1 like to hear;, Cet out the Old Oak stave. Cet out the Old Oak stove, Dad: »The trees we take for wood Had ought'a been cut long ago. To do the woodlot sood. We'l clean up ail the dead and down And selI a load. or two in town. Let wood help knock the Kaiser clown! Cet out the Old Oak stove. S. W. A. F. F. M. cr,,uo Co.nma N- Y.,ooet»t. o ~hU5Fuel -~t.~o Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 ~Ietoutth 014 Oiak StOV)e Get out the Old Oak stove, Dad, And set her in the room; The timne we spend a hauin* coal Is better spent near horne; There's dozens d' trees in the old South lot. Halfway dead and bound to rot. They'ýll make a fire bhisterin' bot; Cet out the Old Oakc stove. Get out the Old Oak stove, Dad, Let's quît a usin' coal; Our Uncle Sam can't get enough For ail, to sgve his soul; The les\u0026 we use, the mnore he'll gît, A usin'wood may beI'our bit To make the Kaiser throw a fit'. Cet out the Old Oak stove.",
         ";inadian Fortc.Yri Journal, F'briuaryi, 1918 12 Guarding Forests By Airpianes BY MAJOR K. E. KENNEDY, ROYAL I?'LYING CORPS In ai? A-ddress al Muilfre'al, Fehuri;l 81h, 1z'f ore (uebec Forest 1\u003eroi cive Ass'eocziion A Graphic Story 0f The Adaptability 0f Flying Machines to Forest Protection. You've got bo have-( an aeropflane of the righ ,t type, and a goo(l one of the right type Loo, because an aero- p)lane is just the same as anything else, you have to get a good one or you can count on A sorts of trouble. Now, suppose you have, say, a motor car costing f rom four to eiglit or ten thousand dollars, and in it you eau go Ilirougli any forest in the land at a clip of from 8\u003c) to 100 miles an hour, and at the same time you are able to see everythîng for 20 square miles or * more of the country, and every 'minute of the time keep absolutely in toucli with home by means of wireless, you would say, to put it mîIdly, that it is a mighty useful car, now wouldn't you? Indifférent Io Roads Take into consideration the fact that roads (or the Iack of them), ivers, lakes, precipices, and so forth, do0 fot inake one scrap of diflerence. Some ('Ur, doîî't vout think'? NNell, Ihat is what. you can do with your acroplane, and -vou cll dIo it in safety. You ('an go whýen an(l where yon like, andI corne back wvhen you fi S. It's a great game, 1 can tell von. The best of it is that the cost wilI only bu a very littie more than that incurred in buying a good car. (Applause). I think 1 ('an show you in figures just how it works ont, lut of course 1 speak now of the cost with re 'ference to a large way of operating. The small way is notthe cheap way, as you ail know. Take, for instance, a farmer with a ten acre plot; he does flot go to town in a c ,ar, lie docs flot use a tractor to plow, etc.; but the big farmer, with the big piece of land, does go to town in a fine big car, 1521",
         "122Clanadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 and does use a tracLor and all that sort of thing. He uses power right through the whole working 'of the place. It is just the same with acro- plane operations,-the bigger the field, the bigger the scale of operating, the Iower the cost. 8000 Miles a Day! I have taken as a basis six months' work, as 1 suppose you would flot need more than a six months' fire protective service out of the year. I' have counted on three aeropianes because it is always safer to have an extra one. You see you can count then on having two of them always ready for business, and the third one can be overhauled and repaired if necessary. Operating in a large way the ovcrhcad cost cornes down, so the larger the scale the better. Say that your machines will do five hours in the air per day. They can do more when necessary, but five hours up is a pretty good day's work. 0f course, over at the front the machines are somnetimes up for as long as 72 hours at a strctch, but that's pretty tough going and you won't want your fel- lows to, do that here. Now, with two machines working five hours .a day in the air you can examine closely 8,000 square miles easiiy. You could go over a lot more than that, but fying low to make a close examina- tion you can count on 8,000 square miles a day. You can sec ail over the country as if you were ini a high, tower, but you can move your towce' at wîll, as ît were. When you are flying pretty high you can sec trèm- endous distances. \"Pusher,\" Best Type For your work you would, want a slow Janding machine, say an aero- plane with floats -a hydro aeroplane. You' would want what wc cali a .\"pusher\", that is one with the pro- peller behind and the place for the pilot up in front wherc he could have an unobstructed, view. With any other type of machine you would find lgging and supports and ail sorts of things in the way and your. pilot Would bc twisting and squirming in his efforts to sec and he would have to be somewhat of a contortionist or an acrobat. Up there you are going at such a clip that while you are busy twisting your neck to sec around .a piece of rigging you will miss about twenty or thirty square miles of country without knowing it. In your work you wiil not be flying for speed, so I would advîse a slow flying, slow ianding type of machine. You cer- tainiy want a slow lander, for if you land too fast yoù generaily just keep on going until you bit, and then even though your machine stops you some- times are forced to go a bit further yourself before you make a landing. (Lau ghter). Fixing Machines in Fiyhi Another thing which has' to be taken into consideration is the gliding angle. A good machine will glide a long way without losing elevation. Say you have engine trouble; ail you have to do is adjust the angle and. let her glide while you fix your engine, then when the trouble is fixcd off you go again., It is also very important to get a standard type of machine, so that if parts wcar out or break you can send to the factory and get them without any delay:' and you can get a stock of spare parts too, and a spare part often cornes in mighty handy. This refers to the aeroplane itself as wcll as to the engine, of course, because you are apt to need ail sorts of littie things in con- nection with your acroplane. First Invesiments Now, to get down to costs: let us take three aeroplanes at $8,O each. You can get goodý ones for that, and acroplanes are like everything else, the behaviour corresponds to the cost. Well, three at $8,000,,that's $24,000 for*your machines. Then you wiIi want sheds. I don't kniow just what type you would use out here, but $ 1,000 would cover the cost 1 arn sure. That is a capital iflvestment of $2,5,000. Ten per cent. interest on your investmnent, distrihuted over the six months, or the timne in which you wilI do your wor'k, will be, Say $13-88 1522",
         "Can adian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 12 per dav. I arn working on the basis that every day for six months your planes will examine 8,000 square miles. You will need twvo or three mechanies, at four or five dollars a * day, sav three of them at four dollars a (lay; that will bu $12 a day for mechanies. Your pilots will be ex- pensive gentlemcn-vou'll have to pay them at Ieast $10 a day each, and you'll be Iucky to get them at that. you will have, to have two pilots. Now, two pilots, at, oh, -you'd l)utter say 83,500 a year each \u003cbecause vou have to pay thcm by the year whether voit like it or flot; will rncan. $7,00 a xear, or $38.88 per useful wvorkiîng dayv. Of course, you ('0111( put tlîem '4 shovelling coal, or some othcr such highly useful occupation, ini the six montlîs thev are not flying and lower tlîe cost that way, but if voit haven't anv work like that for thcm'you just have tu carry the gentlemen for six months out of the year in order to have them for the other six. So far the cost per day is $64.76, that is * taken on the basis of six months' work. Cosi of Flying \\V\\e must aIso, take into considera- tion the question of dupreciation and rel)alrs, and( that item (lepen(ls largely on the milcage flown, but you can sav-, 10 cents per mile for that and you'll l)u about right. Then you have your petrol and oil; that cost is less than a cent a mile,-quite a b)it less if vou have an uconomical engincer. You can count on $16.80 per day for î\u003eetrol and oil, for 800 linear miles llying. That means that thu total daily expen(liture for examîng 8,000 squiare miles every day for six months will l)e 210195 cents per square mile, Say 2 cents, or 20 cents per' linear mile voit fl'. 1 think these figures are fairlv accurate, and1 if they err at al it is onl the si(iu of beîng t(oo conser- vative. There are many w avs in which vou uniglît save. For instan('e, yoii have t() enhlloy thu pilot. all the year round-vou pay bim foir a vear and work hlm for six mon Lhs- but as I sai(l Meore, if you hiappen. 10 have anything cisc you can put him at vo a ave (1iite an item there. The Range of Vision One thing 1 am often asked is: -Can yen set what is going on from an acroplane-can you see anything much?\" That depcnds on what is going on down below. For instance, a fullowv Ilying over the line in France is keepîng lus uyes open for enemn 1523",
         "1524 Cnadian Foreslry Journal, February, 1918 planes; hie is dodging \"Archies' he is takîng photographs from which maps are made; sending wireless meesages back to lis headquarters;1 he rnay be dropping a fcw bombs here and there; and hie stili can see horses. carts, guns, trenches, etc., and takes the time to put down everything lie secs. Now, if lie can do this lie ouglit to be able to sec quite a bit of the country lie files over la peace time, don't you think? (Laugliter and applausie).- Wc fellows used to have great sport fiying low, about 200 feet above the ground, and taking pot shots at birds and rabbits and ail sorts of things, but wc killed off so many of thcm that the folks stopped us. You can take a pieée of white cloth a y'ard square and hide it, and l'Il guarancee to find it anywhere, from my machine, provided the troes are flot too thick. Coing for Eggs bjy Air i\\Ien, 1 tell you that with your Ianding grounds here, with your freedom from the Hun, a fellow, can do anyihi'ng; and tflen an acroplane is sucli a handy thing to have. (Laugliter). Wîhy, over there at the front when we'd corne down after a bard day's work we'd find perhaps that wve were snort of eggs for our supper. Awful state of affairs! Weil, we might know there were some albit further back, say three or four miles. What do wc do? iiop into a machine! off you go, get a couple of dozen eggs, and back you corne, ail in about a minute. You sec, if it had flot been for the aeroplane there would have been no eggs in the place. Oh yes,- aeroplanes can be made very useful! (Laughter). Using the Wireless in Aeroplanes As for the use of wîrclcss in acro- planes, wirelcss telcgraphy I mean: I had the plcasure of listening to Mr. Fletcher's very interesting re- marks on the subjcct today, and 1 only wish I could be permitted to supplement them. Great things are being donc \"over there,\" but wve can't talk about them. For instance, Mr. Fletcher spoke of the wirelcss telephone as being in its infancy. Weil, -ail 1 can say is that the child is growiNng very rapidly over there. 0f course, as 1 said, 1 cannot tell you, of the great strides being made in the use of varions wonderful inventions, which are being used at the front, but one phase of this question las just occurred to me xhich 1 amrnat liberty to mention. That is, the tuse of kite balloons, or sausages, as' we cali them. A man is sent upl several thousand feet in one of these kite balloons, and ancloyed. U p there lie can sec immense distances and spot any undue disturbance whicl miglit occur in the stretdli of country under observation; ie lias a wircless tele- phone, and hie can keep the ground staff posted ail hie lias to do is to phone down to lis companions. The man who is using wireless tclegraphy for bis messages has to use a great deal of discretion because his messages stand the chance of being interccptcd, or they may be subject to \"inter- ference.\" 0f course when lic is flying directly to orfromn lis station lie gets clearer messages. Thc -in- terference- I refer to is electrical interference, of which there is always a certain amount, and this îs a draw- back in theý use of wireiess tele- raphy. But the wireless telephone! clwe are going quite fast and doing. well w%,ith Pt. 1 cari say that mucli about it. (Applause). Surueys by MVotion 'Pictures There are ail sorts of possibilities in the use of aeropianes. For ini- stance, making surveys hy means of moving pictures. I've done it my- self; and you- can make a very, very accurate survey in this way. And just think of the number of people t 1524",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, Februar!j, 1918i 2 wvho would be able to visit otherwise inaccessible places in comfort and safety! Another developmcnt at the front is the transportation of injured men by means of aeroplanes. I suip- * p ose people are sometimes hurt in the woods, are they flot? WeIl, say a man is badly injured off in the forest, miles away from any place where he could receive care andl attention; ahl you have to do is to pop him into your aeoplane and take him out to the hospital. There is no jarring from rough roads, or anything of that sort, just a steady, even motion, and v'ou can imagine what a greatthing that would be for the chap who had been hurt. You could get him to the hospital in a very few minutes. There is no doubt at al], gentlemen, tra- velling by aeroplane is the most comfortable way in the workl. Carrying Food Another instance of the Lisefulness of acroplanes is that of the siege of Kut-el-amara. When t hat city wais besieged by the Turks food was taken in by means of aeroplanes, as you al know. 0f course they didn't get enoughi in, but thiat was not the fauit of the machines, it wvas because they didn't have enough of them. MR. FLETCHER: IIow much weight can you carry? MAJOR KENNED)Y: Well, I can take a machine, an ordinary machine which is not what would be con sidered up-to-date at alI, andl carry a ton wîth eomfort. (To be concluded in March issue). How IJncle Sam Attacks the Wood Fuel Problem By A. F. IIAWES United Sitates Deparinent of' Agriculture. Address givt'n ai Annuai Meeiing of Conadian Forestrii Association, Montreti, February 71h~, under tille TJhe WVood Fuel Camipaiqn ni the United States- Organizing ile Labor-Cut-a-Cord Clubs -Sawbuck Clubs For Boys. A Striking Article of Practical Suggestion. The fuel wood campaign in the United States is now assuming fairly large and definite proportions. It was started and is bcing conducted by the Department of Agriculture and the Fuel Administration co- operating, and has for its definite object the substitution of wood for coal just as far as is practicable. It * s not expected that the use of wood in the cities will be materîily in- creased; or thal the railroads wili bc burdened with wood since it is more bulky than coal. in proportion to its heating value. Neither is there any objeet in substituting wood in the viciniity of coal mines. Teamn-hauled wood should replace railroad-hauled coal as far as pQssible. Farmers and other woodland owners throughout eastern United States have gradually drifted into the use of coal while plenty of wood ini tlieir own wood- land went to waste. This practice should be discouraged. Villages and small cities in the vicînity o' wood- lands can greatly increase their use of wood. In a fcw cases cities of moder- ate size may be supplied by wood hauled l)y auto truck or by water. The coal shortage on January 1, 1918, was estimated at 5(Ï,000,000 tons. Assuming a cord of wood on an average equal in its heating capacity to two-thirds of a ton of coal, an înereased cut 'oh' 75,000,000 cords would be necessary to meet Ibis de- hiciency. 1525",
         "1526 Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 Since the present estimate of cord- wood eut in United States is 100,000,- 000 cords this means an increase of 75 per cent. in the output of cord- wood over the normal annual con- sumption. Those responsible for the movement will be welI satisfied, be- cause of the shortage of labor, if an inecase of 25 per cent. can be ob- tained the present year. How il is Organized The method of organizing the wood fuel campaign lias varied somewhat in the various States, but in almost cvery State where progress lias been made the Federal Fuel Administra- tor of the State has appointed a Wood Fuel Committee to direct the move- ment. This Committee usually con- sists of the Fuel Administrator as Chairman, the Director of Extension at the Agricultural College, the Chair- man of the State Council of De- fense, the State Forester. or Pro- fessor of Forestry at the Agricultural College. In some States this State Committee lias in turn appointed County Committees. In nearlv al cases the work in the county is car- ried on joîntly by the County Fuel Administrator and the County Agri- cultural Agent. The methods of conducting the campaign have been along the follow- ing general liues: 1. Publicity aloug two liues to popularize the use of wood by con- sumers; and to encourage the pro- duction of wood by woodland owners. This lias been donc through.the new%ýs- papers. posters, movies, the pulpit, the schools and in other ways. An attractive, though too detailed, post- er lias' been used through New England. 2. Stimulating production 1w guar- anteeing a market for the product. The price of wood varies greatly in differcut parts of the country accord- ing to the price Of coal; from $5 to $6 a corrl in the viciuity of the soft coal mines of Missouri, and Illinois to $15 to $18 in the cities of New Euglaud. Under the former conditions prac- tically nothing is allowed for stump- age, and there is little incentive to cut. Where the very high prices obtain on the other hand no one will burn wood or even order it so long as any coal is obtainable. In view of the disas.- trous resuit of fixing a maximum price for coal it lias not been thought best to establish any such price for wood. Unless there is an embargo on shipping coal into wooded dis- tricts, woodland owners are naturally afraid of an over-production of wood and a consequent drop in the price. This conservation, especially on the part of farmers, must be met by some method of guaranteeing a market for wood at a remunerative price. Several methods are being worked out in the various States. The safety of ail of them rests upon the fact that the Fuel Administrator may exclude coal if hie sees fit and thus maintain the value of the wood. The Plan in Maine In Maine the local committee lias made a careful canvass of the pos- sible consumners to determine how mucli wood could be disposed of at a defrnite price. The plan is to allot these individual orders to the various farmers in the region. In this way the committee acts as a cleàring house to bring producer and consumer to- gether. In Tennessee and New Hampshire the matter has been handled some- what differently by the formation of War Fuel Companies. A few public-spirited citizens get together and form a company to buy wood and selI it either at cost or at a price sufficient to give themn a 6 per cent. profit. Municipal Yards Besi The best method of guaranteeing a market is tindoubtedly through the establishment of municipal wood yards. More progress along this line lias been made in the South than in the North. For example, a number of cities in Georgia have prevented much suffering among the poor by estab1ishing municipal wood yards. In Athens the local fuel administra- tion lias set a price of $6 a cord for pine delivered, and $7 for hardwood. In North Garolina at least twenty cities and towns now have municipal wood yards in operation. Detailed f0 1526",
         "Can adian Forestry Journal, Febru«ry, 1918 12 information regarding one of thiese. that of Durham, N.C., may bw ol interest. The management of th( fuelwood situation lies in the hand,ý of a committec of thrcee anc from th( ü cty goverilment, one from the countý Wc ommissioners, and the secretarv oý the Chamber of Commerce. A wooc yard, adjacent to the railroad tracks wvas purchased by the city, and th\u003c former owner was retained as manageý at $100 per month. The yard i: equipped with two electrically-driver circular eut-off saws and a splittiîý machine. About 60 cords of wood cai be reduced from 8 f t. lengths t( stavewood per day. The wood come largely froam farmers' woodland nearby and is green pine and oak, eu in 8 ft. lengths, and split in halve or quarters. The price piled in th, woods is $3.50 per cord. It is haule( from the woods ta, the roadside b. six county teams driven by convietç and there is piled in a long rick, fron which it is loaded on ta motor trucksý Three trucks are in use, two thrce * t on trucks belonging ta the county and a 5-ton truc k belonging to, th, city. The trucks make four trips day, the distance being 2Y2 La 3 mileE and carry about one cord per tan a rated capacity; making a total dailF delivery af ail of them about 4, cords. The cost of hau-lîng is aboti $1 per cord. The estimated cost c sawîng ta stove Iength is 50 cents t 75 cents per cord. It is sold at $ per cord on the yard, or $7 deliverc It is intended to run the yard at casi and the prices may be reduced Iatei The City plans ta buy 6,000 cords c standing timber at 50 cents per cor ta, be eut and hauled by canviet an city labor. The estimated cost this wood \"fitted\" for deliver is as follows:. Stumpage.........$ . * Cutting and splitting.......C Ilauling. ......... .........1.U Sawiîng to stave lengths ......... Cost on yard ...............$ 3.' , Why a Mlunicipal Yard? There are twa sound arguments fi the establishiment of municipal wo( yad.The first is that it offers ti best way af guaranteeing a market for a large amaunt of wvood at a uni- form prire and thus stimulates Ipro- (luction. The second is that when proJ)erIy handled it furnishes an in- 7suran.'e against a serions coal short- f age. Such a wood yard should not 1 bc handlcd as an ordinary b)usiness with the idea of keepîng the minimum allowable stock on hand. There r should be a definite plan ai main- s taining a suffîcient supply of waod ta i relieve any unforeseen coal shortage. SThis amouint wvîll naturally vary with i local conditions. It hias been sug- ) gested that this reserve should equal s 10 per cent. of the fuel ordinarily s used in the town or city. On this t basis a town which uses 10.000 tons s of coal would need a wood reserve e equivalent ta 1,000) tons, or about i 1,500 cords ai wood. To supply this ~'at $8 per cord would require a work- ing capital af $12,000. i The question has been raised whether the possession ai such a wood -fuel reserve wauld flot mitigate against a community in the eyes of e the Federal Adminîstrator and in- a vite an embargo on coal ta that ,cammunity. This can be aîiswered ,f in the negative. The fact is that the y' Administrators in certain States, t) notably Indiana and Missouri, are t already discriminating against xvell- ,f wooded regions, and Ibis mýay be done o ýmore wvidely next winter. Sucli a 6 community whieh has a wood fuel I. reserve will therefore have a great ,advantage over one similarly situated but without anc. if Organi-ing Idie Lubor d The methads described above arc d aimed ta bring about an inereased )f sale ai wood. Much wood can un- Y doubtedly alsa be produced by the consumners themselves and con- ,0 siderable has been dane toward bring- 0 ing this about. 10 Prof essional and business men '5 have already been mobilized in sonie -sections to work Saturday afternoofls !a and holidays cutting wood. In Massachusetts a movement has been r organized to form \"Cut-A-Cord )d Clubs.\" Various colleges encouraged le their faculty and students ta do work .ýà_ 1527",
         "1528 Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 of this kind during the Christmas holidays. In Indiana the boys in some of the rural schools have or- ganized \"Sawbuck Clubs.\" In Connecticut wood cutting bees are being organized, in some cases by the town selectmen. The town buys stumpage at $1 per cord and pays the men $2.50 per cord for cutting. This wood is kept as a reserve for the relief of the poor. Millworkers are being greatly helped in their fuel problem in some cities, through the co-operation of the employers, who have arranged for the purchase of stumpage from nearby woodland owners. In one town near Wor- cester, Mass., millworkers have been putting. in Sundays cutting wood which was, offered them at a low price. An effort has been made throughout Massachiusetts to mob- ilize the labor thrown out of em- ployment on heatless Mondays for the cutting of wood. It has been pointed out that a man can easily cut enough wood on Monday to keep his family warmi for a week. Forcstry and Wood Fuel It is important that a nation-wide campaign of this kind looking toward the greater production of wvood fuel should 1W conducted along the lines of true conservation. It is therefore particularly fortu nate that th( cam- paign lias been directed from thé start îy the U. S. Forest Service. Probably the greatest obstacle to the r ractice of forestry on this continent lias beeri the lack of a market for the poorer material of the forcst. While the straight, sound trees oif thew more important species have been steadily increasing in value, those unfit for lumber have remained ai, practically the same Iow value. In fact in many sections cordwood lias been less valu- able during the last derade than fifty vears p reviously when the rural popLi- lation xvas greater; when people re- lied entirely on wood as fuel;, and when railroad locomotives l)urned w'ood. In order to make the practice of silviculture possible it is important to have a profitable market for these 10w grade woods. It is the splendid market which lias prevailed in Europe even for branch wood that hias made such an intensive forestry possible. The present fuel emergency. by giv- ing a mucli better market for wood than lias previously prevailed, makes l)etter forestry practice possible. The foresters aim to take advantage of ,this opportunity and direct the cut- ting just as far as possible so that the woodlots will not be depleted, but will bie improved. In co-operation with the county agricultural -agents demonstration cuttings will be made whcrever practicable to, serve as objcct lessons to surrounding oWners. Econorny Forccd onl us. Certain permanent benefits should result to our forests as a result of tItis fuel emergency. T he attention of the nation lias been focused upon the coal problem. Every one realizes as neyer l)Cfore how completely we are at the mercy of the railroads for coal, yet how independent we may bce for wood, an almost equally good fuel. We realize also that alrcady about one-fourth of the original sup- ply of anthracite coal hias been used up, and that at the present rate of consumption, 5 tons per capita, the problern of coal conservation is im- portant. Hereafter it will be im- perative for the nation to take the necessary measures to require the use of local wood, a replaceable fuel, as far as possible in place of coal, a non- replaceable fuel. It seems that the tendency must be to return more and more to wood as a domestic fuel as time goes on, and as the country becomes more densely populated. Some of the organizatons at pre- sent being developed will also fie of permanent assistance in the forestry movement. There is no reason, for example, why the municipal wood' yard should not fie made permanent. it might lie enlarged so as to give farîners an opportunity to sell not only wood, but fence posts, and rough lumber direct to the consumers. Better methods of marketing so as to give the timber grower a greater share 'of the profit, which lias hither- to gone s0 largely to the operator,, will do much to, establish permanent forestry on this continent. , N 1528",
         "Canadiqn Forestry Journal, February, N11852 Thne Fuel 'Merchant's Point of View I Iow manv (ijIicuIties face the SWood fuel merchant in any l)rïvate attempt to reli'eve the coal-shortage wvas intcrestingly outlined at the -Wood Fuel Symposium\" of the Canadian Forestry Associatîin, in 1\\1ontreal, February 71W 1w LtA.-Col. 1-1. Iekvl of 1%Iontreal andl Lachute, an extensive wood fuel wholesaler. , Ordinaril\\ , the deman(l for fuel woo(1 is small,\" remarked Col. Jekly. \"Last fait 1 contracted for a large supply of fuel wood and Iound the deman(l very little so that I was ohliged 1\u003c\u003e dispose of much of it bo the chemîcal p)lant s. Goal is much cheap- ci, as prices now stand. We ai e payîng larmers as much as $8.50 a rord dfeliveîed to the railway siding. \"Another factor is storage space within t1e limits of a large city. Space i Mori.treal is too prrious for storage of large quantities of wood Sfuel. The fuel merchant can store Wve ry match more coal in a given area. At present the local yards are nearly ail fulîl of cordwood. \"If there were some guarantee 10 take the wood off our hands should the market faîl, we would bie glad to make ample provisior, but just now we feel that as soon as the war ends the market is sure to sink. \"Cars for cordwood transport are exceedingly hard to get. I have been able bo ship only two cars out of a pile of 2000 cords and hence must hold that wood over until next year.\" EDUCATING THE FARMER Lt.-Col. Ilarkom, Melbourne, P.Q. who followed Lt.Col. Jekyl, observed that most of the wood for fuel came from farmers' woodlots and the price *had gone up from four to eight dollars. As manv larmers gave only 96 cubic feet of Wood for a \"'cord\" it brought the price for a standard cord of 128 cubie feet up to $11. At the same time, the farmer who could flot do his own cutting was obliged to pay threc dollars a cord to get his trees felled and sawn. Col. Harkom took issue wvith the common practice of eutting the wý\\oodlot dlean, leaving the area unl)roductive for perhaps one hund- re(l 'ears. \"\\Ve are leaving to posterity a big war delit and it is our duty to leave them the means where- liv they can pay it.\" The farmers ought to bc educated so as to realize the potential value of a flourishing woodlot and take profits from it without ruining the capital stock. LUMBERMEN CONCLUDE AN ACTIVE YEAR The tenth Annual 'Meeting of the Can.adiaii Lumbermen's Association was fieldl in 7NIontreal on Tuesday, 1Felrtlary 5th and proved the miost successful in the liistory of that active organization. 'Fhe meetings xvere largely attended as was fully just-ified by the progressive reports of the President, Secretary and Treas- urer, and hy the programme of new work to w hich the Association comn- mitted itself for 1918. One project which was received with hearty favor was a formation of a War Secrvice (:ommittee which will act in an ad- visory capacity to the IDominion Government, and will be competent to furnish at a moment's notice whatever may be asked for in regard to tlue lumber manufacLuring re- sources of the country. Excellent addresses were given by Mr. Il. 1. Thomas of Ottawa, on the \"Ontario Workmen's Compensation Act,\" and by Mr Iloit of Chicago on the \"Feeding of Men in the Lumber Camp.\" The report of the secretary Mr. Frank I Iawkins, showed that during the year the Association had undertaken many constructive en- terprises and had carried themn throu gh to suceess. The session was regarded by ail present as constitut- ing a red-letter day in the. history of the Canadiani Lumbermen's Associa- tion. The President for 1918 is Mr. W. Gerard Power. On Tuesday evening a banquet was held at. the Windsor Hotel, Mr. W. E. BÎgwood, the President, acting as toastmaster.",
         "130Canadian Forestrii Journal, February, 1918 New Brunswick Decides For -New Forest Service Telegram fromn Hon. E. A. Smith, Minister of Lands and -Mines, New Brunswick, to the Canadian Forestry Association, Feb. 2nd, 1918: \"Our Government is preparing a Forest Act to be introduced at coming session for the better protection of our forest lands placing samie under a Forestry'Commission to control all branches pertaining thereto,* with permanent staff of employees ap- pointed on qualification and merit only.\" Readers of the Forestry Journal who have been following the pro- gressive developments in New Bruns- wick will read the foregoing definite commitment of Dr. Smith with much P' ratification. It is assumed that the orestry Commission wilI contain representatives of the Government, the licensees of limits and owners of \"granted\" lands. The Forest Art referred to is in course of preparation and aftcr the thorough consideration given to the question by the Govern- ment, with examination of other pro- vincial systems and a series of ýcon- sultations wîth forest service auth- orities, the Act is certain to assure the Province a modern and effective forrn of administration. Fire protection is by no means the onlyý undertaking for which the forest service will be responsîble. It is probable that in recenat years the loss to the public through careless opera- ting of timber tracts xïiainly by jobbers, has brought about a heavier annual waste of the forest than through the agency of fire. There- fore, the duty of the Forest Service under the new act will tec to super- vise the cutting and eliminate as much needless waste as possible. This will require not only a clearly worded Act bitt resolute administration. In Thne Forests of France The following is an extract from a letter received by Mr. R. H. Camp- bell, Director of Forestry, Ottawa, fromn Captain W. H. Millar, formcrly Professor at the Toronto Forest School, and now with the lOth Forest Engineers of L}nîted States in France: We are located in a region now of quite large Scotch pine timber, which is just exactly the saine as some of our red pine stands in Northern Ontario, except that the soul is not by any means as dry and sandy as we gener- ally find where red pine grows pure. We are makîng a dlean cut, first cutting out the under storey of liard- wood and grubbing the stumps in order to prevent sprout reproduc- tion. This is a planted forest about 75 years old and there are trees in it well over a hundred feet high and fromn 18 to 20 inches in diameter at the butt. llowever, there is not much of this kind of timber in our immediate vicinity, but very large areas of immature stands. 1 arn sorry that 1 am not able to give you a detailed account 'of our trip across because I am sure it would be rather interesting to you both as a Canadian and a Scotchman. We received a most enthusiastic welcome in Great d Britain which surprised us to a certain q extent, especially when we found the French rather undemonstrative, though extremely friendly. \"Aithougli it is now alrnost Christmas we have not yet had what we would caîl cold weather in Canada and apparently there is not going to be much winter to speak of. 1530 '.",
         "(uuadi\u003cin Forestr.1 ,Journa(l, Fbruari, I,918 33 The Work of The Association A Twelve-month 0f Active Propoganda As Discussed In The Directors Report For 1917. NVith the close of 1917, the Cana- (han Forestrv Association conci udes the eightecnth vear of its history. The concentration of public attention on the prosectifon of the War con- tributed hevond doubi to a readier reception. of the Forest Conservation gospel while at the saine lime making the growth of our membership and the collection of revenues none too easy. The factor, however, most worth em- phasizing is that the Canadian pcople have concerned themselves as neyer before about the forest resources of their cou ntry and the best methods for their perpetuation. This in turn, has stimulated conservation policies ,as applied by governments and pri- vate corporations and is gradually opening the door for an observance of sylvicultural principles in the hand- ling of timberi ands. P\u003eublic Cood Witt The efficacy of educational work in the advancing of Forestry ideas becomes better exemplified each year. While the science o\u003ef forest manage- ment is very old and so thoroughly proven in Europe as to have been a national enthusiasm during a century, its elementary p rinciples of fire pre- vention have hardly yet been ac- cepted as a whole in Canada and this is due materially to the tardiness of educational propaganda. 'Most of the major hindrances of fire protec- tion in the Dominion have their origin in an uniformed publie senti- ,ment. Even with elaborate adminis- trative machinery and complete teclinical guidance for the prevention of forest lires one of the first con- structive efforts is to secure the good- will and co-operation of the public. Apart from the initial phase of lire protection the main hope of progress in the management of woodlands or timberlands and the improvement of forestry practïre on public lands, re- quires not only constructive informa- lion l)ut the effort to make it nation- alIy pol)ular. The Forestry Association utilizes many avenues for educational work, and while obliged 10 find each year the greaterplar t of the revenues with which it operates, has managed 10 carry on new work in most of the provinces bo advance ils membership and record several substantial im- provements in provincial and federal laws and administration for which il has specifically campaigned. Working in the West Early in the year the Association increased ils activities in Manitoba, Saskatchewan and Alberta with the object of securing comprehensîve amendments to the existing \"Prairie and Forest Fires\" Acts, placing a check upon settlers' clearing fires and rendering it obligatory bo take out a permit from, a ranger or forest guard- ian before starting suchi dangerous operations. None of the prairie provinces had hitherto admitted re- sponsibility in curbing settlers' fires despide the annual losses caused to the tim er areas and 10 setlIers' property. The absence of any supervision such as is imposed in Quebec, Ontario, Nova Scotia, and B3ritish Columbia, created a situation c'allin impera- tively for a remedy. Mi the co- operation of the D)ominion Forestry Branch draft, revisions of the Arts were presented to the Manitoba and Saskatchewan Gov'ernments. These were immediately followed by news- paper campaigns in which we werc given splendid support by leading Western editors. Influential public bodies such as Boards of Trade, grain growers, lumbermen's associations, etc., supported the Forestry Associa- 1531",
         "1532 Canadian Forestry Journal, Februaryj, 1.918 lion and their assistance counted materially. Tie representations made by the Commission of Conservation on tfic need of a Permit Law were also effective. Pressure wvas brought 10 bear by our strong Western member- ship so tiat mnany hundreds of letters were written to legisiative members and ministers urging tie passing of the amendments. XXeek by week. new articles wcre supplied to the neswpapers andl fresh information 10 our members. The Government of Manitoba and Saskatchewan finally adopted tie new bills and while the provincial machineny for adminis- tration is not yet complete the legislation placed a very valuable wçapon in the hands of the forest guarding forces. The Alberta Gov- ernment was approached durnn the latter monîlis of 1917 and by aid of the D)ominion Forestry Branci, amendments to the existing Prairie and Forest Fires Act were submitted 10 the Premier, Hon. Chaîles Stcwant. These amendments forbade lie em- ployment of lire for cleaning land in forcsted regions except by wvitten permit and under supervision of re- sponsible officers of lie Dominion of Provincial governments. Twelve Boards of Trade were appealed te for co-operation and most of them addressed the Government favorably on the subject. Influential organ- iz-ations, suci as lie United Grain Growers, and mony others supported, the Forestry Association and once more our Alberta membersiip of, nearly seven hundredgenerously un- dertood by letter and personal inter- view to press tie malter upon the Provincial Government. The Al- berta newspapers gave excellent aid and were kept suppicd with special articles. As the session of tie Legis- lature opens on February 7th, we have yet no means of knowing de- flnitely the Governent's attitude ho Our proposais. Il is not anticipated iowever, that Alberta will allow itseif 10 taîl behind the sister pro'- vinces in a matter of such vital im- port ance. Polilical Patronage Closely allied to the protection of the western forests wvas the subjeCet of polîtical patronage in Dominion Forest Service appointments. 'The handicap of political interference in selecting rangers placed the Service at a great disadvantage, wasting public money and nullifying discip- line. At midsummer the Association commenced a series of newspaper articles representing the, patronage business as it affected the Dominion Forestry Brandi in its field manage- ment. This developed a wide edi- tonial discussion demanding a cessa- lion of the policy in which many of the leading newspapers referred- to the subject repeatedly. It was grat- ifying, therefore, 10 have the Domin- ion Government place itself on record as determined to remove the influence of patronage committees in appoint- ments 10, the whole of the Civil Ser- vice and to take practical steps through the Civil Service Commission to implement that assurance. In New Brunswick Believing that the situation in New Brunswick called for thec Associa-- tion's assistance that field was given specialstudy and a part of the ycar devoted mainly to educational and prpaanist campaigns. In this entrprsewe had most valued and constant aid fromn Mn. Clyde Leavitt, Chief Forester of the Commission of Conservation, Mr. W. B. Snowball, of Chatham, N.B., the Minister and staff of the New Brunswick Depan' t- ment of Lands and Mines and our New Brunswick members. The institution of the Forest Sur-. vey by the provincial governiment and the close symipatiy of the Minister of Lands and Mines with the plans of the Forestry, Division~ gave grourid for believing that a re-organization of the Forest Service and an extension of its autiority to the supervision of cutting and the, application of modern tire protection was more tian possible. To encour- age these objects the Association commenced a newspaper campaign early in the sumamer discussing til 1532",
         "(Junadian Iiorestrij Journal, February, 1918 13 aims of conservation from varions points of vîcw. An illustrated bro- chure giving a survey of the forest resources of the province, the forest industries, the evidences of fire dlam- age, present character of the tire Wprevention service as compared with more modern systems, the advant- ages of supervised cutting and other informative matters c,-alcutlated to support any Government action for the improvement of the Forest Ser- vice. This wÀas given'm(\u003est carefuil distribution throughout the province and met with a good reception. P\u003eublie Meetings At midsuimmer the Secretary hield nine public meetings in towns and country places. Good audiences were secured and at the same time a much larger field wvas reached by extended newspaper notices. Two thousand coie of a 32-page illustrated book- let, \"Ilon. Premier Livre Sur La Forest,\" wvere placed with Frenchi- speaking children in the northern ,areas wvith a special insert regarding New Bruniswick's Forest Service re- Wforms. Consultations were had with many New B3runswick aiithoritics who were agreed that educational work was a pre-requisîte of progres- sive legislation. In October, the Secretary held seven more meetings and illustrated lectures in the pro- vince and again these Nwýerç attended by wide newspaper publîcity. Fol- lowing these steps the newspapers and magazines eo-operated very generously with the Association in publishing special articles and edi- torials focusing attention upon New Brunswick's need for a thorough- going forest service. Quantities of newspaper cuts and cartoons were supplied free to thirty of the best circulated papers and liberal use made thereof. I'he object of supplying ,these engravings was to help to keep fores t problems to the forefront im- mediattely' prior to the ,legisiative session. In the adjustment of difficulties arising f rom the laek of fine protection along Government Railways right-of- ways through private owned timber- lands in New Brunswick the Associa- tion was also ab)le to be of some help. Of the inany fines of direct pul)li- city, mention may be madle liere of some of those found especially ef- fective during the year. In East and Weést Th'le Association regards the public meeting method entirely unique as a meanis of arousing a serious and per- manent interest in forest conserva- tion. Thirty-two such meetings were hield 1w the Secnetary, duiring the year at Brockville, Vernon, 1enticton, Nelson, Calgary and the following p)oints in Newý Brunswick: Chatham, Moncton, lal)usintac, Millerton, Blarkville, I oaktown, Boiestow n, Bay du Vin, Woodstock, Fredlericton, St. Stephen, Saint John, Sackville, (:ampbellton and Bathurst. In ad- dition, interviews wvere hiad with members and officers of the (iovern- nients of New Brunswick, Quebec, Ontario, Manitoba, Saskatchîewan, Alberta and British Columbia for the discussion of forest conservation matters. Then Secretary's mileage wvas in excess of 1 7,000. By the co-operation of the Nlinister of Lands and Forests of Quebec, we were enablcd to arrange a lecture route in Quebec for Mn. Avila Bodard, who gave illustrated addresses at ten p)oints and will l)robahly cover many others during the winter andl spring. Similarly, we were able to make arrangements in the French-speaking communities of New Brunswick for a series of twentv illustrated addresses by Mr. J. A. Doucet of the Dominion Forestrv Branch, for which great favor we are îndebted to the Director of Forestny. Mn. Doueet's meetings wilI take place'duning February and March. A successful meeting of the ehief executives of the Montreal banks and other financial men was arranged by our Association on Dec- ember 14, Mr. Ellwood Wilson giving an address on the financien's intenest in forestry practice.' Travelling Lectures To encourage the holding of other publie meetings for the discussion of Forestry, two travelling lecture sets were added to the two in use in 1916 il,-):33",
         "1534 Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 and those have been widely employed in Ontario, Quebec. New Brunswick and Nova Scotia. By arranging an itinerary with Boards of Education, churches, leaders of Boy Scouts and others, these sets go direct from town to town where advance arrangements have been made for meetings. Each lecture set consists of from 50 to 55 lanterni slides, mostly in colors, and a complete manuscript - the whole securely boxed against breakage. With these travelling lectures opera- ting almost continually, each re- sponsible for fromn two to Èive lec- tures a week with the exception of midsummer, a very large audience in the aggregate is reached. Winning the Children To get into contact with a greater number of the school children than can be reached in any other way, three thousand school teachers selec- ted for us by their school inspectors, were supplied with special forestry talks for the children, called \"Ad- ventures in the Forest.\" With each talk went, two large printed cards bearing two photographic illustrations and two cartoons which are passed about the classroom at the close of the teacher's address. In many schools, essays are set on the Association's talks. This branch of our propa- ganda will be widely developed if our means permit. A commencement waslrnade in the circuiting of motion picture films. The suipply of films Of educational value is not only very limited but the cost bears heavily upon the Association's small revenues. How- ever, it is hoped to develop a Film Library for circulation in timbered districts. At present theý Secretary utilizes motion pictures at most of his lectures. Helpful Literature In the field of- direct educational work through printed fiterature, the Associatlion h as gone to the limait of its purse. Publications for school child- ren, boy scouts, settlers, railway emp loyees, etc., have been prepared and issued in as large editioris as the funds could bear. While substantial ground has been covered, it is the Association's hope that Governments and private corporations will take up the duty of spreadingz educational literature, and thereby more ade- quately cover the ground. Fourteen thousand copies of \"Mon Premier Livre Sur la Foret\" were given careful circulation in Quebec, New Bruns- wick and some in Manitoba. Ten thousand of \"Your Enemy's Photo- grapli\" in two languages were handed to settiers. Substantial editions of \"Provincial Rights and the Western Forests,\" \"The Forests of New Brunswick,\" \"Fire,\" \"Who Loses?\" ::Open Seasons for Fish and Game\" \"Timber Beserves in Canada and Europe,\" \"Adventures in the Forest,\" \"The Pine Tree,\" \"White Pine Blister Rust,\" etc., reached a large public such publication being directed where it would do most good. Our method of distribution safeguards against waste as small packets of copies are sent to persons actîvely co-operating without work, or delivered direct, by post to the ultimate reader. The Forestry Association's mail- bag of out-going literature in 1917 contained a total of over 200,000 pieces. To Save the White Pine Steps were taken in April and May to arouse public interest in the white pine blister rust which menaced the white pine areas of Eastern Canada. A popularly-written expert treatise on the subject of the white pine rust was prepared at our request by Dr. Gussow of the Department of Agri- culture, 'and 3,000 copies of it in pamphlet form, well illustrated, were sent through the white pine districts of Ontario, Quebec and parts of New Brunswick. The Association com- municated with the local councits and school boards of practically all of the towns within reach of white pine areas, supplying themwith education- al literature on the subject and asking their co-operation in getting the. school children, boy scouts and others at work, so as to locate infections. 1534",
         "Canadian Forcstry Journal. February, 1918 13 Newspaper publicity also gave ranch attention to this subject. We hiad communicated with the Minister of Agriculture and a large number of the members of the Ilouse of Com- , mons placing before them the serions danger certain to follow neglect of the blister rust menace and asking support for the Dominion appro- priatîin of $50,000 to assist pre- ventive work in Eastern Canada. This grant passed the I buse without opposition. At the beginning of the season among many similar schemes to awaken public apprehiension of the forest lire danger we addressed ap- peals to 6,000 Canadian clergymen drangn to, their attention the need for pulic warnings regarding the consequences of carelessness of lire whule in or near timbered areas and asking their co-operation in spreading these hints on fire prevention. While unable to trace the resuits of this appeal we know that in many cases, a t least, pulpit announicements were based upon it. W Specwal Advertising Early in the Spring four hundred luml)er firms were supplied with ad- yertiseinents setting forth the case for personal care in the forest, and in scores of instances the firms placed the ads. in thir local papers and in magazines at their own expense. This will be made an annual enter- prise. The Canadian Forestry Journal has given the Association's work vigorous support and has kept in view its chîef office as a propagandist organ. The loyalty of our old mem- bers and the, adherence of s0 many new members is very largely due to having a monthly medium capable of popularizing the forest conserva- tion cause. The Association desires * to improve the Journal substan- tially in 1918. The cost of magazine publication has risen rapidly forcing many to forego book paper and il- lustrations and to increase their subscription rates. For propagandist purposes, fifty copies of the Journal are sent monthly to the' Reading Camp Association whichi places them with lumber camps. Copies also now ajppear on twentv- four Pullman cars and on the tables of the leading clubs and in some of the convalescent homes of the Mili- tary Hospitals Commission. Besi Vear Financîallii Financially, we have hiad our most advance year wîth total revenues of $11,773, and total expenditures of $10,801.45 leaving a balance at 1)ecember 3lst of $972.146. At midsummer, the Association applied to the Minister of Finance for an extra grant of ore thousand dollars to develop the work during the remainder of the year and this wvas given. Special subscrîptions were secured from the following firms'. Howard Smith Paper Mîlîs, Ltd., $100. J. R. Booth, $200. St. Maurice Paper Co., $50. River Quelle Pulp and Lumber Co., $50. Brown Corporation, $150. Riordon Pulp and Paper Co., $150. Sir Clifford Sifton, $100. Sir George Perley, $25. Hull Lumber Co., $25. H. H. Hettier Lumber Co., $50. Provincial Paper Mill, $50. lion. Richard Turner, -$25.00. J. K. Macdonald, ToroDto, $10. W. E. Bigwood, Toronto, $50. E. B. Eddy Go., $100. A. H. Campbell, Toronto, $25. Pembroke Lumbcr Go., $25. Whalen PuIp \u0026 Paper Milîs Van- couver, $100. M. J. O'Brien, Renfrew, $100. Colonial Lumber Co., $25. Belgo Ganadian Pulp \u0026 Paper Co., $100. Canada Paper Co., $100.' Bronson Company, $100. Wayagamack Pulp and Paper, Go., $25. Hon. N. Curry, Montreal, $50. McLaren Lumber Go., $100. Lake Megantic Pulp Go., $50. St. Maurice Forest Protective As- sociation, $100. Donnacona Paper Go., $100. Ontario Paper Company, $100. Total $2,235. 1535",
         "-- ~ ~ ~ 1 ()10L.... ICI 1536 Canadian Jxoreslry jo The Association'S most hearty thanks are due to these special. con- tributors, who have so generously recognized the national beënefits ac- cruing from our work. Membership Growlh 2000 In a year filled with so, many ex- citing events wîthin and without the Dominion, the Association's mem- bership could be promoted only with some difficulty. Prospective mem- bers were canvassed systematically by letters and literature, many of our old members aiding us from time to time by personal canvass, so that when the year came to a close we had added a total of 2,000 new members. This is about double the additions of 1916, and hrings the total mem- bership to 6,200 representing an in- crease of one hundred per cent. in two and a haif years. It is note- worthy, too, that the revenues of the Association have also doubled in thc saine period. Wider Effort Needed At no period has a widespread edu- cational effort been so vitally neres- sary in the interests of the nation nor has the public mmnd been s0 re- ceptive. No work pays higher 'divi- deDds than the spread of information regarding the natural resource3, thrir ,maintenance, and utilization. During I he past year we have opened many new fields and it is important that succce'sful educative methods should be developed in ail parts of the Dominion so that citizens in remnote distîicts, as well as in organized communities, should be brought into contact with conservation ideas. Be- cause of the urgent caîl for extended service and the adaptability of the Forestry Association for such a misý sion the Directors feel that the Association will have in 1918ý the most lîberal co-operation possible\"on the part of Governments, woodpus- ing industries and patriotie citizens in providing means sufficient for the task. The Annual Meeting at Montreal Lt.-Col. J. S Dennis Eleceted President; J. S. Gillies, Vîce-President. Large Gain In Membership. The Annual Meeting of the Cana- dian Forestry Associatiop was held at the Windsor Ilotel, Montreal, on Wednesday, Februai y 6th and Thurs- day morning, February 7th. The meetings this year, were fea- tured by a Wood Fuel Symposium in which the crisis in Canada's cord wood supply was thoroughly dis- cussed from the point of view ôf the Canadian forester, the wood fuel merchant, the railway transportation expert, the owner of woodlots, etc. The United States Forest Service very kindly permitted the attendance of Mr. A. F. Hawes, of Washington, D.C., who has had charge of much of t\u0026 organization by which the United States Government co-operating with many of the States has succceded in gettmng near a solution of the wood fuel problem. Mr. Hawes' address was of a remarkably practical char- acter, filled wîth suggestions cal- culated to assist Canadian municipal- ities facing the same situation. Directors Present Report The meeting of the Directors of the Association, held on Wednesday morning, February 6th, was attended by a good representation of Directors and members. The president, Hon. Sydney Fisher, was unable to be present, as hie had been undergoing dental treatment of a serîous nature, and addressed a letter to, the meeting referring to t he excellent progress of the Association during 1917,' and expressing hearty wishes that the present year should prove most pros- perous and useful. Inu Mr.. Fisher's absence, Mr. Win. Power, former President of the Association, acted as chairman. The nominating com- mittee presented a report, which was urnai, ébruary, î",
         "(rn adian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 13 heartily endorsed b tHie meeting, electing Lieut.-Col. J. S. 1)ennis, Vice- President of the Canadian l\u003eacific Railway Companv, as President of the Association for 19 18 and Mr. J. A. , Gillies of ('ililies Brothers, Lumber- men, as Vice-President. lon. Smea- ton White, President of the Gazette Printing Company, Montreal, was made a I)irector in the place of the late D)enis Murphy. lon. W. E. Foster, Pr'emier of Newv Brunswick was made territorial Vice-President for New Brunswick. According to the usual prece(lent. Mr. Gordon C. Edwards, Vice-Pres(lient for 1917, would have assumed the Presidency but for a special request made bv Mr. Edwards that, owing to matters of health he was unable to assume any new office this year. The report of thc Directors covering the main activities of 1917 was read by the Secretary, Mr. Llolson Black, and adopted by the meeting. Thi reor which appears elsewhere in this issue of the Journal, shows that the Asso- , Liation has had a very active year and that resuits of a most practical. and important character have resuit- ed from the educational campaigns. Mcmbership Doubled the membership of the Association has more than doubled durîng the period of the war, while the revenues have multiplied to a similar extent. The Directors voted to increase the Secretary's salai-y by $200. The report of the Treasurer, Miss M. R'obinson, showed receîpts of $11,775.91 and expenditures of $10,801.45, leaving a balance at Dec- ember 31st of $974.46. Riddance of Patronage The resolutio'ns presented the fol- lowing resolutions which were carried , unanimously: \"Whereas, the Patronage system, of making appointmenits undoubtedly constitutes the most serions obstacle to, forestry and lire protection on Dominion lands in.the West. \"Flesolved that, this Association continue its efforts to secure the early abolition of the patronage system of making appointrnnts in the field ser- vice of tlîe )ominion Forestry Branch as a part of the general reforrn to xvhiclî the U.1nion (iovernment is p)le(1ged. 'lit, Wl'iile 1\u003ein\u003c, Menace '\\Vhereas, the, pine blister disea1se undou htedly constitu tes a most, ser- ious menacre to the white pine forcsts of Eastern Canada, in whîch it is alreadv now lîrmily estalbîlie,(l. \"Resolved, that this Association, while recognizing w hat bas ali-cady been donc ini this direction, continue to exert its influence ul)of the P om- inion and P\u003erovinc ial (ioxernments concerned, to the end that no prac- ticable means be omitted to restrict the further spread of this disease, s(\u003e far as humanly practicable.\" Fire Slciatiss The report of the special comn- mittee of ten meml)ers (T. W. 1)wight convenor,) appointed l)y the Associa- tion to take up with the Provincial Government the matter of the col- lection and publication of uniform statistics of forest lire losses was presente(l and showed that the comn- mittee had made an earnest effort to encourage better methods of collect- ing statistics and of securing their p ublication. Copies of the report forms in use by British Columbia, Ontario, and the D)ominion Forest Services as welI as the St. Maurice Forest Protective Association, had beeén sent to aIl members of the com- mittee, who in turn had oflered numerous suggestions and criticismns of undoubted value. The report advocated better standardization of the headings under which information gathered is to be classilied if uniform. summaries are to be made at the end of the season and incorporated in a general publication of lire losses for the Dominion. Such a publication was issued by the United States Forest Service covering the lires in that country. The Dominion Forestry Branch has prepared a summary of the available tire statîsties for 191 1, 15, 16, covering the whole DomituÎon, which is in course of publication. 15 3 7",
         "1538 Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1.918 The meeting decided that the comn- mit tee should continue its efforts in 1918. An interesting. discussion took place as to the pcssîibility ot obtaining more detailed information as to the amount of timber destroyed. Mr. Ellwood Wilson thought that the ordinary rangers were not competent te gather such information. The lack of maps was also a great hîndrance. Mr. Clyde Leavitt thought that the question should not be looked at wholly [rom the view point of ie private owner. No one wvould sug- g est that detailed information of fire losses should be made public wvith obvious consequences to the limit holder. The Provincial Government, however, Mr. Leavitt thought ought te bc in a position to know more definitely what quantities of timber had gone by fire in a gîven period. The forest protective associations were semni-public bodies. Their rangers presumably were as compe- tent to estimate timber damage as those of Ontario, British Columibia or in the employ of the Dominion ForesLry Hranch. Mr. W. C. J. Hall believed that the Province of Quebec was able to pre- sent statistics as complete as* British Columbia. The question of damage value was not yet a matte r of general agreement. Mr. Kernan agreed with gr. Wilson that the reports as now given by the Quebec Associations wvere as complete as practicable. A.nything more detailed at present wvould be guess work. The only way te better the situation would be by much. expenditure for maps and scientifie estimates. Mr. Leavitt strongly contended that an intelligent inspector could be trusted to give an eye estimate, that would prove much more useful than the present dis- regard for timber damage, evidenced by the report forms. Mr. R. H. Campbell, emnphasized the necessity of statisties in making any progress. There were a good many uncertaîn- ties in estimatinig quaiitity or value of areas burned. At present.the only way of reaching any conclusion on this point was through careful de- duction by teclinical men in the head office. A man on thc ground, how- ever, ought to be in better position te make a reasonably accurate guess. Mr. Arthur Graham, Manager of the Ottawa River Forest Protective As- sociation, -said that an attempt was now being made to get more complete reports. The most accurate informa- tion now available was through the members of the Association and their cruisers and foresters. Mr. XVm. Power, (temporarily vacating the chair), urged .that the Association ought not at the present time te -ex- press an opinion on. the matter. In this Mr. W. F. V. At kinson concurred. It was agreed on Mr. Leavitt's sug- gestion that the committee should continue its efforts towards stand- ardization of fire report forms The ai ternoon of Wednesday was clevoted ta two addresses. The first by R. A. Pringle, K.C. Dominion Paper Controller, on \"Some Aspects of Canada's Forestry Problem.\" The second by Prof. F. F. Moon, Acting Dean New York State College of Forestry, Syracuse, N.Y. on \"The Reisponsib)ility of the State in Forest Management.\" The attendance was most satisfactory and the addresses were listened te with keen attention.- An address on \"Forest Products in Canada\" by Dr. John S. Bates of the Forest Products Laboratories, was postponed until thie following morning when it was heard with deep interest. Thursday morning, February 7th, The Wood Fuel Symposium was opened by the chairman, Mr. Wm. Power. Mr. Clyde Leavitt, Chief Forester, Commission of Conservation summarized the Canadian wood fuel situation along the lines made famniliar to readers of the Forestry Journal through Mr. Leavitt's excellent article inthe Janua-ry issue. Uncle Sam and His Wood Supply Mr. A. F. Hawes of Washington, D.C., whose paper appears elsewhere in this issue ,spoke with striking effeet on the subjeet, \"How the United States has Attacked the Wood Fuel Problem.\" Brief addresses 'were con- tributed by Mr. G. C. Piche, Chief oe c 1538",
         "(Janadian Foreslry Journal, Pebruary, 1918 13 Forester of the Forest Service, Que- ber; Mr. E. J. Zavitz, Chief Forester of Ontario; Mr. G. H. Prince, Direc- tor of Forestry Division of New Brunswick, each summarizing aptly S the wood fuel problemn as it affected his province and telling of the steps taken thus far to head off what promises to lbe a fuel crisîs in the winter of 1919. The point of view of the wood fuel merchant xvas taken by Lieut. Col. .Jekyl, whose remarks are published elsewhcre in these pages and Mr. Guy Tombs of the Canadian Nor- thern), Railway undertook to explain the transportation. problem as it affected carniage of cord wood to Lowns and cities. The Wood Fuel Symposium con- centrated a great many points of view upon a subject of first national importance. IL was noteworthy, too, that ail speakers deait with the sub- ject from a most practîcal point of view and spent no time on any phase of iL flot related to the nation's imnwdiatc rc(luiremcnts. Lt .-Coi. llarkom acted as chairman during the greater part of the Wood Fuel Symposium as M\\,r. Power was oh- liged to attendI another meetîng. Forest Con ference a Splendid Success The history of the Fores t -Pro- tective Movement in Canada will , probably look back upon the Con- ference organized l)y the Quebec Forest Protective Association at the Windsor Hotel, Montreal, on Friday, February 8th as one of its chîef mile- stones. Not only were the addresses of a thoroughly practical nature but they were given in an interestinge form. Motion picture films helped to vary the programme. Mr. Ellwood Wilson, President of the St. Maurice Forest Protective Association offi- ciated as Chairman, and the business of the day was introduced after a brief address on behalf of Arehbishop Bruchesi of Montreal. Attractive papers on various aspects of forest protection were read by Messrs. F'orrest H. Colby, Forest Commis- sioner of Maine; J. B. H arkin, Comn- missioner, Dominion Parks Branch; . G. H. Prince, Chief Forester of New Brunswick; E. J. Zavitz, Chief For- ester of Ontario; W. G. Howard, Com- mission of Conservation, New York; W. C. J. Hall, Superintendent Forest Protective Brandi, Quebec; G. C. Piche, Chief of Forest Service, Que- bec; Ward C. Hughson, President Ottawa River Forest Protective As- sociation; W. Gerard Power, Presi- (lent, Southern St. lawrence Forest lProtectivc Association an(l Robert P. Kernan, President, Laurentian Forest Protective Association. An unexpected but sterling feature of the dav's iddresses came tlîrougb the presence( of MaI.jor K. E. Kennedy of the Royal Flying Corps, wvho lias seen a great deal of service at the Front, and who was prevailed upon to take the platform and tell the meeting some of bis impressions as to the adaptability of tie modemn acro- plane foir forest protection. Major Kennedy proved to be a facile and graphie speaker with a thorougli know- ledge -of his subject. The address, published elsewhere in this issue, will* throw a great deal of liglit upon the prohlem of utilizing aeropinnes for such civil undertakings as forest. guarding. It is a testimony to the rising tide of public interest in forest protection questions that the large meeting hall was completely filled, many'visitors standing about the door for lack of accommodation. No prcvious mneet- ing devoted to this subject registered more than haif such an attendance. Mr. Henry Sorgius acted as Secretary of the Conference and deserves greât credit for its successful outcome. 1539",
         "540Canadian Forestry Journal, Februarg, 1918 MEETING 0F THE TECHNICAL SECTION The Annual Meeting of the Techni- cal section of the Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, held at Montreal, was cxcellently attended and excited deep interest. Dr. John S. Bates and C. B. Thorne were re-elected Chairman and Vice-Chairman. Three new councillors, Messrs. O. Rolland, John Stadier and F. A. Sabaton, werc appoînLed. Tfhe afternoon session consisted in reading a paper on the Estimation of Cellulose in Wood l)y Dr. B. Johnson and W. R. H-ovey, (rend by Mr. Ilovey), Practical Paper Making by J. J. Sullivan. Coated Papers by J. B. Foullis (rend by Mr. Stephenson) and a review of the Paper Industry in Canada by A. L. 1)awe. One of the most interesting features of this year's meetings was a sym- posium of the natural resources of Canada, as applied to the pulp and paper indlustry. Mr.-L. Il. Cd.)e of the Mines Branch read a paper on the \"Minerais used in the pulp and paper industry.\" Dr. A . W . J. WVilson, also of the Mines Branch, addressed the Section on \"Pyrite in the sulphite industry.\" This was discussed by Mr. Gi. D). Jenssen of New York, Mr. John -Stadler and others. In the afternoon papers were read by Mr. R. 1-1. Campbell, I)irector of Forestry on the pulpwood resources of Canada, and Mr. A. M. Beale of the Water Powers Blranch. Mr. Campbell's aper -was discussed by Mr. Eflwood Wilson and others. LT. H. R. CHRISTIE, M.C. Lt. Hl. R. Christie formerly of the 13. C. Forest Branch has been awarded the Military Cross for heroic ,action at, the front. CHICAGO'S BlD FOR TREES Chicago has entered upon a re- niarkable forestry scheme. The city is to be comletely surrounded by woods, with 'the exception of the Lake Michigan side. T here will be a great h'aif-circle of forest preserves- startÎng fromi the lake shore to the north, and running around to the west and south, enclosing the whole suburban area. About 1,000 acres have already been planted, at a cost of $3,000,000, and $8,000,000 more is to be spent on the project, under powers granted Cook county by the state legisiature. It is not a mere \"reforestation\" plan, making amends to nature for the destruction of aboriginal forests. It is an improvement on nature. Most of the area constituting the ncw forest beit was open prairie ]and xvhen the white man first saw il. COUNTERACT I. W. W. Ten thousand soldiers are being sent into the woods of the Northwest as the Spruce Production Division of the U. S. Signal Corps. Their duties are to get out spruce and fir foi' air- plane stock. These men are volun- teering from Western National Army camps and fromn civil life and fromn other services to counternet the trou- ble caused by 1. W. W. agitation in western lumber camps. A monthly production of 15,000,000 board feet of spruce is required to take care of the extra needs for the aireraft con- struction program, and small opera- tors are being encouraged to get out rived timbers in order to speed up production. Four New York State College of Forestry students have en- listed in these logging squadrqns and have lef t Syracuse for Vancouver Barracks. Pennsylvania spent $2,275,000 in acquiring one million acres of forest land. Due to rise in 'timber values, this land is estîmated to be worth now six million dollars. In some sections, of the Adîron- dacks convict 'labor is being em- ployed successfully in reforestation. At Goldsmith's in the Saranae River Valley a gang of fifteen convicts have planted 300,000 trees on State land. 1540",
         "(;EfaalWn Foreslry Journal, February, 1918 11 View 0f Ove rseas Axemen A Swiss forester gives in the ' Journal Forestier an intercsting ac- count of a Canadian lumber camp in France in one of the famous tir forests of the State in the Jura Mountains, la Joux. This is a forest of about 6,500 acres of silver tir of magnificenit dimensions-very dif- ferenit-from most French forests in which Canadians have been working - the trees being often over 160 feet in height and'sometimes 3 feet in diameler. The forest being care- f ully managed under selection sy- stem, or perhaps, we should say, under a long terrm shelter-wood sv- stenm, is supposcd to permit a sus- tained yieid of 222 cubic feet per acre, valued ai. $50 per' acre per year an unusual figure. From the description, wve judgc that the operation is organized like afirst- class American loggýing, and miii camp, with bothi cal)le and animal skidding and a four-foot circular, with cut-off and trimmer saws, and loro- mobile to carry the lumber. A stone crusher to fuirnish material for mak- ing the heavy hottomless roads pas- sable alone is an innovation. Thne Woodlands Section The organîzation of the Woodlands * Section was completed at a well- attended meeting at the Windsor Hotel, Montreal, Thursday afternoon, Feb. 7th, Mr. Ellwood Wilson pre- sided and the following officers were elected: President, W. Gerard Power, of Quebec, president of the Canadian Lumbermen's Association; vice-pre- sident, Angus McLean, of the Bath- urst Lumber Co., Bathurst, N. S.; Bolli these -officers were elected by acclamation with the tollowing board of directors: Thos. Mack, -of the Brown Corporation, La Tuque; M. C. Small,'of the« Laurentide Co.; E. Wil- son,_ of the Laurentide Co.; John Black of the J. R. B3ooth Co., and F. M. Anderson, of the-Shives Co., Limited, Campbellton, N,B. Mr. F. A. Sabatton, of the Lauren- qtide Co., Grand Mere, gave a stimu- s lating paper on the work of paper mills, especially with., regard to the production of newsprint. In- this hie pointed out the great efficiency Wu the work-of the mills; with better rmach- inery and more perfectly trained men, the' increase in the -traiinrg of the employees having greatly improved the output of the machinery. Educated in Milis la connection with this, Mr. Sabat- ton pointed out that mosi. of the mils were Iocated so far fromn large cen- tres of civilization that the work o! training employees was a liard one. \\Vith regard to this, lie showed thai. of 21 paper machine tenders, wlio werc considered the higliesi. class of skillced labor attaclied to paper milîs, 18 were French-Canadians, who had been cdu- cated 10 the work in their own milis These men, who, otherwise, would have been lumberjacks or farm liands, but for the training they hiad received with the Laurentide Co., were nowv making from $1,400 to $1,600 a year. and working an ciglit-hour day, with ail sorts o! privileges arranged by the company. A number o! other discussions came up, especially with regard to the use of tractors in lumbering operations, which was discussed by Mr. W. Ger- ard Power and others. Over 14 million dollars have been spent to ge t rid of the gypsy moth in Massachusetts and adjoÎning States. A Swiss 1 ;5111",
         "I 542 anadian Forestry; Journal, February, 1918 THIE KICKINGHORSE RIVER NEAR WAPTA, YOHO PARK, B.C. MTS. HUNGABEE AND SCHAFFER, TRAIL 24, B.C. 1542",
         "C§anadian Forestri!; Journal, FebriuQr!i, P ' 18 \u003e1 MT. EDITH CAVELL, JASPER PARK, B.C. , \u003e~Jar~Ric Namned li menxory of Mise Edith Cavell, the Englieh nurse, wbo ias ez,,uted by Germen order. 1513",
         "154.1 anadian, Forcstry Journal, February, 1,918 More Letters From The Front Telling of Logging Under Fire, Sheil Splinters In Logs, An Indian Fire Ranger As Sniper, Etc. Canîadians working with the For- estry I3attalions in England and France have their own points of view of the unique surroundings of war. The following excerpts from letters received by the I)irector of Forestry, Mr. R. Hl. Campbell, will doubtless he found highly interesting. AN INDIAN RANGER-SNIPER Some of the Most \"Picturesque\" letters which the Dominion Forestry Branch receives from its sixty-odd men overseas are those dictated by Private Matthew Nackaway, an I n- dian fromf Norway House, who was previously a fire ranger patrolling a section of country along the Nelson r iver in northern Manitoba. lus commanding officer reports that he and the other Indians attached to the unit are giving very good service, They are employed chîefly as dis- patch runners, scouts, and snipers. It is said their ability to creep up close to the enemy posts without being discovered has been of the greatest ,value to the unit. Private Nackaway was gassed on September 22nd, and was so badly burned by this new form of gas that he was sent to a hospital in E'ngland. In a letter to the Director of Forestry, Mr. R. H-. Camlpbell, lie describes the effcct of Lhis gas as being like that of applying raw mustard to the skin. Private Nackaway is recovering but his Iungs stili give a good deal of trouble COL. STEVENSON IN FRANCE \u003eLt. Col. H. 1. Stevenson, who, with the Fort Garry H orse in France but whose work in civil life is that of Supervisor of the Riding Mountain Forest Reserve, in Manitoba, under the D)ominion Forestry Branci, ias' recently written the I)irector of Forestry to the effect that last sum- mer lie 'was loaned to the Royal Engineers and took charge of a forest, the prize hardwood forest of France- erected milîs, etc. and ran it for about live months with about 3000 men. Col. Stevenson says it was a good experience, a sort of post-graduate course in forestry, as this particular forest is the one- in whieh all the Indian Forest Service spend their time when in France finishing up their course. FLYING A \"BUS\" Lieut. D. A. MacDonald, Royal Flying Corps, England, formerly in the Dominion Forestry l3ranch as Forest Assistant, Bow Rivejr'Forest Reserve, in wniting to Director R. H. Campbell, says: I completed a six weeks' theory course on Flying Me- teorology, and practical Wireless, Machine Gu nnery, Engines, Rigging and Artillery Observations, at Read- ing about three weeks ago and amn nowr undergoîng higher instruction in these and learning to fly a \"bus.\" It is the most interesting game 1 can think of and certainly a wonderful technical education for nor cost to yourself. 1 have feit settled since I finally got started in the R. F. C. which I haven't been since this war started. The R. F. C. has a wonder- fui equipment for instruction and also is perfectly ranized. The average cost to theovernment for qualifying a pilot from the time of his appointment. until his graduation is higli. The largest item of this, of course, is damage to machines due to crashes. I expect -it will 'be well; on in January before I get my wings. since we have many different mach- ines to fly for 20 hours solo and the weather is too \"dud\" in the winter months to get in much flying. At present the weather is fair for flying about two days a week. Mr. Finlay- 6li 15114",
         "Canad ian Fore'slry Journal, Februarlil, 1118 son, Forestry Branch Inspector for Alberta, asked me to give him some news of operations, etc., in my work. 1 don't know whether lie meant Forestry work or Flying., Certainly I 'think that the new machine would be a wonderful acquisition to the Forestry Branch for reconnaissance and photography work. 1 amrn ot permitted to (liscuss its capal)ilitîes but 1 ean assure you that il is the fastest machine in Hc air, and can travel and climb tremendous dis- tances with a passenger and some Ioad of bombs. From the Crowsnest to the Brazeau shouldn't take more than two and a hiaif hours. SHELL FIRE IN FORESTS Major WV. A. Lyndon, France, for- merly Chief Fire Ranger in the Crowsnest for the Dominion Forestry Branch, in acknowledging the quar- terly bulletin sent by the Branch to officers now in the field., writes: -I -have been for the past two rnonths living on the bat tic ground of France. There is not a building standing within ten miles of us. Where the villages stood there is nothing left. It is a sight to see but gets very tiresome to work in day after day among nothing but wrec k and ruin. We went through a forest today, that is, what once was one. There was not a foot of ground that had not been turned over by shells, flot a tree lef t standing, only a lot of stubs split and shattered-no pro- tection whatever. Lt reminds me a great deal of what it is like after one of our -big bush fires, only ten times worse. LOGGING UNDER FIRE *Quarter Master Sergeant S. R. Clark, Canadian Forestry Corps, France, formerly Forest Supervisor of the Brazeau Forest Reserve of the Forestry Branch, Department of the Interior and brother of G. H. Clark, Dominion Seed Commissioner, writ- ing to the head Office, Ottawa, says: I find the French methods of forestry very interesting. This forest has been under Government supervision for many years and the subdivision into compartments based on soil and thc resultant type is definite proof of succcssfuil management. 'l'li or- ganization of course is strictly miiii- tary an-d prior to this war i t was sufTîciently traine(l to go to the front as a unit. OnIv veterauis arc ini charge now. Thiis forest, N\\hich w as eut over 1w' the H uns ablouit last Februarv consisted of oak, ffl lier cent.;- beech. 30 per cent.;- birci, 5 lier cent. and the reniainder blue hecch and aslî. ieuit. Tilt (forineirl\\ a t- tached to the Forestry Bn' ii in Alberta) niade an examinatiou of tflie area duirîing early suinner but ()\\ ingý to the large amouint of felled trc which the I lunis cul and were tirable to utifhze before their retrea t lie fotund a reliable estîirate difficul t to make. Aniother initeresting parc of our location here is the dail\\- serenade we receive from Fritz. Tlo date tle\\- have causcd ver\\ lit île inconvenience other tlîan necessitating a trausfer of the crews while the shelîs are coming over. 0f course this relieves monotony and as we have cornfletedl the cleaning up of this forest it is probable that we will not be located so close to thie fine whien we inove again as it is not customnary for non- combatant units bo be placed so close to the firing fine. SHELL SPLINTERS IN LOGS Captain A. W. Bcntly, 18th Bri- gade, France, formerly of thie hcad office of the -Forcstry Brani'h. I)e- partment of the Interior 'res *'Ilavng£ spent nearly two yeairs oui here w\\ith thle guns 1 was vcery in- terested to read about thic French Forests. 1 hiave neyer seen a Frenchi forest yet except from the window of a railway carria g e whiilst going on leave (three times). The remains of a French forest after our high explosive shell has done its work, îs only fit for firewood and that is s0 full of splinters that a saw cannot be used. Wedges are the only mneans of splitting Up the pieces. 1 hope to get back some day to where these forests are stÎli intact and unscathed and sec one. AIl our material, beech slabs mostly, is cut Up and sent up fresh from the stump. Small pine poles are sent up as guli pit prol5s.",
         "I S~ (unadian Fores/r q Journal, February, 1918 IRRIGATING TREES Sergt. B3. M. Stitt, Canadian For- estry Corps, France, formerly Chiel Fire Ranger tindeî' the Dominion Forestrv l3ranchi at Pas, Manitoba, iii à recent letter to the Branch says: We are stl hard at work over here doiîig our best to supply the growing needs of the front line trenches. We have been eutting white poplar this last two months, most of it going into 92'2 in. road plank. About one-third of the total, acre- age in the valley we are now working is under reforestation and it is highly interesting to note the growth and systemn of planting the young trees. We have eut some 5 ft. and over at the stump. Most of the trees are planted along creeks and between every row of trees a ditch is dug which is kept fuit of water regulated by sniall gates or weirs. Finding INew Uses For Our Woods By D)R. JOHN S. BATES Stiperiniendenf, Forest Products Labora tories of Canada. An Address Delivered Defore The Conadion Fores !ry Association, Monircal, February 71h, under tille \"Forest Products in Canada.\" Nly lirst intention was to survey the w-hole field of forest produets as briefly as possible. Ilowever, this haos afiready been donc in a papert read before the Canadian Society of Civil Engineers, reprints of which are available for anyone interested. It seems unnecessary to repeat this detailed discussion, and 1 shall there- fore touch on only a fcw points whîch stand out in proinence before those who are concerned with the welfare of our- forests. Wood Exports vs. Munitions We must not lose sight of the significance of wood in Caniada's list of natural resources. Forest pro- duets are next in value to âgIcuture, the income being somethn over $200,000,000 annually. In studying pulp and paper industry now brings into the country a larger income than any other manufacturing industry with the exception of munitions and is an outstanding example of an export business yielIding real money in \u002b Present and Possible Products from Canadian Woods\" by John S. Bates, Forest Products Laboratories of Canada, 700 University Street, Montreal. distinction from, war business largely based on domestie credits. At the present time it is out of the question to ship large quantities of wood pro- duets across the water and 'we see Europe being drained of its limited supply to feed the war machine. In the future the Empire will turn to Canada for its supplies, particularly for the valuable sqftwoods whic fortunately predominate in this northern climate, In considering the economies of forest produets there are certain methods of utilization which are the main units and which are self-con- tained, such as lumber, pulp and paper,- and wood distillation. The tendency has been ta start with round wood from, the forest for each pro- cess,, so that control can be more certain and each plant can be inde- pendent. The possîbilities for econ- omy by co-ordinating one. industry with another are becoming more arpparent every day. The expansion of the main industries wîll bring about these new methods by ve r reason of their size, so that there wir, be enougli wood waste at one centre to serve as raw ýmaterial for a by- product plant. Already the kraft 1546",
         "Can\u003cidian Foreslry Journal, February, 1918 51 pulp plants in the east convert large quantities of slabs and edgings; the saw miii waste in British Columbia offers opportunities for processes out- side the range of the lumber industry. '_ft The -practîcal requirement is that utilization must yield a financial profit. The close utilization in Europe is out of ail proportion to Canadian conditions and wvc must wait for an incerease and spreading of population. The rising cost of wood in Canada is in many ways a blessing and it is only riglit to place a real value on wood as it stands in the forest. As more and more by-pro- duet industries become feasible, the utilization of waste will bring true economy by throttling the drain on our forest supply. A Permaonent Forest Looking at the problem in a broad way, the protection and reproduc- tion of the forest overshadows ai other duties. The most effective utilization of the wood and waste P that iTs now coming out will not counterbalance thq loss of forest wealth and the aima should be to build up in Canada a permanent and ever-expanding forest. It is to the foresters, the lumbermen, the federal and provincial governments that we must look for the carrying out of this policy. The public may well take a renewed interesi in fire protection, forest reserves, tree plant- ing, more igid cutting laws, and measures for natural reproduction. Conditions are favored by the owner- ship of such large proportions of the forest areas by the governments. Logging is such a definite proposi- tion each year that it is liard to change the methods so long in use. We know that about 25 pe cent. of the trce is left in the woods in the form of limbs, tops, stumps, etc. In general it' is not likely that new processes will go far towards saving Ihis material, because there is al- rcady so much by-product wood withîn easier reach at the manufac- turing plants. Burning of slash in the wet seasons appears to be the main duty at present in order to curb forest fires. Newi Cond \u003cit ions A hcad The lumber industry lias had a long history in Canada, but now faces new conditions. The manuifacture has been so simplJe and the com- petition so Iight that lumbermen have flot been forced to intro(luce radical changes. Althouigl the plants are widely scattered and tlic number of specially traine(l men is small, it is not going too far to say that fliet lumbermen must get together for an intensive study of their industry. No outside forces \u003c'an accornpiish what tliey themselves can do by com- paring the mechanical and pliysical properties of the dillerent woods, ex- tending the use of a species where this is legitimate, eliminating decay in lumber yardis, kîln-dryîig and finish- ing woods to mecl special rc(Juire- ments, seiecting tinuber on the basis of quality and weiconuingL the cu- operation of indlustries and exp)erts for the conversion of Nvastc. Saw - miii waste amounts to about *10 per cent, of the original trvc and consists of slabs, edgings, trimmiiings, sawdust, bark, shavings, seaison)ing wastc, shaping waste and culis. Tiiere are many chances for extending the by - product manufacture of smail woodcn articles by mechanicai processes. A ncw dcvelopment in Canada is the chipping and baling of saw-mitI wraste for shipment to chemical pulp milîs. Sprucc and white pinc have been the main-stays of the lumber industry; Douglas fir is now coming to be rccognized as Canada's fore- most structural tîiber and the im- mense supplies in British Columb\u003eia will be a source of great weaith. Openinys for Enter prisc The pulp and paper nd ustry is eni- joying a development which is with- out parallel among the wood-using processes of the country. The export figures is now over $50,000,000 an- nually, being haîf of the total export value of ail forest products. The restrictions on pulpwood cxport and\u003c the duty f ree market for puip and paper in the United States have rapidiy increased manufacture within the country and the ratio is improving evcry year. From thc simple ground- 1 ;-A 7",
         "l54~S aridian I'oTIresir Journal, February, 1918 wood process more andl more atten- tion lias been turned to unbleached, suiphite pulp, bleached suiphite pulp, kraft pulp, newsprint paper and high- grade papers. The p)rodluction of soda pulp is still only 21 tons per day whie the imports amount to some- thing like $500,000 per year, and there seems 10 bc an opening for the utilization of some of the poplar which troubles the forester in con- nection with foresL reproduction. XVaste suiphite liq uor stili carnîes large quantities of wood material (lown the rivers but serious attention is beiug given to thce ossibilities of recovering ethyl alcohol, tanning solu- tion and binders. 1roducts of sur- prising variety. can bc made fromi kraft pull\u003e and i t is likely that paper twine, paper textiles and leat her substitutes will be on our list of forest l)ro(llcts in due course. Aretone for War l('s Anîong the distillation processes the dlestrucetive distillation of liard- wo(ls is of main importance in Canada. It is grtatîfyin.ti that mana- facture is carried beyond the stage of crude l\u003ero\u003clucts and that thec sl)ecîally refined and derived produe ts aire made in Canada for both local and cxport trade. The process lias bcuen vitl1 in that it lias su pplied prctcav ail of the methvl ai cohol and wcetic acid, so essenti'al in the scleme (if moden civilizaýtion. The war lias given a necw stimulus by reason of the tremendous (lemand for acetone as a solve(nt in the manuî- facture of cordite, the well-known British propellent explosive. This saine pressure has introduced in Caniada new chemical processes for acetone and acetic acJdwhich may have a serious effect on the distilla- tion of hardwoods. While hardwood distillation is rather crude, it sur- vives by reason of the variety of useful products-wood alcohol, emth- yl acetone, formaldehyde, acetic acid, acetie anhydride, acetone, acetone oîls, charcoal, creosote oils, etc. An important development is the Seaman process now estahIished in the United States for the distillation of liard wood sawdust and, finely divided milI waste. Work of the Laboratories In closing this brief discussion of a large subject I beg to refer to the work of the Forest Products Lab- oratonies of Canada. As you know we are concerned witli the varied problem of wood tilization. The fundamental basis is a study of the mechanical, physical and chemical properties of Canadian wood species. There are also investigations of pro- cesses and it is clear tliat many field studies will have to be made. In addition to the present Divisions of Timber Tests, Tïmber Physies, Pulp and Paper and Wood Preservatioâ there is large scope for a Division of Lumber to properly serve the lumber industry in a teclinical way. It is impossible to talk of expansion under present war conditions, but it is riglit to plan. In playing a part in the better utilization. of Canadian xvoods ît is clear that we must have the full co-operation of foresters, as well as lumbermen and aIl others concerned with the liandling of wood. There is a growing need for more dctailed know- ledge of our forest resources. Methlods of utilization 110w known could in many cases be applicd if there could be more discussion and a (doser toucli between woodsmen and process men. Foresters have raised the problems of punky poplar, bal- sain tir and bircli and the utiization of hardwoods in connection with re- p)rodluctioni of softwoods. These are dfiflicult questions but some action may follow from a better under- standing of the situation. There is saine indic'ation that the large pro- portion of soluble niatter in the de- cayed poplar may yield products of va.lue. An attemp t is being made to grind hardwoods f or mecchanIcal puip. WALNUT SCARCE FOR GUNS Black walnut, which has always been the favorite wood for gun stocks on account of its failure to sphinter badly when struck by a ballet or bit of shell, is extremely scarce at present. Birch and maple are beîing tried out by p roducers of hardwood lumbe.r for t lis purp ose. 1548",
         "Canadian Forestrij Journal, Februarg, 19518 14 Evergreen Snow Fences ByJ. E. LONG Editor, Canadian Governineni ilailiiays Employets J1Ig(i.ine. Mloncton, V.B3. Praiseworthy Action Taken By Government Rail- way In Safeguarding Tracks For Winter Traff je. Passengers travelling over the Canadian Government Railways are frequently heard commenting favor- ably on the fine appearance of the beau iful spruce hedges which line the right-of-way between Campbell- ton and Bathurst. To the traveller the appeal is purcly to the esthetic sense, and the dense growth and wcll- kept appearance of Ihese hedges resi the eye and captivate the sight in spite of the enchantment of the many natural beaulies of mountain, bay and forest, with which. the region is so generously adorned; but 10 the railway man they mean more Ihan a decoration, as they are utilitarian as weIl. Here is the beautiful corn- bined with the useful in the highest se'nse. Primarily these hedges were de- signed to protect the R'ailways' tracks from the drifting snow in winter lime; that lhey have grown beautiful is due to the greal care with which they were planted, and tendcd by the sectionmen, and 10 the mellowing influence of the passing years. Now the Railway has natural snow fences, serviceable, efficient, beautiful, a combination well planned and pa- tiently perfected. To James Patterson, of Campbell- ton, retired roadmaster, is due in no small measure the credit as the originalor of this improvement. In a recent interview, Mr. Patterson gave 10 the writer the following in- teresling information: \"The winter of 1887 was most severe, the snôwfall was very heavy, and the high winds almost continu- ous. My men and 1 spent many days and nights endeavoring 10, keep the tracks clear of snow, so that the trains mighl flot be delayed or the culs blocked with the heavv drifts. \\We did the best we could wiîth the snow-fighting apparatus we had, but our 1)est efforts were but feeble unes, and after some of the heavit*st stornîs our wooden snow fences wvere com- plelely buried, and the cuts snoxed Up full. B. C. SPRUCE PRODUCTION 1Hecent1y the Britishî Columbia Governmient passed the following Order-in--C.ouncil relating tu ý!rcater spruce production in the province: That the Minister of Lands be and is herebv authorized and eml)owered (a) Tu forthwith arrange with the Imperial Munitions Board for the immediate logging of aeroplane spruce upon ail areas of vacant Cirown Laind that ma be ' dd suitable for the purpose y the I)epartment of Lands, as well as upon C.oal Leases. Co0al Licenses and Minerai claims lu which Crown Grant or Surface Rights lias not been issued. (b) To rail upon ail holders of Crown Timber held under License or Lease which is judged by the Lands, I)epartment to bc suitable for file purpose lu proccd immcdialely wilh the logging of acroplane spruce andl in default of rornpfiance the Mînister shaîl instruct the I)epartment of Lands lu arrange for such lotgin.$ in co-operation with flic lmperial Mu1ni- lions Board. (c) To arrange with the Imiperial Muitions B3oard on equitall comn- pensation 10 be paRi lor Lmber so cul f rom. any license or lease. 1.5-19",
         "15\u003c)Canadian Forestry Journa(, Februiarll, 1918 Forests in Canada's Arctic In an article in the Geographicai Review by R. M. Anderson, giving an account of the explorations in the (:aîuadian Arctic coast, the foiiowing data regarding \"timber areas\" are given: \"The northern limit of spruce trces (\u003e11 the Coppermine River is about 20 miles froni the coast, although some strgglrsare found growing 5 to 10 miles froni the coast on Naparktok- tuok Creek, a few miles east of the river. Wiiiows of gond sîze, and froni 10 ta 15 feet high, are found in many places north of the tree line, and pcrsist until they dwindle to smal gbround-ereeping shrubs on the north- ern islands and wind-swept mainland coast. -To, the wcst there are no trees au y here near the coast until we corne to Franklîn Bay, where we find spruce of fair size 10 or 15 miles inland, in the vallev of Ilorton River. Spruce cornes rather close to the coast on1 the Anderson River south of Liver- pool Bay. Stili farther west we find the great northward extension of tiuber In the Mackenzie delta, faim- sized trees OCCU ring northward neariy to Richard Island about 1,50 miles north of the Aretic Circle. \"On the I lorton River, the Copper- mne River. airaund Dismal Lake, and ta a iess extenit farthler west, we often noted the largýe proportion (in some places 90 per cent.) of dead spruce trees near the northern Jîmit of tim- ber. 'Fhere seerned littie evidence of tire destruction,and the exp)lianation that the northemn regions are beconi- îng \u003c'aider and the vegetation re- treating seemed inconclusive. On anc of our winter trips Mr. Johansen accampanied a sledge party south- ward to the tîmber-line on the Coppermine River and made a care- fui study of conditions. Ile found that practieally ail the dead trees showed traces of the ravages of bark beeties, three species of theni being found.\", VON ALVENSLEBEN SOLD OUT The case of the Red Cliff Land \u0026 Lumber Company vs. Alvo von Alvensieben has been before the Bmitish Columbia courts for almost two years but the end is now in siglit. Alvensieben a German of high lineage who was in business in Vancouver is 110w intemned at Sait Lake City having been located at Seattle for many months immediately previous to the United States entering the war. In 1911 hie bought a iare area of timber from the plaintiff company, the Purchase price of which was in the neighborhood of $2,200,- 000. At the outbreak of the war there had been paid $1,700,000, and the original action was for fore- closure because of the final amounts owing under the agreement and also for interest. The application foi fore-closure was abandoned because it would have been in the nature of a forfeiture and the action just de- cided was for a declaration of amounts due as a first lien against the Pro- perty; that the property should be sold and that the plaintils should be permitted to, bid on it at the sale. This the court allowed. NEW OFFICERS C.S.F.E. The following olicers were elected at the Annual Meeting of the Cana- dian Society of Forest Engineers at the University Club, Montreal, Wed- nesday, Februamy 6th.: President, Ellwood Wilson. Vice-President, J. H. White. Secretary, Clyde Leavitt. The meeting was a most successful one in every respect. Mr. W. F. V. Atkinson, Forester of the Spanish River Pulp and Paper Milis, Ltd., gave an excellent paper which will be reproduced in the next issue of the Forestry Journal. ê 1550 fý",
         "Canadian Foresfry Journal, January, 1918 CHEWINC TOBACCO has thousands and thousands of friends who enjoy daily ~ its rich and lasting flavor",
         "1552 \u003canadian Fores!ry Journal, February, 1918 Trees and National Character Alexander von HIumboldlt has written, ini his -Views of Nature,\" 1 think, that it is the vegetation of a country which produces the firsi. and mlosi lasting impression upon the mind of an observer. To credfit that assertion, one must stop and rellect a monment. TIhe more careful the couside rîtf on ri te more likely wHil onle bc to recognize the truth of I Ium- boldlt's stternt. I n ilhe cooler parts of the globe we haive wIl niarked contrastîug gronps of trees N\\ ich grow iii diameter by annual aje1ditjois o\u003ef new wood out- side of thie old wood and immed- intely under the ba;rk, uainely the oaks and ickories; anfd the trees whïch, in generaýl, shied their leaves sir sl(\u003ewly tliat t liîevý-( are cald per- sisi Cuit-leave(l treesý, as tew pinecs andl spruicv, in \\hich thec inew leave, atre 0on, biefore Ille o(\u003e 1are off. At auyý sea1son Of tht' year- one eau1i har11dlY lau1 to obser-ve flic olfeene f appeari-- durehotweu n 4o:11 ind a p\u003eue. (Oiw miight :1lm1ost aytlîat thev liad buit littie ]i oî eon the fart thati bothl were tr'ees, so fqr :1s rx- te raiw aperal rveýled. fi, how- ever, Hie vivw point wýere hagdto ai tropical regýiona nuw ty-pe o' free woufld daimjr outr' attention. The simiple eat of thie palmns Nvould attracitilus at once. To thec palmn we mlighit add' the trece 1cm), whichi thoughi wholly unlike thie pailmi in its structure ani meýthiods of' reroduc- tion, possesses a makdgnrlre- seniblance in form, i. c., in sae The year throuigh, the trpcal forest wotild lie perpetiially ev1ren lere there are, ilirce diîstincttyeswh force thenîsel(,ves upon our- notice at once. Trer Imprcssions lu addition to tiiese forms of de- ciduous Jeaved and \"persistent- leaved\" trees, thcre would bie tHie topiographi'al set tiug in which we fouind them, but a momient's thought wilI convince that it is the trees and flot the setting which produces the permanent mental pficture, unless the topographical settings are different - as a winter street scene and a winter river view. But place both of our northern tree types ýon the saine set- ting, and no matter lîow striking il wotild be, the trees would be the lirst to daim the observcr's notice. The exuberant growth of the tro- pies, produces one mèntal impression and the stern, harsh simplieîty of a northern pine, or spruce foresi, an- other eac h equally abidiug, though quite different in kind. So much for the scene, in mass - the impression made, we may say, upon the ordinary observer. Be- yond and deeper than thîs, however, are hie sensations awakened in those whio observe more minutely. The *red -blooded man,\" who camps annually in the woods for the love of it, wil recognize that his Camps in the pine or sprucefoes d1iffer in lus memory fromt those madle in the broad-leaved forests. Thîis is especi1ally true if lie thinks of his wîiter, cami^ps, where lie lias a sense of protection under the everýgree(n foliagew of the pîies and sp ruces that iS mwholly wanting in the leafless for- ests of thre broad-leaved trees. The passing storm lias in eachi a different no te. The benad ing snow - laden branhesof tle evergreen tree is a pictutre quiite ilfier than the rigid branches of the leaifless tree, as but little s[IOW can remain on the latter. The I\u003eine Woods Camp Service recognizes finely the calm conteýnt of the pine woods camp, and describe i as only an outer, can:- -I lere by the caminrre's flicker, I)eep in my blanket curled, 1 long for the peace of the pine- glooma Wliere the scroil of the Lord is un- fuirled. And the wind and tleý wave are sulen ni And world is singing to worid.\" 1552",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 - ATHABASKA FALLS, JASPER PARK 1.5573",
         "1554 Lunadian Jioreslry Journal, Februaril, 1918 The real breath of the north, where the pine tree thrives, is ini that utterance. Parkman, the historian, from in- timate knowledge of winter in the pine woods of ,the north, actually pictures the srente before one ini a few graphie Iines,, thus: \"Lakes and pondswere frozen, rivulets sealed Up, torrents encased with stalactites loi ice; the black trunks of the pine- trees were beplastered with snow, and its heavy masses crushed the duli ,green boughs into the drifts beneath. The forest, was silent as the grave.\" And now: \"A song te, the oak, the brave old oak, W\\ho hath ruled in the greenwood long. \" The ever.gree-n forest most appeals to one ini the winter, w-hen t he de- ciîduotis trees arýe bare, restîng in the semnblance of decath; bult ini the early sprin4o whcni the sap) flows igain and 11ie b cornes imanifesi, 1 Lturn to the STERE OPTICONS Do you use a Lauter? In sclhool, in Collegme or ais a travelling lec(turer? Mhe \"M Noî\"Stereopticons wiIl nwe(t voltr idleal or what projetion shouild lie. Fori. t-ieyaaMlts lantertis halve heenl dcllrided hy the mlost dis- crriniiating uisers ofthOe United Stiltre anld C*anada. Let lis kno yr requtirveents, Do 34ou it idea insrmn to project opaue bjetsOr lt- miost comipact lanturni in the -woild for trvli~or beauitifui finish aild A miolit raoa prices. Mcelotesh Steropticon Sc BOOTH BUILDING - - - TAW broad-leaved forest for i'c i-a tion' hope, and the rcnewal of lfie in 'vhich the very outermost twigs and buds are bathed. Ail through, the suni- mer one can watch the occurring changes: the dcveloping leaves, the maturing fruit, the nesting birds. Even the fight is brigliter than in the dark evergreen forest. When au- tumn cornes in .the forest, xvhen the leaves are . \"Siain by the arrows of the earlv frost,\" nature caps the climax of her seenic, glories in the coloring of the dvip~g leaves, s0 that our last vision -and final memories of them may be the brightestof the year. To a visitor froni the old world, where there is no such autumn coloring as here, the appearance of our scarlet, oaks and our maples is un- eît ta other type of trees, the palm and the tree fern, *Steeped in the Sun.\" We here have but littlle ASK FOR Dry Matches AMte ail Cr a$y in a boat. rainstorm or wet Bnow, Ask your deaier for Es WAIWRPWOOp If ha can't gupply you, we wili -end Prepaid for bis numne and 50 cents. Dry matches Ma , .ave your lite. MARUBLE ARMS mre. . Dept. 5160 'Gladstone., Mi,., U. S. A. - - ---ai. 1554",
         "Canadion Porestrzj Journal, ian uanj, 1918 15 FAIRBANKS -MORSE FIRE FIGHTING ENGINES These comnat powerful littie pumpîng outftts have repeatedly substantiatedcour claims dwiîng the. past year, ail over Canada. They can be readily transported wherever man ort'pack horso ca'i go. Goverments and Private Owners -of Forests everywhere, ce,- materially reduce thejr fire losses by the use Of these outfti. Fuil information and prices on request. THE CANADJAN'FAIRBANKS - ORSE CO, Limitea MONTREAL - OTAWA ST. JOHN, QUEBEC. TORONTO, WAMILTON. WINDSOR, Wl NNI PrG, SASKATOON, CALGARY, V^NCOUVIER. VICTORIA. 1555",
         "(krad\u003cin Forestry Junal, Februarg, 1918 t() do, thougli the palm is scantilv represented on oui' southern coast.I have watched the cocoanut palm, wvith its reýstless foliage swaying in the ever rentland, or sea breeze of the oce.in shore. But this hias not altered in my mind the idea of tropical rest, for 1 sec that the motion is produced by a force oui- side of the palm. Nor can 1 escape the i(lua that the tropirs, where the palm flourishus is the land of littie achievement-, where God has been too Fo rests, kind for maai's own good. True, this has little to do with the trees them- selves, for their activities may be great. It is possible, howvever, for one from long habit to look at trees as hielping to form human habits and s0 forming human history. If such association can be tolerated, it is easy to look upon ail tropical life, plant and animal, as lacking the vigor and helpful productiveness of the land of the oak and the pine. J. T. R. in \"Forest Leaves.\" Thne Keystone of W--ar By IPROF. J. W. ToumEY, DEIAN O\u003eF YALE FoHiiST SCHOOr. \"Vic tory is wîth the army whose country lias the greatest iron mines and smelters, the largest .area of waving graiin and abondance of wood. Of ai] flic produets of the soil upon 'vhich the very life of a na tion (lCpends in Uies of waýr, Wood is thev only oneý t hat cainiot bu 1-rpdlv înCrea,;Sed un- der ncccus1itNyý an 1 1ý illie eîly of adeýquat C labor. Fueorpo vision1 for. adequ attte Ili inal defenico liecesi [ds 1 miaintenaince of vajst reserVves Of tî(Itue rugo i nationî, resuvu-s froni wihblin ofl(,. (.e;Ila bc drawn1 i al ýSin\"Io yea1r if nucu(,Ssary t o mleut 1Ho ie oues of th -1r-mv a îd 'naýV\\. A sane1 .11(l ('ofsorvatmve\\- develop- nienit of fIfes reou( t eut the( needs of Ille nation In l ies ofpae necessit ates a -onist:irtlyi\\ cesn intensiftv olnan0nn of IlI ah- sout frrstland an1(l the bu(ilingiL up and niaintcuancu o)f un1 eniormiotus foresi capta. îcsu remu l)u hs forest capital cani bc drawnN upon in times of wamad may dte.rminu thr fate of the nation. Lgland lias for (enuris iglect- ed hecr forests and for generations lias ob)taiýned mnost of the wood used in lier buildi1ngs iad industry from bue-, Yond the sea. Th- trs of war found hier witlî a meagire forest capital, and New England's sonsý many of themn New Hlampshire boys, are today felling the remnant ol the forests of that proud uountry that the empire may live. When the sombre clouds of wýar are lifted from Europe's battlefields and peacc again ruies over the earth, Englan(l's lesson, luarnud ini this bitter strife, will be taken to huart by lier people and forests will elothe hier idle lands. A forest capital, far beyond that of former days, wilî not only add to lier conumie development in times of peace but be developed and' main- taîned, to butter insure lier against vital nee(ls in times of possible future strife. Fraýnce( has been more far-seeing in her forest policy, and, next to Ger- miaiy, lias been the most successful naitioni in Europe in the economnic de- vel1optuent of hier non-agricultural lands for the production of timber. When the war broke out she had a forest capital that under the neces- sity- of strife could be drawn upon for vaýst supplies of wood necessary for iîngiiý, transportation and trench construction, ail vital to lier very existence. If the Frenchi lad liad no forests at the outbreak of the war, France would be devastated today and the nations of middle Europe feasting in the halls of Paris.",
         "Canadian Fores(ry Journal, February, 1918 1 5 5 7 10 MILLIONS FOR PLANTING No lîmît will be set this year on the number of forest tree seedlings by the Pennsylvania Departmnent of Fores- try for f ree 'distribution. Anyone Swho wants to plant trees this spring Smay have them for the asking. The ollly condition being that applica- .tion for less than five hundred trees will not be filled; applicants must pay for paeking and transportation, and the trees may not be sold, but must be acttîally plantcd in Pennsylvania for reforestation. No applications can be filled for ornamrental trees. The State Forest nurseries have ALE Uuversiy Foratum chol s gtOrduate depatt f YaIe Unst- anrdty ati top b o tde exisg ora uchool in te te tte\u0026ra dot exceed sny othr Itnmbrf taun.A 00ueca fwosr e or iendn o u ts antfi in aitutis ond Our sadigad under exeprption coditontomn h W.cluinit crertn Cresc.e ubet oALE nivrity Forenht oftSuhool. Thsewh ae coptdgeneral core i V-ui torsry a e d te i forraarh sd adcei tohe Uit edroSoate. auditree, Fereate Mangeent, Forents Techni su Lumering Thoýe rgl w-r course ednztth begrnee f ateek of Forsy ït thfed tca laep Milor PeônsyOf hnienn. n Fodr excrteionfondtions adrena nr the hola -p*a C etutfo raised more trees last year than ever before; but SO mnanv of the foresters have enlisted, and so few lal)orers are available, that the tnmber to be planted on the State Forests probably will be even less than l:îst v'ear. Over, 10,000),000 trees are readv'to se't out next spring, an(l as man\\- more( ;ire iii the nurseries, but are -too srnuil to plant this year. The stock available for fret' dis- tribution is almost ail three \\ 4-11rs old, ýand inicludes white pine, Scotch pine, red l)ine. pitch pine, Norwaxýi s prtie, European larch, .Jal):iit,,4 la,*rc and red oak. lm - 4k fTREES, SHRUBS AND SEEDS I itirdy Northern Transi and Shrubs et Loweet jPricea. Native and Foraigfn Tire Seeds J EDYE-DE-HIRST \u0026SON,DENNY-HURST jDRYDEN, ONT. Shp e tol. M, Gavera- ment, Etc Crepuec rnas tHÎII't, Secdlings and Transplants e 54-1qstf- i a st- for v«r A' n t ii try. imne stocko (i eadLog hardy sortsi at low prie rte for r e1ita jmention th îs milaasin. j.«' Foetlaintera Guide Free. Largest (Growere ln Ainarica. Box 503 Dundav. Ill_. U.S.A. PERFECTION SLEEPING BAG WITH PNEUMATIC MATI'RESS These eveniy..aolIt air niattreasca% imy be liard on daznp prourid wîth perfect safety-- they arenn\" et And tbey airs ait. 3olutely sanitary wîith tio place for duel or verînîn toeet Vaaly deflated and mnflatcd-may be ounild into a aminl light bundle aud eily uarricd in and out ut the house. Luzit iindcfiitcly. Inveluabla for moter, vachitng suad camping trips. En. dorsied by the F-edtral Cxovernment. Write for Catalog and endorsornonts te-day. Pneumatlo Mfg. Co.Bo53 1t Street. ROKYN, N-Y",
         "i )S anadian Forestry Joufnal, February, 1918 C ONFEDERATION LIFE ASSOCIATION UNCONDITIONAL ACCUMULATION POLICIES Are liberal up-to-date contracts which guarantee to the insured every benefit consistent with safety. Wrîte for Particulars which xviII gladly be f trnished by any representative of the company or the HEAD OFFICE, TORONTO MINIATURE CONSTRUCTION Landacape, .Mechanlcal and Architec- tural Modela, Topographîcal Maps and Paintlnga. for 9CHOO S$ - C:OURE4~S - MUSEUMS Govemmnent work a specialty MORGAN BROS. CO., Inc. MODIEL MAKERS Room 1650 Grand Central Terminal Phone 7720 Murray Hill NEW YORK CITY R. 0. SWEEZEY a. Se., M. CRU.Soc. C. a Water Powers. Timber Land\u0026.I 16 St Jams t MNREL UNI VERSITY KINGSTON * ONTARIO ARTS MEDICINE EDUCATION APPLIED SCIENCE Mming. Chernical, civil, Mechanicai and Electrical Engineering. HOME STUDY Arts (\"ourse by correspondence. Degree wath one year's attendance. Summe School July and Augfuat. Naviation SdioeI Decomber to Aprîl. ...EO. Y. CHOWN, aeaîstrar. UNIVERSITY 0F NEW BRUNSWICK FREDERICTON. N.B. DEPARTMENT 0F FORESTRY Establiahed in 1908 'Best of facilities for definite in- struction and supervision in Practi- cal Forestry., Surveying, cruising and construc- tion work carried on in our own tract of 3600 acres, with Forestry Camp in the centre. Cmpetent men from the School al, present in demand to take up Forest Sreywork with the Provincial Crown Land D)epartment. For turther înformation addrssa: DEPARTMENT 0F FORESTRY Uaiv.ruity Calendar furnihed o» application. C. C. JONIES, Chancellor. Pl 1558",
         "Cqnadian Forestry Journal, February, 1918 15 FOREST BRANCH ROLL 0F HONOR The British Columbia Forest Branch during the past three years has furnished a large pereentage of Srecruits for service overseas, the staff ini ail parts of the province 'having frequently been reduced to skeleton proportions by the frequent enlist- ments. Casualties have been many and some of the wounded foresters have already been rcturned from the front as unfitted for further service. Fourteen of the gallant fellows will return no more, having given their lives in the cause of frýedom. The honor roll to date is as follows: Capt. J. B. Mitchell, M.C.. Lieut. J. B. Chamberlin, F. B. Wheatley, A. J. Pickup, V. K. Wood, A. Rees, W. A. Boultbee, P. Johnston, V. A. Harvey, N. F. Murray, R.ý F. Irving: P. MeLennan, G. R. Malcolm, and Mr. Ash. Lieut. J. B. Chamberlin, of the ]Royal Flying Corps, was the only officer whose remains were sent bac k *to Canada for burial. LAUNDRY BILLS AND FORESTS Who would think of attributing increased Iaundry bis to the forest? And yet acetie acid, so neccssary to the cleaning of linen, is indîrectly a forest product and lias grown re- markably scarce. The U. S. government needs every ounce of acetone that acetic acid can furnish. \"Part of the reason why some laundries have advanced the price to four cents each for collars became apparent on Saturday,\" remarks the Philadelphia Ledger, 'when it be- came known that the United States Government was likely to take over control of the acetic acid industry o n very much the saine limes which Shave been applied in the case of Sammonia. \"It is understood that the Govern- ment, in the interest of obtaining an adequate supply of acetone for war purposes, has undertaken to control the distribution of acetic acid throughout the country, aird that word to that effect, if it lias not ai- ready been circuiated among tle trade, -wili be sent out this week. Acetic acid has long been a standard chemical in the cleaning of , ollars and other white goods. A minor effTect is likclyv to be seen in the production of benzoates, no- tahly benzoate of soda: \\\\hich is largely used by somn( imaufacrturers of foods. Acetie aeid is lar-gel\\ used in the manufacture of syntheti lieu- zoates, and Federalj control may ctt down the production.\" Ilardwood distillation vieldfs raw pyroligneous acid, wood ïas n charcoal from beech, bir-ch and miaple. From the tar of the voigeu acid corne wood tai-, ace-tate of ]lme and wood alcool). Fnmi the icehh.e of lime, acetic aci1d i s unade. From aceti cid acotoine is miade and used in mouatu fu the higu explosives, know n ais -oitje- andI lyddite. .Just no%\\ thereý( is an enor- mous deýmand for aeuei infr ture of cordite. Wood alcohol is vaiofegesu purity enters into the productioni of aniline d yes, fomlehdphoto- gra phic films anid smiok leJ(ss 10w der. TROPICAL FORESTS There are at leat wo very large forest regions ini the tropics. These are the Amazon rei1on1 of Soquth America and the InoMlyregion of southeasternia anid jcn islands. 'lhle foreusted riO f the Amazoni River basin -ompr)iising.L an area of 1,00,000 squar-e il es is the largest in the worlId. Th, forested area of Borneo Sunitra. the Phliliîp- pine Islands the MaayI\u003enMisula and Burmia is roughiy estimnated lo be mot less than 500,000s( ir miles, or nearly as large as that of the United States. Thus the. forested area of these two troilrnos alone comprises more tan 2,000,000 square miles. Contrary to the uisual opinion it is ciaimed that trop)ical forests are mot ail composed of liard woods fit omly for special pur poses but that they have a mnuch largeýr percentage of soit and medium hard woods which it is q nite practicable to develop economicaliy. 15 5 9",
         "1560 Canadion Foreetry Journal, January, 1918 Useful Forestry Books FERGUSON -FARM FORESTRY 13v John Arden Ferguson, A.M., M.F., Professor of Forestry at the Pennsylvania State College. VIx241 pages. 54 by 8. Many full-page haif toneg. Cloth, $1.25 net. Covers esperially the subject of forestry as applied to the farm and woodlot. The subject is treated from the broad standpoint of the woodlots in the great plains and p)rairie regions, as well as in the more casteru reffions. KINNEY-THE DEVELOPMENT 0F FOREST LAW IN AMERICA 13x Jav P. Kinney, A. B., LL.B., M.F., Chief Supervisor of Forests, Uniteil States Indian Service. XVIIlx275 pages. 6 by 9. (:loth, $2.50 net. This book dîscusses the chronologiral developmcnt of legisiation dircted( to thw preservation of existing foresi resources, reforeýstation \u003cofctovr buirned-over areas, the extension of forcst areas, and the svstemtic m nient of forests for productive purposes. KINNEY THE ESSENTIALS 0F AMERICAN TIMBER LAW ly Jay P. Kinnev, A.13., LL.B., M.F. XXIXx279 pages. 6 by 9. Cloth, S3.00 net This b)o0k continsw information that will prove of inestimable va.lue( to anoewho desires to ascertain easily and quickly the funda-, metas f Ame1ricaýn timber law, or wlio needs reference to court decisio ns to suppllort a well-founded view as to the law upon any l)articillar poïi. WOOLSEY -FRENCH FORESTS AND FORESTRY. Tunisia, Algeria and Corsica. Wjth a Translation of the Algerian Code of 1903. BllTh(îodore S. Woolsey. Jr., M.F., Assistant [Distric.t Forester, ltdStatles Forest Service, 1908-1915. XVx238 pages.6 ]19.Illstrate1d. Cloth, $2.50 net. kmboîesthe' rosait of a study of the more important phases of forest p)ra'-ce 1in Cors 1ica, Algeriai znd Tunisia. The author's exper- jenc ahr\u003eadinludejl(s not only continental Europe and the French l)eenences(w01]ch latter are -descr'ibed îi this book;, but also forest niaagenen inl3rtih India as wvell. BRYANT LOGGI;G. The Principal and General Methods of Operation in the United States. BUv Halph Clem1ent Prva:1nt, F.V' 'M'A., Manufacturers' Asso- c-Îiation. Professor of Lunimberingý, Yl University. XVII 1x590 page. 6 w 9 133 fiues (loth S3 50 net. 1) isu~ses a Iengh t1e miovemient ot thetmber fromn the stump to tlle 1)nt1acuin lnt, and the chIie(f facilities and method's for doing 1hi'ý: wîth1 espcia rferenceý to logging railroads. TAYLOR -HANDBOOK FOR RANGERS AND WOODSMEN B\\- iay L B. Taylor, Forest agr United States Forest Ser 1vice. IXx.120) pages. VI' by 2;36 figures. Flexible Binding, $.0net. Prepareid as a result of the author's experience in field work of the 0 United States., Forest Service. Solves problems which confront a forest ranger in government, state and private employ. The sugges- tions otlered m'Il also be found of use to others whose work or re- creation Lakes them nto rough or unsettled regions. Canadian Forestry Journal, \"6 Booth Bldg., Ottawa 156()",
         "Canadion Forcstry Journal, .Ianury rip91II8 P., L. BUTTRICK I FORESTERS AND RANGERS CONSULTING IFORESTER EVERYTIIING YOU NEEI) NEW HAVEN. CONN., U. S. A. CAN BE SUPPLIED BY US P. 0 10X607 -__ TIMBER ESTIMATES UTILIZATION STUDIES PLANTING PLANS Landscape and General Forestry Work. Eight years experience in practical forestry work of ail sorts. PHILIP T. COOLIDGE I Tapes Log Rules FORESTER f ScMies Luinber Timber 'Estimating and Mapping. Transits Gauges Supervisioný of Lumber Contracts. \u0026c. ___ Ivel, \u0026c. Surveying. - - Forest Planting. __ STCTSON BLDG., 31 CENTRAL ST. The Ontari.i Hughes Owens Company BANGOR, MAINE. 529 Sussex St. OTTAWA, ONT. 50OCT S WAR TIM'E SPECIAL OFFER ONE WHOLE YEAR FOR FIFTY CENTS! We are desirous of addlng 1,000 new names to our list this month and to make it a certalnty that we will flot be disappointed we are offerlng ROD AND GUN IN CANADA to you and 999 others for Twelve Months for 50 cents. W. J. TAYLOR LIMITED, PubMser . Woodstock, Ont. -P. - 156 1",
         "1562 anadjun Foresi nj Journal, February, 1,918 A Live Book on Our WiId Animais at a Bargain Price! In the long winter evenings there is opportunity for burnishing up your haif-forgotten knowledge of our Canadian wiid animais and for learning a hundred things you never suspected before. We have such a book packaged ready for you. In the bookstores, it seils commoniy at $1.50. (The illustration above shows the paper- bound edition priced at one dollar). The journal lias arranged for a limited edition of leather-bound copies to seU to our readers for $ 1.00. The book contains 26.') pages and 61 fuit-page illustrations nl color of the Northi Amner'can wild animais ini thceir native hauints. The text is hy Chias. K. Reed, who has %von muich faine through various nature books, and th e lates are in natural colors by The book is shaped conveniently for your pocket. Whîle authorita- tative in miatter, it is brightly written and wilI pa- high dividenid in hielpiful and interesting reading. nloea dollar bill to the Caniadian Feores;ti-y Jouirnal, 119 Booth Building, Ottawa, marking your name very piainiy on the attached coupon- Canadian Fores/ry Journal, Ottawa. Please send copu of 'The Animal Guide' ini leather inding to the follow- ing address. One dollar. is enclosed. Naine. ý..% Adrs A Special IMessage! The National work of the C.aradîan Forestryssoci. ation depencis upon prompt receipt of ail the annual fees. Make the 1918 remittance a -Con- trîbuting Membership- at five dollars if you possibly can, The Forestry journal is only one feature of your membership. You are a partner in the widespread, educational work. so essential to progress in forest conservation. Part of your fee goes to, pay for our propaganda. Make il a \"Gontribuféng Fre\" if uou thînk you can «[ford the amouni for genu- ine national service. R. R. BRADLEY Foirei 1-gner and Mrim Can. Soc. of F. E. consultingtForecs'el to the New Brunh. wick, Fiadway GO. Timber and Pulpwood Estimâtes. Forest Maps. Advice on the Management of Wood Lands. Timber lands ligted for sale. CLOSE ATLANTIC BUILDIxO, Si'. JOURE, I.1. e 1562",
         "Canadîan Forestry Jouir il, hibiiiril, 19/18 SEEDING and PLANTING IN THE PRACTICE 0F FORESTRY I3y James W.TueDNS. .. iructor of the Forest Sclhool and rossrof Sivci ie aeU niversity. This book presviits both th1w deUtil1s of practicre, and the funda- mntlal prineiples that conitrol sce and failure in the conomir production of niiurser\\ stock :111( t11c a1rtificial1 regeneration of forests. It explains the why as well1 as the hlow. Part 1. deals withi the ,ilvical1asi for sevding and plan1tifng, more particullarly the prinici p ls wihundellie ile choirc of Specles, the loeesof saigand the composition of the stand. Part Il. is dsrpieof thev varous operations in artificial re- generation and the results that mnay be expected fromn the best practice. Chu pier Jli-adings o!f This Beook: P art 1. Silvical Basis for Seedirng and Pllanting. Chap. I. Definitions and Ge-neralitieýs. 'i:he Choice of Species In AUtificial Regenteration. IV. The Principles whichî Deterinie Saig V. The Princi1ples xliich Govern the Composition of the Stand. Part IL 'lhle Artificial Formaâtion of Woods. VI. General Gonsiderations. VII.ý octTe edadSe olcig VIII.FoctrcSedadSdColcig IX, Th'le Protection of Seeding and Pianting Sites. X. Preliminary Treatmient of Seeding n latn Sites.tîn XI. Establishing Forests by Direct Seedinig. XII. to, XV. Th'le Forest Nursery. XVI. to XVII. Establishing Forests bY Planting. xxîi \u002b454 pages, 6 by 9, 140 fi gu res. Cloth, $3.50 net. Canadian Forestry Journal 206-207 Booth Bldg., OTITAWA.",
         "PETERBOROUGH CANQES ~O6c For service our Canvas Covered Canoes are unequalled. CI 6,Ane jWe make a complete line of Canoes, Skiffs and Motor Craft. Our catalogue wîiI be of interest to you, j Peterborough Canoe Co., Ltd., Peterborough Canada S LEE PO0N AI1R with a CONFORT SLEEPING POCKFJ flecommended b y the Forest Service, campera Physiciens, levalîds, Tuberculosis Patients a Sportsmen everywherýe A warm, dry, comfort- able bed. Wind tain, cold and water-proof- Pscks 6 x 25. Air oafor hmCamp. y chncne, etc. =811-trted CcularU Fre by hentioning Conadien Forestry JournaL. ATHOL MANUFACTURING CO., ATHOL, MASS., U.S.A., (Succeaors to Metropoltan Air Gooda Co.) . Dealers write e"
      ],
